B
LETTERS OF MAJOR J. DOWNING
LETTER I.
FROM THE NEW-YORK DAILY ADVERTISER.
[We are happy to learn that the announcement of the
supposed
death by drowning, which appeared in this paper a few
days ago, was a mistake, and that the distinguished individual,
Major Downing, is sound and well, down East. We have strong
hopes of hearing frequently from him, touching his and the
President's
tour.
Eds.
]
Boston,
25th June
, 1833.
Mr. Editor
,I have seen in your paper a
`Crowner's Inquest,' saying I was drowned
at the bridge at Castle Garden, and picked
up down in York Bay. This is a tarnal lie
and I wish you to say so; I did not so much
as get my feet wet when the bridge fell,
though it was a close shave, I tell you. I was
riding right alongside the Gineral,if any
thing, a little ahead on him. But this aint
the only thumper I've heard about that scrape.
I have heard it said, that Mr. Van Buren had
sawed the string-pieces under the bridge
(anybody may guess for what); but that can't
be so, for he was right behind the Gineral
when the bridge fell, and all the folks were
floundering in the mud and water. I thought
he was gone, too, for he was right in the
thickest on 'em. I and the Gineral clapt in
the spurs, and we went quick enough through
the crowd on the Battery; and the first thing
I saw was Mr. Van Buren hanging on the tail
of the Gineral's horse, and streaming out
behind as straight as old Deacon Willoby's
cue, when he is a little too late to meetin.
Some of the folks said it look'd like the
`Flying Dutchman,' and some said something
about `Tam O'Shanter; but never mind, we
snaked him out of that scrape as slick as a
whistle. I don't believe any one was drowned;
but some did get a mortal ducking. I never
see such a mess: they went in there like
frogsand such an eternal mixingcolonels,
and captains, and niggers, and governors, and
sailors, and all: it made no odds which went
first, or what end was uppermost. And when
we got up to the tavern, where we put up
over night, I and the Gineral had a real laugh
to see all our folks coming in one arter
another
.
Gov. Cass had a bandanna tied round
his head,`What,' says I, `Governor, are
you hurt?' `Not as I knows on,' says he; `but
I lost my wig.' And sure enough, come to
take off the handkercher, his wig was gone.
`Well,' says I, `Governor, you've got the
whole Indian tribes in your department, and
it is a hard case if you can't get a scalp to
suit you.' And the Gineral snorted right out
at this. And then come Gov. Massy; and
he had his pantaloons rip'd from the waist
band clean down to the knee. `Well,' says I,
`this beats all natur; it will cost more than
fifty cents to mend them.' `Never mind,
Massy,' says the Gineral, `if you can't get
them are pantaloons mended, the State'll give
you a new pair.' And then we all snorted
and sniker'd, I tell you.
I suppose it won't amount to nothing to
tell you what we did in York; for it seems
to me every living cretur was there. I
never see such a crowd in all creation; and
it has been just so all the while up to this
hour.
I've got the rumatiz now all over meI
ha'nt had my hat on for nearly three weeks.
As soon as we go out, I take one side and the
Gineral t'other, and once in a while we change
sides, and keep it up, bowing right and left.
I like that better than shakin hands, for I can
stand it now, and with one swing bow over
five thousand folks at once, and we can't
shake off half that number before breakfast.
Mr. Van Buren gets along pretty well here
among the Yankees, considering; but he has
got his hands full, I tell you. They don't
hurra here quite as much as they do down
south, but kinder like to talk over things,
you know, and we've got plaguey little time
for that. `Major,' says Mr. Van Buren, one
day, `I wish you would do all the talkin with
these manufactory folksyou have a nack
that way.' `Well,' says I, `I don't know but
I have, but,' says I, `Mr. Van Buren, I guess
you can talk as glib as most folks.' So he
can: for I do raly believe, if Mr. Van Buren
was to set up a factory, he would turn out
cloth that would suit any kind of living
cretur, and no one could tell whether it was
made of cotton or flax, hemp or wooltwilled,
or plain-striped, or checker'dbut little of all
on 'em. I never see such a curious cretur as
he isevry body likes him, and he likes evry
B 2
body; and he is just like evry body; and yet,
in all the droves of folks I've seen since I left
Washington, I never saw any body like Mr.
Van Buren. Enos Lyman got a painter to
try and get a likeness of Mr. Van Buren, for
his sign-board to the tavern, on the road to
Tanton. `Well, now,' says I, `just put up
your brushes; you may just as well try to
paint a flash of heat-lightning in dog-days.'
But he tried it, and the sign-board looks about
as much like Mr. Van Buren as a salt cod-fish
looks like a pocket handkercher.
We start to-morrow morning down east,
and I sha'nt be able to write another word till
arter we have been to Downingville. I'm
going on ahead to lend Sergant Joel a hand to
get things to rights there; and if you don't
hear of cracking work down there, that will
make 'em stare, I'm mistaken. The Gineral
is amazingly tickled with the Yankees; and
the more he sees on 'em, the better he likes
'em. `No nullification here, Major,' says he.
`No,' says I, `Gineral: Mr. Calhoun would
stand no more chance down east here, than a
stump'd-tail bull in fly time.'
J.
Downing
, Major,
Downingville Militia, 2d Brigade.
LETTER II.
To the Editor of the New-York Daily Advertiser.
Downingville,
29
th June
, 1833.
Dear Sir
,This is going to be rather a
lengthy letter. We've had real times. I
begun
to feel pretty streaked for our folks when
I see what was done on Boston Common, and
over there to little Cambridge. I told you I
was going on here to get things to rights; and
when I got here, I found'em in a terrible taken
about that crowner's lie down in York Bay.
There was nothin at all goin on.
I went full drive down to the meetin-house,
and got hold of the rope, and pull'd away like
smoke, and made the old bell turn clean over.
The folks come up thick enough then to see
what was to pay, and filled the old
tabernacle
chock full, and there was more outside than
you could count. `Now,' says I, `I spose you
think there's going to be preaching here
to-day
,
but that is not the business. The
Gineral
is comin.' That was enough`Now,'
says I, `be spry. I tell'd the Gineral last
winter he'd see nothing till he got down here,
and if we don't make him stare then there's
no snakes. Where's Captain Finny?' says I.
`Here I be,' says he; and there he was, sure
enough: the crittur had just come out of his
bush-pasture, and had his bush-hook with him.
Says I, `Captain Finny, you are to be the
marshal of the day.' Upon that he jumps
right on eend. `Now,' says I, `where is Seth
Sprague, the schoolmaster?' `Here I be,'
says he; and there he stood with his
pitch-pipe
up in the gallery, just as if I was going
to give out the salm for him. `You just pocket
your pitch-pipe,' says I, `Seth, and brush up
your larnin, for we have pitched on you to
write the address.'`Why, Major,' says Zekiel
Bigelow, `I thought I was to do that, and I've
got one already.' `But,' says I, `you don't
know nothing about Latin; the Gineral
can't stomack any thing now without its got
Latin in it, ever since they made a Doctor on
him down there to Cambridge t'other day;
but howsever,' says I, `you shall give the
address
after all, only just let Seth stick a little
Hog-latin into it here and there. And now,'
says I, `all on you be spry, and don't stop
stirrin till the pudden's done.'
Then they begun to hunt for hats, and
down the gallery-stairs they went. And if
there'd been forty thanksgivens and
independence
days comin in a string, I don't
believe
there could be more racket than there
was in Downingville that afternoon and night.
By ten o'clock next morning all was ready.
I had 'em all stationed, and I went out and
come back three or four times across the brook
by the potash, to try'em. I got a white hat
on, and shag-bark stick, put some flour on my
head, and got on to my sorrel horse, and
looked just as much like the old gentleman as
I could. Arter tryin them two or three times,
I got'em all as limber as a with, and the last
time I tried'em, you've no idee, it went off just
as slick as ile.
`Now,' says I, `tenshon the hull! Stand
at ease till you see me again;' and then I
streaked it down to old Miss Crane's tavern,
about two miles off, and waited till the
Gineral
come along; and afore I had mixed a
second glass of switchel up they came, and
the Gineral looked as chirk and lively as a
skipper.
`Now,' says I, `Gineral, we are going right
into Downingville, and no man here is to give
any orders but myself,' and I said this loud
enough for Mr. Van Buren and Governor
Woodbury and all on 'em to hear me, and
they were all as hush arter that as cows in a
clover-lot. Then we all mounted, and on we
wentI and the Gineral a leetle a-head on
'em. And when we crossed the brook, says I,
`don't be afeard of the string-pieces here,
Gineral
we
aint in York now.' `I'll follow you,
Major,' says he, `through thick and thinI
feel safe here.'
Jest as we got on the nole on tother side the
brook, we come in sight of Downingville.
The Gineral riz right up in his stirrups, and
pointed with his hickory, and says he, `Major,
that's Downingville.' Says I, `that's true
enuf, and I should like to hear any one say it
aint,' says I`for the sight on't makes me
crawl all over, and whenever I hear any one
say one word agin it, I feel as tho' I could
take him, as I have done streaked snakes, by
the tail, and snap his head off.' `Why,' says
the Gineral, `I knew that was Downingville
as soon as my eye caught a glimpse on't. I'd
go,' says he, `Major, east of sunrise any day
to see sich a place.' The Gineral was tickled
to pieces, and I thought I should go myself
right through my shirt-collarfor, you see,
the Gineral never see sich a sight afore.
Seth Sprague had put the children all on
the school-houseyou couldn't see an atom
of the roofwith green boughs, and singing
a set piece he had made; and when I and the
Gineral passed by they made it all ring agin,
I tell you; whether it was his facing the sun
or what, but he looked as if he was e'eny jist
a going to cry (for he is a mazin tender-hearted
crittur). Jist then Sargent Joel, who had
charge of the field-piece in front of the
meetin-house
,
touched her off; and didn't she speak!
This composed the Gineral in a minutesays
he, `Major, I shouldn't want nothing better
than a dozen of them guns to change the
boundry-line along here jest to suit youbut
look, Major, what on earth has got into Mr.
Van Buren's horse?' Sure enough, Sargent
Joel had put in a leetle too much waddin, if
any thing, and Enoch Bissel, as sly as a
weasel, slipped in a swad of grass, that hit
Mr. Van Buren's horse, and set him capering
till he kinder flung him. I was as wrathy as
murder; says I, `where is he?' and I arter
him full splithe was clippin it across the
orchard, so that you might put an egg on his
coat-flap, and it wouldn't role off. I streaked
it round the corner of the stone-fence to head
himbut afore I got to him he ketched Mr.
Van Buren's horse, and was clearing out of
the countryand afore this he is slick enough
in the Province.
They tell different stories about it, but
Deacon
Willoby saw the hull on it, and he says
Mr. Van Buren hung on like a lamper-eel, till
he was kinder jerked up like a trounced toad,
and he came down on the horse's rump jist
as he kicked up behind, and that sent him
clean over the fence into the Deacon's
potato-patch
.
He turned over so fast in the air you
could not tell one end from tother; but his feet
struck first, and he stood there, the Deacon
says, and made as handsome a bow to the folks
as if nothing on earth had happened to him.
The review of Captain Finny's company
did take the shine off them are Boston and
Salem sogers, I tell you; but they was all so
keen arter the Gineral that all I and Captain
Finny could do, we couldn't keep the line
strait; and they all got into such a snarl, that
you might as well try to straiten a sheep's
wool.
The bell was ringing all the while; two
people was up there with stone hammers
poundin on her, caze Uncle Josh had gone
and took the bell-rope, and tied on eend on't
to the steeple, and carried the tother eend
over to the Deacon's chimbly, more than
twelve rods off; and every inch on't was
hung full of flags, and where there wa'n't no
flags, he had got all the cloth out of the
fullin-mill; and the gals and Downingville
boys had gin all their handkerchers, and
gowns, and flannel shirts, and it was so high
up, and the wind kinder shook'em all together
so you couldn't tell a checked shirt from an
old Continental. The Gineral was tickled
half to death; says he, `Major, that looks
about right.' `It does so,' says I; `Gineral,
if that ain't union, I don't know.' He's as
keen as a brier to catch any thing cunnin;
he don't care where he is, he snorts right out.
As soon as we got down to the
meetin-house
door, Zekil Bigelow gin the address; it
was stuck full of Latin words here and there,
like burs in a stray sheep's fleece. Zekil is a
knowin cretur: he keeps a packin-yard, and
salts down more fish than any man in three
counties round: he don't know so much about
Latin as some folks, but he did get along with
C
his address most curious. He thank'd the
Gineral for comin to Downingville in the first
place, and then he thank'd him for his
proclamation
,
and for presarvin the Union, and
threw in the salt, and the nitre, and pickle,
and when he come to talk of the nullifiers,
he cut and shaved, and made the scales fly, I tell
you. Every hair on the Gineral's head stood
strait on eend. And there stood that cretur
Zekiel right afore him, talking like a book,
and his head was as smooth, and every hair
on it slicked down with a dipped candle; and
that are kew of his wo'd tell the folks behind
which way his eye turned jest as well as
though they was lookin strait in his face
caze it kinder lodged on his collar, and every
time he looked up, it would stand still a minet,
and point right strait up in the air.
Then cum the Gineral's turn,his heart
was so full, he could but jest speak, and I was
jist agoin to begin for him, when out he
came:
`My friends,' says he, `though I tell'd 'em
down south my father was an Irishman, and
my mother, too, I am as clear a Yankee (and
he turned, and lookin round him, slap'd his
hand on my shoulder), as the Major himself,'
says he, `and he knows it.' `So I do,' says I,
`Gineral, I tell'd 'em all so often enough.' `I
will presarve the Union, I'll be hang'd and
choak'd to death if I don't; and when I want
pickle I know where to find it. I am glad to
hear you say that salt petre once in a while
is goodI always thought soand if the
Constitution spiles in my hands for the want
of it, I wont stand another election.' Here
the Gineral was goin to stop, but, says I, in
his ear, `You must give 'em a little Latin,
Doctor.' Here he off hat agin`E pluribus
unum,' says he, `my friends, sine qua non.'
`That'll do, Gineral,' says I; and then we
turn'd to, and shook all the folks round till
dinner time, and then we made the bake
beans and salt pork fly, and the cider too, I
tell you. The folks hadn't eat nothin since
I got on to the ground. Arter dinner I tell'd
the Gineral about that are blasted rascal,
Enoch Bissel, who tucked in the grass waddin.
`That's the same fellow,' says I, `Major
Barry turn'd out of the Post Office. I knew
he was a scamp, and if he wasn't
then
, he is
now
.' `Why, Major,' says the Gineral, `it was
jest so with that infernal rascal Randolf; if
he didn't desarve what I gin him
afore
he
attacked me, he sartinly did afterwards, and
where's the odds?' `Plaguey little,' says I,
`Gineral.'
To-night we're goin to a quiltin at Uncle
Josh's. Miss Willoby, the Deacon's eldest
darter, is sprucin up for it. She is rather too
old to be handsome, but she is a keen cretur.
The Gineral and Mr. Van Buren both talk about
her considerable. If the Gineral don't keep
a sharp look out, Mr. Van Buren will go clean
ahead on him on that tack; for he is the
perlitest
cretur amongst the women you ever
see. The Gineral says he must have some
of our Yankee gals in the cabinet next winter,
and I kinder have a notion there will be some
hitchin teems doune here abouts afore we
quit.
We shall go strait from here to
Saratogue
,
and wash inside and out there. I expect
we shall all need washin afore we get
there.
This is the longest letter I ever writ in all
my life, but I'm to hum now. It would cost
you a good many of your odd ninepenses, I
guess, to pay the postage, if it want for the
Presidenthe franks all my lettersand that
aint what he does for most folks.
I may tell you about the quiltin frolic
to-night
,
in my next, but I wont promise; for I
have jest as much as I can do here, to do all
the chores for the Gineral, and write near
about fifty letters a day for him.
Yours to sarve,
J.
Downing
, Major,
Downingville Militia, 2d Brigade.
C 2
LETTER III.
Cause of the sudden termination of the President's
Eastern TourDance at DowningvilleTrying on
the Gineral's coat
.
July
14, 1833.
On my way from Saratogue to Washington
.
Part land, part waterbut all steam
.
Dear Sir
,Ever since I wrote to you
from Downingville that plaguy long letter, I
ha'nt writ one letter, except for the President;
so all the accounts you have seen since are a
pack of lies. I thought I would wait to see
what they would say about the Gineral's goin
hum so sudden, and the cause on't, before I
tell'd you all about it. Now this is the hull
on'tYou remember I tell'd you we were all
goin that night to a quiltin at Uncle Josh's;
well, we did go, and we had a great time on't,
you may depend. But it endid in trouble,
and split all our folks up into kindlin-wood.
Arter the quiltin, they cleared away the
kiverlids
and knock'd up a dance. The Gineral
led off the old Deacon's darter, and afore he
got half down he began to smoke; so he off
coat, and at it agin, and went clean through.
I kept my eye on Mr. Van Buren, who was
not dancing then, but was ready to cut in in
case the Gineral giv out. As soon as this
dance was over, he sliped round and wispered
somethin to the fidler, and then told the folks
he'd like to show 'em a new dance. Cass,
and Woodberry, and all on us run off to git
partners, and all made for the Deacon's darter,
for she was as spruce and as fine as a fiddle,
but she was
engaged to Mr. Van Buren
.
That crittur, it seems, had secured her for the
second dance, whilst we were all at dinner
talking politics.
We had all been drinkin putty considerable
of switchel, and cider, and egg-pop, with a
little New England in it, and felt good-natur'd
and wrathy jest as it turned up, and come
plaguy nigh havin a fight right offfor I
didn't kinder like that move of Mr. Van Buren's.
However, I thought I wouldn't spile sport,
seein I was to hum, and they all strangers:
the Gineral tell'd me to let him alone, and he'd
put things to rights: sure enuf, he work'd
round, and put all the folks in a ring, so there
warn't no top nor no bottom, they were all
kinder head and kinder tail. `Now,' says he,
`I'll call the figers,'and the fiddle began
and such a caperen you never see. `First
dance to your partners,' says he; and at it
they went, he all the while figerin in the
middle with the Deacon's darter. After
shufflin
away at this, the tune changed, and he
called out,`Change partners, and shuffle the
next;' and so they chang'd, and shuffled and
changed, one arter another, till each one
danced clean round the ring. `Now,' says
he, `all hands roundturn partners half round
cross over with a swingback aginright
and leftriggledown and shuffle:' and you
never see sich a snarlthere warn't one on
'em had the partner he started with. Unkle
Josh, who led off old Miss Sprague, Seth's
mother, had got Zekil Bigelow's youngest
darter; Sargent Joel was dancing with the
Deacon; and Cass and Woodberry stood back
to back shufflin to nobody; and there was
that crittur Mr. Van Buren, with the Deacon's
darter, shavin it down, right along side the
fidler, clean up head, and just then he twitch'd
the bow out of the fidler's hand, and gin it a
draw over a candle, and that put a stop to
the music for that night. The Gineral
snorted: says he, `Major, I tell'd you he'd
put things strait'tis just so in my Cabinet
he's a master crittur to put things to rights
there; and when we all got in that plaguy
snarl there, he cut and shuffled them up, and
afore we could say Jack Robinson, all the
troublesome fellers were shuffled out.' `He's
a master hand at it,' says I, `sure enuff.' As
there was an eend of the dance, all the galls
off shoes and stockins, and went hum, caze it
was kinder muddy; and we all went to the
tavern, and the Gineral went to bed. We all
then began to plan for the next day, but some
of the folks was plaguy crusty. Seth Sprague
wanted to show his school-house; Zekil
Bigelow
wanted all on us to go to his
packin-yard
;
and the Deacon said he would like to
show us his fullin-mill, and give a kinder
thanksgivin; but nothin seemed to go right.
We concluded to call the Gineral, and so I
went in, but he was so sound asleep I thought
it wouldn't do to wake him; so, for a kinder
sport, I brought out his hat, and coat, and
hickory. `Now,' says I, `this is all I can get
of the Gineral to-night, and we'll all try on,
and whoever they fit best, shall decide what's
to be done:' and we put Zekil in the chair as
moderator. Woodberry was just goin to take
off his coat, when Zekil, and nigh upon all on
'em, said he carried a leetle to much blubber,
and he stood aside and didn't try at all. Cass
off coat and put on the Gineral's, and it fitted
him to a hair; but the Gineral's hat was a
leetle
too small for him. Mr. Van Buren's
turn came next: as soon as he put on the
coat, he riz on his toes; but it would not do;
it kivered him to his heels, and the hat fell
on his shoulders, and you couldn't see nothin
on earth of him. `How does that look, Zekil?'
says he. `Why,' says Zekil, `it looks plaguy
curious.' `Is the coat too long, or am I too
short?' says Mr. Van Buren. `Well, I don't
know exactly which,' says Zekil, `I'll think
on't to rights.' `That's right, Zekil,' says I,
`don't commit yourself;' and then they all
kinder snickered; and the laugh went agin
Mr. Van Buren. `Now, my friends,' says
Mr. Van Buren, `one word, and I'm doneit
is not, and never has been, and never will be
my wish to fit the coat and hat
exactly;
but I
think that whoever wears either should be
least seen.' `Well,' says Zekil, `that's my
notion too;' and that kinder turned the laugh
tother way.
Then cum my turn; but I see how the cat
jump'd, `so,' says I, `I'll jest step out and rig
in another room:' and I went strait to the
Gineral, and woke him up, and tell'd him all
about ithe was as wrathy as thunderand
when he gets his dander up, it's no joke, I tell
you. So in he went. `Well,' says Zekil,
`if I hadn't seen the Major look jest so this
mornin, I'd swear that was the Gineral
himself
.'
The Gineral then gin 'em all a hard
look, and said somthin, but a plaguy leetle
softer; and the cat was out of the bagand
then cum trouble. `What,' says he, `all on
ye Presidents, hey! who has been trying on
my coat?' They were all as mum as a Quaker
meetin. `I'll start by daylight,' says he,
`for Washington.'`Major,' says he, `do you
go by the way you have plann'd, and tell the
folks that I can't cum; for may I be
etarnally'
`That
will do,' says I, `Gineral.'
And with that he gin 'em all a real hard look,
and went to bed. The next mornin, sure
enuf, he was off, Mr. Van Buren and some
others with him. Cass hung back: and I
streaked it round through New-Hampshire,
cut across the edge of Massachusetts,
Connecticut
,
and Vermont, and into York State,
and smack up to Saratogue. 'Twas well I
did so, for the folks were all waitin. I tell'd
'em all jest one story, for it was no use to tell
any other, for the rail-road and steamboats go
so plaguy fast, afore I was done telling the
folks in one town I was in another; and
how on earth Mr. Van Buren manages it, or
could expect me to tell the masons one story,
and the anti-masons another, I can't tell.
Finding, when I got to Saratogue, all the
flashy folks was at Congress Hall, I put up
there too; and it's close alongside the spring.
Mr. Wescot was right glad to see me, and I
had a real time there for a week. There was
a swod of fine folks, and dreadful handsome
galls; and the house was nigh upon chuck
full. They all wanted to know about the
Gineral, and I tell'd 'em pretty considerable
about it, and that we was all on our own hook,
now, pretty much. And I don't see but what
I stand about as good a chance to be President
as any on 'em. I met a man from Georgia
there, 6 feet 9 inches high, a real good fellow.
Most all these southern folks are good fellows,
if you don't say nothin about the Tariff, nor
freein the niggers; but they talk pretty big
I know how to manage them, the Gineral
tell'd me a secret about thatsays he `Major,
when they say they can hit a dollar, tell 'em
you can hit a fourpence happenny.' This
Georgian and I had a good many talks about
politics, but we both thought alike, and didn't
quarrel about that; and he tell'd me Georgia
would go for me, arter the Gineral, as soon as
any north of mason and dickson. Says he,
`Can you shoot a rifle, Major?' `Pretty
considerable
,'
says I. `I can hit a chip in the air,'
says he, `5 times out of 6 shots.' Says I,
`Well, I can beat that, I guess, for I can hit
one 7 times in 4 shots.' `Well,' says he,
`that's enuf, we won't waste powder, and I
knock under.' Says he, `Major, I reckon I
can drink more Saratogue water than you.'
`I'll bet a York shillin of that,' says I. `Done,'
says heand we stak'd the money. Says he,
`Mr. Wescot, give me a pitcher,'and down
he went to the spring. This kinder made the
folks think I was swamp'd. But I went
round to Patten's stable, and got a bucket, and
down I went to the spring; and as soon as
he saw me, he smashed his pitcher in a minet.
Says he `Major, I knock under.'
I swash'd her round there, at Saratogue,
for a week, I tell you. I drank nigh upon 5
buckets every morning; and I am as clear
now as a whistle. I am only sorry I didn't
bring Seth Sprague along with me, with his
D
pitch-pipe, jist to take the shine off of them
'ere singers at Mr. Wescot's house; he'd beat
ary one on 'em.
I got a letter from the Gineral yesterday,
telling me to cum on to Washington as
soon as steem can bring me; and I'm goin
there like a streek of chain-lightning. I'm
afeard there's more trouble there. That new
dance at Uncle Josh's, and trying on the
Gineral's coat and hat among 'em, has kinder
knock'd noses; and I and the Gineral will
have our hands full to get things to rights,
and rig up a new message for the next
Congress
.
I remain etarnally yours,
J.
Downing
, Major,
Downingville Militia, 2d Brigade.
LETTER IV.
Appointment of the Major to visit the Banksthe two
Pollies
.
To my Old Friend.
Washington,
July
24, 1833.
Dear Sir
,The last letter I wrote to you
was on my way from Saratogue to
Washington
.
I got safe to the White House about
midnight, and the only crittur awake there
was Mr. Van Buren, who I found pretty busy
writing letters about a Convention he is arter.
He was dreadful glad to see me, for he said
the President didn't want him to leave before
I cum. He wanted to be off north himself.
He said the President was also getting a little
shaky about the Bank, jist because he found,
when he got to Washington, some of our folks
had taken in change some counterfeit `Safety
Fund' bills, and also other small bills that
won't go`why, darn it,' says I, `Mr Van
Buren, I am glad to hear that, case I've got
some real shaves myself in that way, and I
was plaguy fraid I was the only one;' and so
I out with my seal-skin wallet, and I showed
him a mess on'em. There was Green County
ColumbyMiddle DistrictBelchertown
WiscassetMonmouthTombugby
Franklin
Winthrop  Greenburgh  Hallowell
Passamaquoddyand the plague knows
what-all
;
and some on'em had Mr. Van Buren's
head on one eend. `Now,' says I, `who is to
stand this racket? for I won't, caze you told
us all afore we started on this frolic not to
have nothing to do with `Biddle's Bills,'so
I'll jist hand them over to the Treasury
Department
,
and let'em go with that mess of
`State Bank Paper' already thereit won't
make a mighty difference, and we need not
bother the Gineral about it.'
The next morning I saw the Gineral, and
we had a real shaking. He was dreadful
glad to see me. Says he, `Major, do you
know I'm stump'd about that'ere Bank arter
all!' (You see he is a rale business man; he
goes right at it off-hand, and when he gits one
thing in his head, he sticks to it till its out
and done with.) `We have been shav'd,
says he, `most infarnally, with some of them
'ere State Banks;' and with that, he out with
his wallet, and unrolled a mess on'em, sure
enuff. `Look here,' says he, `Major, here is
one made payable to me, and got my head on
one eend, and Mr. Van Buren's on tother (blast
their impudence), and they tell me it ain't
worth a copper; and there ain't one in all that
bundle I can get the hard dollars for without
losing a most half.'
`But,' says I, `Gineral, where is Mr. Van
Buren's safety valve?' `Safety valve,' says
the Gineral, `what's the use of a safety valve
when the boiler is bust, Major?' `Plaguy
little,' says I, `sure enuff; I didn't think of
that,' says I, `Gineral.' `That are Safety
Fund,' says the Gineral, `I'm afraid won't do,
Major, because you see it's all `hair of the
same dog,' arter all.' `Well now, Gineral,'
says I, `that's been my notion all along,
becase
if all the Banks bust, the Safety Fund
will jist be of the same kind of stuff, that will
bust too, unless in the mean while they change
it off for Biddle's Bills, and that would not be
fair to some body.' `Well, Major,' says the
Gineral, `you do know about as much about
most things as most folks, and as I said
before
,
I'm stump'd about that Bank of U. S.,
D 2
and I want you to help me figure it out. I want
you, Major,' says he, `to look into that matter.
If the Bank is good, and sound, and safe, we'll
stick to it; if it ain't, we'll blow it sky high.'
`What,' says I, `Gineral, do you want another
report?' `Not by a darn'd sight,' says he; `I
don't understand the reports, Major; and
that isn't all, I don't believe they do who make
themno,' says he, `Major, Mr. Van Buren
wants Amos Kendall to go and make report
about the State Banks, and their Safety Funds:
and I want you to go and look into Biddle's
Bank at the same time. I'll give you a letter
of authority; and when you come back we'll
talk the matter over together. You know,
Major, that I am not one of that'ere sort of
folks that says a thing is black to-day, because
I thought it was black yesterday. There was
a time when I thought I could hang all the
Yankees at Hartford under the 2d section,
but I don't think now it would be exactly
right; I am an honest man, Major, and ain't
afeard to change my opinion.'
Now this is the Gineral all over; and I am
off to-morrow to Philadelphia; and if I don't
give Mr. Biddle and his money-bags a stirring
up, I'm mistaken; there is no one thing I'm
so cute at, as looking through accounts. I
showed that once as clear as a whistle, when
I settled the first mackerel voyage of the
`Two Pollies,' Capt. Jumper. There were
nine owners, and three on'em found the
riggin
,
and the other six built the hull, and the
captain fitted her out, and was to get every
seventeenth fish for his share, extra, for his
services. Each one was to draw his share,
according to amount and sarvices. It was
all strait enuff, only some of the riggin was
taken from the `Amiable Mahitable,' belonging
to one of the three who found the riggin, part
of which was paid back by Capt. Jumper.
They puzzled at a settlement all winter; but
I saw thru'it in a minute, and made it all as
strait as a loon's leg. I showed the Gineral the
accounts one day, and I suppose that is the
reason why he wants me to look into the
Bank. I'll tell you more about it to rights.
Yours, from
J.
Downing
, Major,
Downingville Militia, 2d Brigade.
LETTER V.
Containing Major Downing's Official Report on the
United States Bank
.
Rip-Raps,
August 4th
, 1833.
Published By Authority.
Dear Sir
,I have just got here after
exssamin
in the Bank; and it was the toughest
job I ever had in my life. The Gineral was
so bent on my doing it that I had to `go
ahead
,'
or I'd sneak'd out the first day. I was
nigh upon a week about it, figerin and siferin
all the while. Mr. Biddle see quick enuff it
was no fool's journey I come on; and I made
some of his folks scratch their heads, I tell
you. I gin'em no notice of my comin, and
I jump'd right in the thickest on'em there one
day when they were tumblin in and shellin
out the money like corn`now,' says I, `my
boys, I advise all on ye to brush up your
multiplication
tables, for I am down upon you
with aligation, and the rule of 3, and vulgar
fractions; and if I find a penny out of place,
the Gineral shall know it. I'm no green horn
nor member of Congress, nor Judge Clayton,
nor Mr. Cambreleng neither,' says I. As soon
as Mr. Biddle read the letter the Gineral sent
by me, says he, `Major, I'm glad the Gineral
has sent some one at last that knows
something
,
and can give a strait account;' and with
that he call'd all the bank folks, and tell'd 'em
to bring their books together. `Now,' says
he, `Major, which eend shall we begin at
first?' `It makes no odds which,' says I;
`all I care about is to see if both eends meet;
and if they don't, Mr. Biddle,' says I, `its all
over with you and the Bankyou'll all go,
`hook and line: and then we off coats, and
went at it. I found some of them 'ere fellows
there plaguy sharp at siferin. They'd do a sum
by a kinder short Dilworth, quick as a flash.
I always use a slateit comes kinder natural
to me; and I chalk'd her off there the first
day, and figur'd out nigh upon 100 pretty
considerable
tuff sums. There was more than 3
cart load of books about us, and every one on
'em bigger than the Deacon's family Bible.
And such an etarnal batch of figerin I never
see, and there warn't a blot or a scratch
in
the hull on 'em.
I put a good many questions to Mr. Biddle,
for the Gineral gin me a long string on 'em;
and I thought some would stagger him; but
he answered them all just as glib as our boys
in Downingville do the catakize, from the
`chief eend of man' clean through the
petitions
.
And he did it all in a mighty civil way,
too; there was only one he kinder tried to git
round, and that washow he came to have
so few of the Gineral's folks among the
Dirictors
until very lately?`Why,' says he,
`Major, and Major,' says he (and then he got
up and took a pinch of snuff and offered me
one), says he, `Major, the Bank knows no
party; and in the first go off, you know, the
Gineral's friends were all above matters of so
little importance as Banks and Banking. If
we had put a branch in Downingville,' says
he, `the Gineral would not have had occasion
to ask such a question;' and with that he
made me a bow, and I went home and took
dinner with him. It is plaguy curious to hear
him talk about millions and thousands; and
I got as glib too at it as he is; and how on
earth I shall git back again to ninepences and
fourpence-happenies I can't tell.
After I had been figerin away there nigh
upon a week, and used up 4 or 5 slate pencils,
and spit my mouth as dry as a cob, rubbin out
the sums as fast as I did them, I writ to the
Gineral, and tell'd him it was no use; I could
find no mistake; but so long as the Bank was
at work, it was pretty much like counting a
flock of sheep in a fall day, when they are just
let into a new stubblefor it was all the while
crossing and mixing, and the only way was to
lock up all the Banks, and as fast as you count
'em, black their noses.
`Now,' says I one day to Squire Biddle,
`I'll just take a look at your money-bags, for
they tell the Gineral you han't got stuff enuff
in the Bank to make him a pair of spectacles;
none of your rags,' says I, `but the real grit:'
and with that he call'd 2 or 3 chaps in Quaker
coats, and they open'd a large place about as
big as the `east room;' and such a sight I
never seeboxes, bags, and kegs, all full, and
I should say nigh upon a hundred cord. Says
I, `Squire Biddle, what on earth is all this
for; I'm stump'd.'`O,' says he, `Major, that's
our Safety Fund.' `How you talk!' says I.
`Now,' says I, `is all that genwine!' `
Every
dollar of it,' says he; `will you count it,
Major?' says he. `Not to-day,' says I; `but
as the Gineral wants me to be particular, I'll
just hussle some on 'em;' and at it I went,
hammer and file. It raly did me good, for I
did not think there was so much rale chink in
all creation. So when I got tired, I set down
on a pile, and took out my wallet, and began
to count over some of the `Safety Fund' notes
I got shaved with on the grand tower. `Here,'
says I, `Squire Biddle, I have a small trifle I
should like to dicker with youits all `Safety
Fund, says I; `and Mr. Van Buren's head
is on most all on 'em.' But as soon as he put
his eye on 'em he shook his head. I see he
had his eye-teeth cut. `Well,' says I, `it's no
matter;'but it lifted my dander considerable.
`Now,' says I, `Mr. Biddle, I've got one more
question to put to you, and then I'm through.
You say your bills are better than hard
dollars
;
this puzzles me, and the Gineral too.
Now how is this?' `Well,' says he, `Major,
I'll tell you: suppose you have a bushel of
potatoes in Downingville, and you wanted to
send them to Washington, how much would
it cost you to get them there?' `Well,' says
I, `about two shillins lawfulfor I sent a
barrel
there to the Gineral last fall, and that cost
me a dollar freight.' `Well,' says he, `
suppose
I've got potatoes in Washington jist as
good as yours, and I take your potatoes in
Downingville, and give you an order to
receive
a bushel of potatoes in Washington,
wouldn't you save two shillings lawful by
that? We sometimes charge,' says he, `a
trifle for drafts when the places are distant,
but never as much as it would cost to carry
the dollars:' and with that we looked into the
accounts agin, and there it was. Says I,
`Squire Biddle, I see it now as clear as a
whistle.'
When I got back to Washington, I found
the Gineral off to the `Rip-Raps,' and I arter
him. One feller there tell'd me I couldn't go
to the `Rip-Raps'that the Gineral was there
to keep off business; but as soon as I tell'd
him who I was, he ordered a boat, and I
paddled
off.
The Gineral and I have talked over all the
Bank business; he says it is not best to
publish
my report, as he wants it for the message:
and it would only set them
Stock
-fish nibblin
agin in Wall-street. I made him stare when
I tell'd him about the dollars I saw there, and
E
once and awhile he would rinkle his face up
like a ball of ravlins; and when I tell'd him
Biddle wouldn't give me any of his `Safety
Fund' for any of Mr. Van Buren's that I had
with me, the Gineral took out his wallet, and
slung it more than 5 rods into the brakers.
We are now pretty busy, fitting and joining
the beams and rafters of the message; and if
Mr. Van Buren don't get back before we begin
to shingle it, I guess his `Safety Fund' will
stand but a poor chance.
The Gineral don't care much about having
his head for a sign-board; but says he, `
Major
,
when they put my head on one eend of a
Bank Bill, and Mr. Van Buren's on tother
eend, and `promise to pay Andrew Jackson,'
and then blow up, it's too badI won't allow
itit shan't be.' The Gineral says, if he
allows
Amos Kendle to make his report about
the State Banks, it is but fair to let me publish
mine about Squire Biddle's Bank. So I am
getting mine ready.
We have a fine cool time here, and ain't
bothered with Office Seekers; we can see'em
in droves all along shore, waitin for a chance.
One fellow swam off last night to get
appointed
to some officethe Gineral thinks of
making him minister to the King of the
Sandwich
Islands, on account of their being all
good swimmers there.
Yours, etarnally,
J.
Downing
, Major,
Downingville Militia, 2d Brigade.
LETTER VI.
TO AMOS KINDLE,
Somewhere North among Safety Fund Banks.
Rip-Raps,
7th August
, 1833.
To be printed by my old friend Mr. Dwight.
Dear Amos
,Not knowing where you be
exactly, I write you this letter through the
papers, for they go everywhere, and you'll
most likely git it that way soonest. The
Gineral
is in some trouble; for since you left
Washington, he and I have been looking into
the Law Books, and the Bank Charter, and
he says he thinks we shall be snag'd, if we
don't look out pretty sharp how we meddle
jist yet with our money in the U. S. Bank.
And ever since I have been tellin him about
my examination of Biddle's Bank, he don't
seem to feel so wrathy agin it. And he is
plaguy fraid if he takes away any of our money
from Biddle, we shall have to take away all
the 'counts too; and we have enuff now to
make us stagger. The Gineral would like
you to ask Biddle if he won't keep the 'counts,
and let us have the money. If he won't do
that, then he thinks you best do nothin, for on
lookin into the Treasury and batin that batch
of state paper there, that ain't worth nothin,
and seein that them blasted Frenchmen han't
paid that bill yet, and a good many things a
little singed by the fire last springwe han't
got quite as much cash as we thought on.
There is another thing too puzzles us
considerable
.
When the United States Bank was
chartered, it was agreed that seein it paid a
pretty considerable round sum for keepin our
money, we made'em also agree to do all our
business in the money wayreceive and pay,
and take resates for all the old sogers, and pay
the interest on the public debt, and so on; and
then we agreed to take their money in payment
of all debts comin to us. The Gineral thinks
he can't well git round this; and we have
looked through all the Law Books, and
regulations
of the army, and can't find nothin
there to help us. `So,' says he, `Major, we
shall be snag'd if we don't look out sharp;
for as soon as we put our 'counts in other
banks, that crittur Biddle won't let any thing
like a bank bill go out of his bank that we can
E 2
use where we want it. Now in York they'll
shell out New-Orleans, and St. Louis, and
Mobile branch notes to pay bonds with, and
away South we shall git Buffalo, and down
east branch paper, and we shall have to lug
them about ourselves to git the dollars for
them. And then,' says he, `arter all, Major,
we shall run the risk agin of gittin our
wallets
filled with some more of them Safety Fund
notes. I don't like the looks of it at allI
wish,' says he, `Amos was back agin in
Washington
,
and let Congress do with the Bank as
it pleases. I won't be pestered with it any
more, by the Eternal!' says he, (and he was
ony just beginnin to thunder), when I, just to
turn the cloud, tell'd him Calhoun was in
Georgia. And then I tell'd him I would write
to you, and tell you to come home. The
Gineral says you may go to Saratogue, and
talk over matters with Mr. Van Buren, and as
he got us into the scrape, tell him to git us
out of it as well as he can; but you must all
on you be in Washington pretty soon, for its
gittin kinder windy down here. Take care
how you write and talk to some of the Banks
in York; them fellers have got their eye-teeth
cut, and know plaguy nigh as well as we do
about most things.
The Gineral thinks that was a pretty
considerable
of a cute move in Mr. Van Buren,
sending Isaac Hill along with Cass. He stuck
to him like a lamper eel till he got to Buffalo,
and then unhooked. I'll write to you agin in
a few days. Yours,
J.
Downing
, Major,
Downingville Militia, 2d Brigade.
LETTER VII.
Major Downing manges the Official Correspondence
of the President A simple GovernmentPeleg
Bissel's Churn
.
Rip-Raps,
17
th August
, 1833.
My Good Friend
,`
The Government
,
will leave here on Saturday, so you must tell
all our friends to stop sending any more letters
here. We go strait to Washington, to put
things to rights there for winter.
I and the Gineral have got things now pretty
considerable snug; and it is raly curious to
see how much more easy and simple all the
public affairs go on, than they did a spell ago,
when Mr. Adams was President. If it warnt
for Congress meetin, we cou'd jest go about
pretty much where we pleas'd, and keep
things strait too; and I begin to think now,
with the Gineral, that arter all, there is no
great shakes in managin the affairs of the
nation. We have pretty much all on us ben
joggin about now since last grass, and things
are jest as strait and clear now, as they was
then. The Gineral has nigh upon made up
his mind, that there is no use to have any
more Congress. They only bother usthey
wou'd do more good to stay at home, and
write letters to us tellin what is goin on
among 'em at home. It would save a
considerable
sum of money too; and I'm also
sartain that there is a plaguy raft of fellows
on wages that don't earn nothin. Howsever,
we are goin on makin things more simple
every day; and we once and a while nock
off a pretty considerable number of
cogg-wheels
and trunnel-heads.
The Gineral says he likes things simple as a
mouse-trap. But what I like most is, he won't
have no one about him who outranks me; so
there is me, and Major Barry, and Major
Smith, and Major Earl, and Major Donaldson,
and Major Lewis, and Major Eatonand
Major Blair, a pretty considerable of a man
to do the printing, and tell the folks where
we be, and once and a while where the land
sales and contracts be too. There is enuff on
us to do all that's wanted. Every day, jest
after breakfast, the Gineral lights his pipe,
and begins to think pretty hard, and I and
Major Donaldson begin to open letters for
him; and there is more than three bushels
every day, and all the while coming. We
don't git through more than a bushel a day;
and never trouble long ones, unless they
come from Mr. Van Buren, or Mr. Kindle, or
some other of our great folks. Then we sort
'em out, jest as Zekil Bigelow does the
mackerel at his packin-yard, for tho' there are
plaguy many more sorts than he finds among
fish, we only make three sorts, and keep 3
big baskets, one marked `
not red
,' another
`red, and worth nothin,' and another `red,
and to be answered.' And then all the
Gineral
has to do, is to say, `Major, I reckon we
best say so and so to that,' and I say `jest so,'
or not, jest as the notion takes meand then
we go at it.
We keep all the Secretaries, and the Vice
President, and some District Attornys, and a
good many more of our folks, and Amos
Kindle, moving about; and they tell us jest
how the cat jumps. And, as I said afore,
if it warnt for Congress meetin once a year,
we'd put the Government in a one horse
waggon
,
and go jest where we liked.
The Gineral was amazingly tickled tother
day. Peleg Bissel(you know Peleg, who is
all the while whitlin, and sawin, and makin
clocks and apple-parers, and churns, and lives
nigh Seth Sprague's school-house, down to
Downingville), well, Peleg sent the Gineral a
new churn of his own invention; and he
calls it the `Jackson Churn,'he wants a
patent for it. The cute crittur says, in his
letter to the Gineral, that that 'ere churn is
jest like his Governmentit's only got one
wheeland a smasherand that it will make
more butter than any other churn, and out of
eny most anything. The Gineral is so
tickled with it, he will set and turn it nearly
all day. Says he, `Major, I like this 'ere
churn amazingly; that Bissel is a knowin
fellow
.
If that churn had been made by
Congress
,
it would have more than 50 wheels and
springs, and make no more butter arter all.
Major,' says he, `tell Peleg I thank him, and
send him a patent.'
And so I did; and I tell'd him in the letter,
that the Gineral would keep his churn in the
hall of the White House, to let folks see that
it didn't require as many cog-wheels to make
butter as they think on, and then when they
come up chamber, in the Cabinet-room, and
find only me and the President, they'll
understand
it the better. When the Gineral come
to sign this letter`Well,' says he, `Major
that's jest what I was thinking on.' We get
every day an everlastin bach of letters from
Mr. Van Buren and Amos Kindle, and they
are so plaguy jagged, that we can't make 'em
fit exactly with some others, eny most as
jagged, from the South and West, and all
from our folks too. One wants one thing,
and one wants tother. Some of our folks
down South say, if the Bank is put down, we
shall all be split up into splinters there. And
jest so, only tother way, they say, we shan't
find in a week any of our folks North, if the
Bank is rechartered, and some talk of the
nullifiers in Georgia goin for Mr. Van Buren,
and that we must look out sharp, and not do
nothing agin 'em. And some say that 'ere
tower of Mr. Webster away west, and his
speeches, bother some on 'em plagily. I was
a little stumped for a spell myself; and I
tell'd the Gineral, says I, `Gineral, if you
expect me to satisfy all these folks, you're
mistaken; we can't do it,' says I. `Well,
then,' says he, `we must send for Mr. Van
Buren.' This kinder nettled me, and says I,
`Gineral, you han't forgot that 'ere churn
already.' `No, no,' says he, `we'll stick to
that, Major.' `Well, then,' says I, `do you
think that Mr. Van Buren will use that 'ere
churn?he keeps his bread buttered,' says I
`by more wheels than that 'ere churn's got.
`Well, Major,' says the Gineral, `he is a plaguy
curious crittur, arter allhe'll make wheels
turn sometimes right agin one another, yet
he gits alongand when he lets his slice fall,
or some one nocks it out of his hand, it
always, some how, falls butter side up.'
`Well,' says I, `Gineral, don't you know
why?' `Not exactly,' says he, `Major.' `Well,'
says I, `I'll tell youhe butters both sides at
once,' says I. The Gineral drew his face all
into a rumple for about a minet, and then he
snorted right out.
The Gineral talks of goin to the Hermitage
next springhe says he thinks he has done
enuff for the countryand I think so toohe
says I may go along with him, or stay and
lend Mr. Van Buren a handwe'll say
something
about this in the Message, perhaps.
Yours as before,
J.
Downing
, Major,
Downingville Militia, 2d Brigade.
F
DOWNINGVILLE POLITICS.
To Major Downing, of Downingville, now at Washingtonor
somewhere else.
Dear Major
,I am desperately put out to
hear you're going to be PresidentI should'nt
have tho't it of you; but there's no tellin
what one may be left to do.
I used to be well acquainted with your
folks when you was a youngster; and your
poor father, that's dead and gone, was
dreadful
sober about you at times. Says he to me
one day, `Captain, you're an obsarving sort
of man, and seen a good deal of the world up
to Boston and thereabouts. I want your
opinion consarning our Jack, and what we'd
best put him to for a livelyhood: he ain't over
fond of work that's likely to take up much
time, but's always willing to do his shear at
a raising, or such like, and his fancy don't
lead him to larning or the like of that. What
think I'd best do with him?' `Wal,' says I,
`Deacon, if you really want my candid
opinion
and advice, I'm ready to give it. I've all
along tho't Jack a pooty smartish sort of a
chap, and if you could get him into Lawyer
Josslin's office a while, he'd be equal to a most
any thingand mark my words, Deacon,'
says I, `he'll
rise
in the world before he dies.'
`I believe you're half right, Captain,' says the
Deacon, your father, `but I'm pesky fraid
he'll rise a leetle sooner than he'd like to, for
that 'ere Josslin is a raal peeler in the way of
bringin folks up!' Twant six months arter
that, before I heard of your settin up law for
yourself, and havin a good deal of one thing
and another to do, which taint worth a while
to mention: and when they talked of makin
you Governor, down in Maine, your poor aunt
Nabby was wrathy enough`Well, there,'
says she, `I never thought to live to see
this
day! our family,' says she, `if it wan't so
dreadful rich, ollers bore a good character,
and could hold up their heads and show their
faces anywhere and to anybody, without their
being able to say one word against usand
now to have one of us put up for a Governor
without ever having done any thing to be
ashamed of, is
too bad!
and it all comes of
your advice, Captain Jumper, for advising
my brother, the Deacon, to put him into
Lawyer Josslin's plaguy office. We never
know'd what it was to be ashamed of any of
our relations before.' `Miss Nabby,' says I,
`keep cool, and don't get yourself into such a
flurry, for it's more than an even chance,
they don't convict him of being a Governor,
and if he escapes this time, I'll smuggle him
out of the state in the two Pollies, and let
him try his luck on to Washington long with
Gineral Jackson, who knows me, and I'll
give him a recommend to the Gineral, and
who knows but he may yet come to
something
?'
That sort of pacified your aunt, and
accordingly I got you out of Maine on board
the two Pollies, as I was saying, and didn't
charge you nothing for your passage, and
let you have the privilege of stubshodding the
boards, and pumping besides, and never
charged a cent for that neither. All these
circumstances considered, I hope you won't
think hard of me if I do say, that arter
what's been done for you by night and by
dayits ongrateful in you to throw yourself
away by turning President. But it isn't too
late to repent. Tell them Mowchonk folks
you're not the man they take you for, if
they think to coax you into being President
as long as the Gineral's alive, and I hope he'll
live for ever.
Yours to sarve,
Solomon Jumper
,
Captain of the Two Pollies of Downingville.
F 2
LETTER VIII.
The Gineral's regard for the YankeesOffice-seekers
New Presidential Recreations
.
To Mr. DwightNew-York Daily Advertiser.
Washington,
August
30, 1833.
My good old Friend
,Ever since we got
`the Goverment' back here from the Rip-Raps,
we have been as busy as if we was all on us
cocking hay jest afore a shower.
I tell'd you some time ago that I and the
Gineral was fittin and jointin the beams and
rafters of the message; but almost every day
some plaguy new notion comes in from Mr.
Van Buren, and some other of our folks, and
we have to chizzle new mortices, and run new
braces and string pieces; so that I begin to
think it will look curious enuff when it's done.
The Gineral says he don't care how it fronts,
only he is detarmined to show a sharp corner
to the Nullifiers. We shall have a good deal
to say about the
Grand Tower;
there is
nothin
since the 8th of January at New-Orleans
tickles the Gineral half so much. Every time
we talk about it, the Gineral gits right up, and
says he, `Major, I only wish I was 50 years
younger, and then,' says he, `give me the
Yankees east of Horse Neck, and I'd like no
better sport than to have nullification all over
the rest of creation.'
When things don't go right, and the
Gineral
gits a little wrathy, if I only tell him the
Yankees are ready to back him, he is as firm
as granit. It would make you crawl all over
to read that letter we writ to France, when we
come to hear that the King there kinder
shuffled
round that bill we drawed on him. `He
won't pay it, won't he?' says he`Major,
what do you think of that?' `Why,' says I,
`Gineral, I think it's a nasty mean actionand
a darnation rascally one too,' says I. `Well,'
says he, `that's enuff,'and then we writ the
letter,its just like Zekel Bigelow's speech
it cuts, shaves, and makes the hair flyand if
it don't bring the money, I'm mistaken.'
If Mr. Livingston had stay'd one week
longer in York, the Gineral was for sendin
me right out, and Captain Jumper was jest
gettin the `Two Pollies' ready to take me.
The most curious part of `the
Goverment'
here is to manage the office-seekers.
You see, things ain't now as they was afore
Mr. Van Buren's time; then it was kinder
divided round among the Departments.
The Post Master Gineral appinted all the
Post Masters, and their folks. The Secretary
of the Treasury appinted all the folks in the
Custom Houses, and all the folks who collected
money. These two had an everlastin batch
of fellers to appint, and made them feel pretty
considerable big, and then the War Secretary
had a good slice in appinting the cadets, and
Ingen agents, and all the contracts was kinder
sifted round among the Departments; and so
by the time a new President was to be made,
some of these Secretaries was a leetle bigger
than the President himself. Now this is the
way they kinder jockied Mr. Adams, who got
to be the smallest man at Washington, by
letting
other folks plant his corn, and do his
huskin; and afore he know'd it, his own field
was all in weedsand theirs, well-howed,
rich and clean as a whistle.
But things ain't so now; we've got only one
crib, and that's a whappin one too, and ony
one door to it; and when we shell out our
corn, we take good care and know well who
gets it, and where he is goin to plant it; and
that ain't allwe make 'em agree about the
Huskin Frolic
,
[1]
[1]
The Major, we presume, means the Elections, or Hustings,
by this metaphor.
for that's the best on't, arter
all.
The longer I am in `the Goverment,' the
more I larn. But I must allow, that of all the
inventions I've hearn on of Mr. Van Buren's,
this is about the slickest.
There is only one thing wantin, and that he
is tryin for pretty hardand that is the Bank.
If he can only git that in the crib too, Virginny
fences wouldn't stop our cattle.
Only think what an everlastin raft of fellows
we should haveall the Presidents, and
Cashiers
,
and Clarks, and Money Counters, about
the crib, from Downingville to New-Orleans!
and that ain't the best on't; we would have
a branch alongside every post office to keep
our postages safe.
I should like this well enuff if I was sartin
I and the Gineral and Mr. Van Buren was to
be here all the while, to keep a good look out
on the crib door. But the Gineral talks of
goin hum to put the Hermitage to rights;
and I am in the notion that Congress is a
leetle too strong for `the goverment,' when
the Gineral ain't in itand I shall go with
him. I am eny most fag'd out myself; and
I begin to think with the Gineral I have done
enuff for the country.
We are lookin for Amos Kindle now every
hour. He writ the Gineral t'other day, and
tell'd him my `Bank Report' warn't true, and
that I must have got a loan of Squire Biddle.
Now that is jest the way with some folks.
What they don't know they guess at; and
it's jest so with old Miss Crane, who keeps the
tavern this side Downingvillejest as sure as
any one goes by without stoppin, the old crittur
says, `there goes so and so, and has got no
money too; and he knows I wouldn't trust
him.'
Howsumever, no one can make the Gineral
wrathy with me. He knows I am the best
friend about him; whenever they get things
in any kind of a twist, or a snarl, says he,
`Major, do you unravel that. I'm the big
wheel, and you are the smasher,' says he;
and then we jest give Peleg Bissel's churn a
turn or two, and all is right.
You don't print my letters rightyou git
some words wrong, and spell 'em most
infarnally
.
Jest so the printers sarved the
Gineral's
letters too; and folks thought he didn't
know nothin, till we got to Cambridge, where
they made a doctor on him.
Your Friend,
J.
Downing
, Major,
Downingville Militia, 2d Brigade.
From the New-York Daily Advertiser of Sept. 7th, 1833.
By a letter received yesterday, and which we publish in this
morning's paper, from Maj. Downing, our readers will observe that
this distinguished individual may be expected here immediately.
We are not yet informed at what house he will put up at during
his stay. His friend Zekel Bigelow, of Downingville, we
understand
is here, and has received directions from the Major
regarding his apartments, which should be fitted up in splendid
style. We hope his apartments, wherever they may be, will be
easy of access, as the whole city (with certain exceptions) would
be pleased to pay its respects to himbut we presume he will
be as busy while he is here (to use his own language) as if he
was cocking hay jest afore a shower.
Ed.
LETTER IX.
The Major gives Notice of his Journey to Philadelphia
and New-York, to find out where all the Money has
gone
.
Washington,
Sept.
5, 1833.
My good old friend
,Since I wrote to
you last week, we have seen so much said in
the papers about money being so scarce in
York, and other places north,some saying
it is all owing to 'Squire Biddle, and some to
Amos Kindle, and some to me and `the
Goverment'
that
the Gineral wants me to go
right off and look into it, and put it to rights;
for the Gineral says if there is any ailing in
money in one place, it will spread jest like the
Colera Morbus, and if it gets to Washington,
we shall be in a bad way, for nigh upon all
on 'em here can't stand much of a squeeze.
The Gineral says he don't want to have any
thing secret about it, and that I must write to
him through the papers, for then all our folks
can read it at once, and won't pester him
about it.
I start to-morrow mornin afore day light.
I'll stop a day or so in Philadelphy, and see
how things go on there, and then look into
York. If I can only get a fair talk with some
of them 'ere folks in Wall-street, I'll get to the
bottom of it in a minit.
I know there is money enuff somewhere
folks don't eat itand what the Gineral wants
me to find out is, where the money is, and
what on earth is the reason folks can't get it
when they want it.
Your Friend,
J.
Downing
, Major,
Downingville Militia, 2d Brigade.
G
LETTER X.
To Mr. DwightEditor of the York Daily Advertiser.
Philadelphy,
11
th Sept.
1833.
My good old friend
,I send you a letter
I writ to the Gineral last nighthe told me
to write to him threw the papers. Some of
the printers here wanted me to give them the
printin on 'em, but if I let any body but you
print 'em first, folks can't tell which is
genwine
some
fellows write so much like me,
that I am stump'd sometimes myself, and put
to't as bad as Captain Jumper, of the Two
Pollies, and President of the Downingville
Bank, was a spell ago, when a fellow bro't him
a note on his Bank; some said it was `
genwine
,'
and some said it warn't. It was so
slick a kounterfit the Captain didn't know
himself`so,' says he, `it looks a leetle like a
kounterfit, and then agin it don'tand my
notion
is, it's about midlin.'
[2]
[2]
Captain Jumper is a non committal Van Buren man.
The letter I now send you to print don't
amount to nothin. I want to git to York
first, and will go there to-morrow or next
day, and arter that I'll tell the Gineral and all
our folks all about it. If you see Zekel
Bigelow
,
tell him not to go home till I come on; I
want to see him dreadfully.
Your friend,
J.
Downing
, Major,
Downingville Militia, 2d Brigade.
Major Downing's Letter to the President, describing
his Visit to the United States Bank
.
To Gineral Jackson.
Philadelphy,
10
th Sept.
, 1833.
Dear Gineral
,I had eny most as much
trouble in gittin here as I had when I come
on with `the Goverment' a spell ago; but I
tell'd the folks I had no time now to lose, and
couldn't talk politics; and that I was on argent
business. They all wanted to know how you
was; and I tell'd 'em you was as hard as
granit, and no rot about you.
As soon as I got here, I took a look into
Squire Biddle's Bank agin, and found every
thing there pretty much as I left 'em when I
was there afore. If any thing, he's got a
little more of the rale chink. Squire Biddle
was glad to see me, and was plaguy
good-natured
.
He said he was sorry that `the
Goverment'
continued to feel kinder wrathy
agin the Bank; `but,' says he, `Major, we
are ready for them.' Jest then our old
Quaker
friend come inthe same old gentleman,
you remember, who came to see us one
mornin
,
and call'd you `friend Andrew,' and kept
his hat on all the while. He was as spunky as
thunder; and when a Quaker gits his dander
up, it's like a norwester. He said he was sore
troubled, and that he was afraid that evil
disposed
folks were busy, and tryin to inger you.
He said he had been in trade over 40 years,
and knew all about it, and Banks too; and
that jest so sure as his friend Andrew didn't
put a stop to this war agin the United States
Bank, it would bring more injury on the
country than universal nullification. I tell'd
him that you didn't want to injure nobody
that all you wanted was to git hold of the
right eend of every thing, and then hold on
like a snappin turtle. And then we sat down,
and he talk'd for more than three hours, and
till he couldn't talk no more. He is a rale
friend of ourn; and the last thing he said was,
he hoped you wouldn't let any one deceive
you about the Bank, for though the change
might give a few persons some cream, all the
rest would git nothin but skim milk and bonny
clabber. I am glad I met him, for he telled
me more than I had any ide on; and the
more I see, the more sartin I am that Banks
and Trade and money matters are pretty
considerable
ticklish things; and when you think
a thing must be jest so, it comes out jest tother
way.
Squire Biddle don't look streaked at all
when I talk to him about our takin our money
away from him. He says he don't care a
button
whether we take it away or not. And
upon the whole, the Bank could do better
without our custom than with it. He don't
say nothin agin nobody; but he is gittin to be
pretty saucy about it, I tell you. And well he
may be; and if he warn't a good-natur'd
crittur
,
he would be crabbed and crooked enuff by
this time, for we have been poundin on him
now nigh upon three years. He says as long
as he sees a black cloud risin, he don't think
it safe to make more sail; and it's his
business
to keep as much sail on his ship as he
can without splitten 'em.
Every body I see here says, that Amos
Kindle's
journey this summer was nigh about as
bad as the Colera Morbus last summer; and
G 2
on the whole, they don't know which is worst.
You know I tell'd you as much afore he
started; and the last thing Zekel Bigelow
said to me, when we was in Downingville
says he, `Major, don't you advise the Gineral
to meddle with that Bank affair. I see
trouble
in it,' says he; and Zekel is no fool, I tell
you. And Captain Jumper said, too, he would
jest about as soon think of runnin the Two
Pollies threw Nantucket Shoals at midnight,
without a lead. All these things, and my own
notion too, made me look into it pretty sharp,
to say nothin about them plaguy Safety Fund
notes that got into our wallets, and stick there
yet. The more I see here, the more sartin I
am that I've got a right notion on't. There
is money enuff here; but it is pretty much as
I hearn tell on in the old warthe folks keep
it stow'd away so long as there is trouble
brewin. But I won't say more about it now,
till I get to York, where they say they are
worse off. I have been busy enuff ever since
I've been here; and they tell me things are
gittin a little more easy, on account of my
tellin 'em that you won't do nothin afore I git
back agin.
I have met only a few here who think it
would be best to have a new Bank, and nock
this one down. But when I come to corner
'em about it, it turns out pretty much like a
pesky squabble we had once in Downingville
about the School Houseone said it warn't
big enuffand Ezra Gleason, a squint-ey'd
fellow, said it ought to be a round one, and
Seth Sprague ought to set right in the middle
on't. But Zekel Bigelow made a speech about
itand the Deacon was moderator:and
says he, `we've got a school house, and a good
stun one tooif it ain't big enuff, we'll nock
one eend out on't, and make it bigger. What
do you mean by nockin on't all to bitsjest
to git more money out of the district? Can
you put a better ruff on't than it's got now?
can you build better walls?and who wants
a round one, with the master's seat in the
middle on't? You know, Mr. Moderator, that
Seth don't squint; and no one can manage a
round house unless he does; and so we must
nock down our good old solid School House,
jest to give new jobs, and build a round one
to suit a man who can't look another strait in
the face.' Zekel carried the day as slick as a
whistle; and the old School House stands yet
big enuff, and strong enuff, and square as a
brick.
I'll write to you agin as soon as I git to
York. I send you by the transportation line
a tub of rale sweet butter, made on purpose
for you, by ; the address is nailed on
inside
the kiver. Tell Major Donaldson, when
he writes the answer to it, not to say nothin
agin the Bank, for every body here, and all the
butter makers, won't take home with them
from market nothin but Biddle's Bills; for
they all say they are better than hard dollars.
Your best friend,
J.
Downing
, Major,
Downingville Militia, 2d Brigade.
LETTER XI.
Major Downing's Official Correspondence with
The Government
.
To Gineral Jackson.
New-York,
Sept. 20th
, 1833.
From the Daily Advertiser of 21st September, 1833.
Dear Gineral
,When I wrote to you
from Philadelphy on 10th, I thought I would
go next day to York; but I got a letter from
our old friend Zekel Bigelow, lettin me know
he was there, and snookin about the Banks,
and among the Brokers in Wall-street, and
that by the time I come here, he could tell me
pretty much all about it in a minit. He said
the whole business was in a nut shell, and
he'd crack it. So I didn't hurry on, but kept
myself busy in Philadelphy, putting things
to rights there; for I thought if I could git
the mud out of the spring, we should have
clear water arterwards. I didn't get here till
yesterday. The folks wanted me to land at
Castle Garden, but I thought I wouldn't,
seeing
that them'ere string pieces came so nigh
puttin an cend to `The Goverment' a spell
ago.
The first man I met in the crowd was
Zekel
.
He was waitin for me, and he looked as
natural as ever. The crowd was so great, I
was eny most mashed to a slab. All on'em
callin out, `there's the Major'and all wantin
to shake hands with me, and to know how
you was, and what was goin to be done with
the Bank. Some fellers had ony one shoe
on, and eny most no shirtand they too
wanted to know about the Bank. I never see
sich a mess of fellers as they have here all the
while: there is all kind of critters, jamming
and scrouging folks, and one another; they
don't seem to do nothin, and half on'em think,
when we come to nock the Bank down, they
are to git the mony.
Zekel and I went as soon as we could git
through'em, straight to the tavern where we
all on us put up a spell ago; and then says I,
`Zekel, we must spring to it, and let the
Gineral
know, as soon as we can, all about mony
matters here.'
`Well,' says he, `Major, I'll tell you pretty
much all about it; and its jest as true now as
the sun.' And with that he slick'd his hair
down from his eye-brows clean to the eend of
his kew, and went at it.
Zekel has got a curious notion of tellin a
thinghe begins away back to
a b abb's
, and
then he comes up along, and ev'ry once and a
while he gives his head and hair a slicken
down, and he is so earnest, and looks as if he
could see right through an inch plank. I
couldn't tell you one half he said, if I was to
write a week about it. I'll only tell you a
little here and therehe says there is two
kinds of mony; hard mony and paper mony.
One is always good; and the other is
sometimes
good, and then agin it ain't good for
nothin.
He says, there is jist about so much hard
mony all the whileand it keeps goin round
and round, all about creation; and they git the
most on't who are the most industrious and
cute in inventin things. He says that paper
mony is jest as good, and a leetle better than
hard mony, if folks don't shell out too much
on't: and the natur of paper-mony makers is
always to git off as much as they can, and if it
warn't for somethin to check it, it would be as
bad as old continental times.
He says, there is two ways to make mony
scarceone is by sendin hard mony away
out of the country, to pay for notions we can't
pay for any other way; and the other is, by
sending Amos Kindle round tellin folks `The
Goverment' is goin to do something, folks
don't know exactly what, nor he nuther.
Then ev'ry body grabs all he can git, and
holds on; and things are jest as bad as if there
wasn't `no money:' and then the Brokers go
at it, and lather and shavesays they, `can
only give you a little'`hard times'the
fellows
figer interest for an hour as easy as
nothin
,
and jest so with the pottecarysonly tell
the folks Kolery is comin, and they go at it
mixin Paragoric and Kamfire; and chalk it up
like gold dust.
Zekel says on the hull, that mony matters
and Banks, and trade, is all as curious as one
of Bissel's clocks; and folks hadn't ought to
meddle in regelatin or alterin on't, without
knowin all about it. `And now,' says he,
`Major, I'm a good mine to spile my watch,
to show you my notion why I think trouble
will come if the Gineral nocks down the U.S.
Bank.'
Zekel is one of them'ere folks, and always
was, who would spile a horn, or make a
spoon; and with that he out with his old
watch, as big as a tea cup, wound her up, and
then clapt her to my ear. `She is as true,'
says he, `as the tides.' He then opened it
`Now', says he, `Major, do you see that 'ere
chain pullin all the while? and then do you
see a lot of little wheels, and springs, and
screws? And here on top is a big wheel,
that's all the while goin round one way, and
back agin, and jest so fast and no faster,
that's the clicker,' says he, `and if it warn't for
that, you'd see trouble in it, and I'll show you
but I know it will all go to bitsand so he
twitched out the big wheel, and the old watch
did whiz, I tell you. Some of them leetle
wheels went so fast, you couldn't see nothin.
One keel'd up, and another got sum teeth
nock'd outshe stopp'd a spell, then a spring
snapp'd, and whiz it went agin, and the
splinters
flew, and by-and-by it all stop'd; and
Zekel gin his kew another slickinand says
he, `Major, we've spoil'd the old watch; but
I don't value the loss on't, seein you got a
notion
by it'and with that he scraped it all
together
,
and wrapp'd it up in the Washington
Globe`there,' says he, `Major, send that to
`The Government,' and tell the Gineral there
H
is more there than folks think on, who want
to meddle with Banks and mony matters;
and to-morrow we'll go into Wall-street, and
you'll see all I tell'd you is jest so'and then
we took a glass of switchel and went to bed.
Your best friend,
J.
Downing
, Major,
Downingville Militia, 2d Brigade.
LETTER XII.
[Zekel Bigelow called on us yesterday, and handed us the
following letter from Major Downing. He says the Major has
gone back to Washington like a streak of lightning; and had not
time to apologize to the Honourable the Corporation, and other
public bodies, who by their respective Committees had waited
on him, and were desirous of showing him the usual
civilities
extended to distinguished individuals. Zekel says, he
`never see any one so completely in a rumple as the Major
was;' he read the Gineral's letter over two or three times,
backwards, and forwards, and crosswise, before he said a word;
and then he began to mumble the names of some of the
Government
,
and turned as blue as an indigo bag, till he let it
out.
Eds.
]
Major Downing leaves New-York like a streakZekel
Bigelow turning Broker
.
American Hotel, New-York
,
2d Sept.
, 1833.
My Good Old Friend
,I'm stumped. I
jest got a letter from the Gineral, and until I
got that letter I thought all the stories about
the Bank was jest got up by the opposition
folks, to hurt the Gineral and Mr. Van Buren,
and Zekel Bigelow thought so too. But the
Gineral's letter tells me pretty much all about
it, and a leetle more too. As soon as I read
it to Zekel, `Well,' says he, `Major, my notion
is, there is some plaguy foul birds in
Washington
,
and if some 'on em hain't siled their own
neests, I'm mistaken.'
The Gineral says he wants me to come
right on, for tho' the folks about him say, all
works well, he's afraid they'll git him in a
tangleconsarn 'em, I don't know what on
earth has got in 'em, and the Gineral too, jest
so sure as I quit him he gits in trouble. I
must go right back to Washington and try
and put things strait if I can, but I'm afraid
they'll git the Government in a plaguy snarl
afore I git there. I was a leetle afraid on't
when I left, and I telled the Gineral as much,
but he said he'd do nothin till I got back, and
I telled all the folks so in Philadelphy, and
here too, and things was lookin bright agin,
and now here's troublenigh upon half of the
message has got to be pulled all to bits. I
shall git my dander up if they don't look out
sharp, and if I do, some on'em better streak
it, I tell you, and that too afore Congress meets.
Zekel Bigelow says, `it's an ill wind that
blows nowhere,' and seein that the
Goverment
is goin to try to break the Bank, he's
goin to turn broker in Wall-street; he says
there will be no better business stirrin, for
then folks will have to pay a trifle for eny
most every draft that's drawn, and not git their
business done for nothin as they do now.
If he does turn broker, you'll hear more on
him; for he's a peeler, I tell you.
If I hadn't promised the Gineral to stick to
him threw thick and thin, I'd go right home
to Downingville, and have nothin more to do
with the Government; but if I quit him now,
the Government will go all to smash, jest as
sure as I am in haste and wrath,
Your Friend,
J.
Downing
, Major,
Downingville Militia, 2d Brigade.
H 2
LETTER XIII.
[We are much gratified in having it in our power to give our
readers another letter from our faithful friend, Major Downing.
It is peculiarly interesting to hear from him at the present time,
when the Globe maintains such a silence respecting recent
events at Washington. Indeed, if it were not for the Major, the
public would know nothing of what is going on inside the
cabinet
.
His communications are invaluable, because they may be
implicitly relied upon. Every body will believe the man who
sleeps in the same bed with `
the Gineral
.']
Major Downing's Call on `Squire Biddle'The
importance
of CongressThe Major arrives at
Washington
Wakes
the President to talk with him of
Raccoons and Skunks
.
To my good old friend, Mr. Dwight, of the Daily Advertiser.
Washington,
23d
Sept.
, 1833.
I sent a letter to you by Zekel Bigelow, jest
afore I left New-York; and I was off as soon
as they got the steam up. When I got to
Philadelphy, I only had time to take a run
round, to see Squire Biddle a minit, and I
found him pretty busy, but as good-natured
as ever. `Well,' says he, `Major, the Gineral
has opened his battery, but I'm afraid he'll
kill as many friends as enemies.' `Well,'
says I, `that's no matter, he's got enuff on
'em.' `But,' says he, `Major, I thought you
told us he'd do nothin till you got back agin.'
This kinder corner'd me, and made me a
little wrathyand so, says I, `Squire, I would
like to know what you mean to do about it?'
And so I thought this would kinder corner
him`Oh,' says he, `Major, I'll tell you,' and
with that he turned round and picked up a
bundle of letters he was jest goin to send off
to the Branches, and he read some on 'em;
and they was all pretty much alike, tellin his
folks to do all they could in relieving the
money-market, and not let people suffer, and
jest to carry as much sail as they could
without
splittin 'em, for now as the storm had
come on, they could tell more about it than
when it was only rumblin and lightenin.
`Well,' says I, `this is a curious piece of
business. The Gineral won't like this,' says
I; `and I would like to know your notion.'
`Why,' says he, `Major, we hope the people
will decide against him, when Congress
meets.' `What,' says I, `do you call Congress
`
the people?
' How you talk,' says I, `and
if that is your notion of the Goverment,
then,' says I, `Squire, you are a bigger fool
than I took you for. Why,' says I, `I and
the Gineral don't care no more for Congress,
than we do for the Ingins.' `Well then,' says
he, `there is the Cabinetperhaps they will
have somethin to say about it.' `Well,' says
I, `that's worse yet: what has the Cabinet got
to do with it?do you think we are goin to
appoint folks to tell us what to do? No, no,'
says I, `Squire, you know a good deal, but
you don't know nothin about the Goverment
yet. The Gineral didn't fight that
New-Orleans
battle for nothin,' says I; `and when
the people made him President, they knew
he was the most knowin man goin; and ever
since I've been with him, they are more and
more sartain nothing more is wantin, unless
it is Mr. Van Buren to cut in when we give
out, and go to the Hermitage.' And with that
I streaked it to Washington.
It was nigh upon midnight when I got to
the White House, and the Gineral was abed;
and as I knew he wanted to see me dreadfully,
I went right into his room and woke him up.
`Why,' says he, `Major, is that raly you?
for I've been dreamin about you. I'm glad
you are back agin, for things are gittin pretty
stormy here; so do you come to bed, and
we'll talk about it.' As soon as I got
alongside
the Gineral`There now,' says he,
`Major, I don't care for all the rest of the
Goverment, except Mr. Van Buren; and if
we three ain't a match for all creation, I'm
mistaken.' Says he, `Major, hain't you seen
my Proclamation agin Biddle?' `Yes,' says
I, `I saw it at Baltimore.' `Well,' says he,
`what do you think of it?' `Why,' says I,
`Gineral, I've been thinkin a good deal about
it; and I'm thinkin about it all the while.'
`Major,' says he, `that Proclamation agin
Biddle will kill him and the Bank as dead as
that one agin the Nullifiers killed Calhoun
and his party. There is nothin,' says he,
`like a Proclamation. And I have been
thinkin,' says he, `Major, to git you to write
one too, for there is a good many things yet
I didn't say nothin about. I want you to
read over Mr. Van Buren's late letters, and
you'll find a good many things wants attendin
to. We have killed Calhoun and Biddle; but
there is a raft of fellows to put down yet,
such as Webster, and McDuffy, and Clay, and
Binny, and Everett, and Sargent, and Burgess,
and a hundred others; and as the most on
'em are in Congress, I'm thinkin the best way
would be for you and I to git up a
Proclamation
agin Congress; and that's what I was
dreaming about jest now. The most on 'em,
I reckon, have been borrowin money of
Biddle
,
or wanted to, and if they hain't, it's no
matter. And Mr. Van Buren thinks it would
be well to call a convention to nominate a
President, and you and I can manage to slip
that in the Proclamation too, and if things
don't go right for him, I'll hold on till it does.'
`Well,' says I, `Gineral, you know I tell'd
you I'd stick to you thro' thick and thin, and
I'm to be depended on.' `I know it, Major,'
says he, `and I was only sorry you warnt
here a few days ago; but Mr. Van Buren said
there was no time to lose, and
the first shot
is
worth a dozen afterward. And so I come
out agin Biddle at once. And it was jest so
at New-Orleans; if I hadn't gone down and
gin the English a thump on 23d December,
they might have licked me on 8th January.
And jest so it might be now, if we waited till
Congress met; them fellows might recharter
the Bank in spite of us. But I reckon my
Proclamation has done up that businessand
if it hain't yours will. Do you know,' says
he, `Major, that some of these fellows about
me here, had the impudence to tell me tother
day, I was runnin the risk of bein turned out
of the White House?' `Why,' says I, `you
don't say so?' `Yes,' says he, `it's a fact;
but,' says he, `Major, they don't know nothin
about raccoon huntin.' `No,' says I, `nor
skunkin neither.' And then he and I turned
to, and told stories one arter another about
raccoonin and skunkin, till almost daylight;
and then we went to sleep. I expect my next
will be a Proclamation, but I don't know.
We are pretty busy about everything.
Your Friend,
J.
Downing
, Major,
Downingville Militia, 2d Brigade.
LETTER XIV.
Major Downing's Proclamation, in did of the
President's
,
against the Banks
.
Major Downing's Clincher
,Published by Authority.
Washington,
26th Sept. 1833.
I,
Major
J.
Downing
, of the 2d Brigade
of Downingville Militia, and second best man
in the Goverment (I and the Gineral bein
pretty much the hull on't), thinkin that the
last Proclamation agin Biddle and the Bank
han't got reasons enuff in itgive out this,
my Proclamation, by way of a Clincher.
The times are now gittin pretty squally,
and if we don't look out sharp, things will go
all to smash, and now is the time for all on
you to back me and the Gineral. We have
been now nigh upon five years at work,
nockin down abuses, and still things don't go
exactly to our notion. We have taken away
all the offices from the opposition folks; still
some on 'em manage to git money to live on
somewhere else. We have taken away the
printin from them, and gin it all to our folks;
still they keep up printin other papers, and
we can't manage to choak them off no how,
but they will keep jawin, and twittin on us;
they won't print none of our notices, but keep
all the while writin and printin their own,
and try to make folks think that Webster, and
McDuffy, and Adams, and Sargent, and Clay,
and Binny, and Everett, and Gallatin, and a
raft more of such kinder fellows, know more
than Mr. Van Buren, Mr. Kendle, Mr.
Cambrelling
,
and Major Barry, and such good
friends of our'n, and all as true as steel too.
But I and the Gineral have found out all
about it.
Biddle and the Bank are the varments
,
and if they are not put down there is no tellin
the harm they'll do us. Biddle's Bank ain't
like other Banksevry thing it does goes
pretty much agin us; and most of the other
Banks do all they can to help us. There is
one at Albany called the Regency Bank; now
that is the right kind of Bank; it loans money
only to our friends, and gits its thumb on all
the Banks it can, and makes them do so too;
and if they don't they put the screws on 'em
and that's the reason why our folks are so
strong in Albany; and if the United States
I
Bank was managed jest like the Regency
Bank, we should all on us be much better off.
And what was the United States Bank made
for? Didn't Mr. Madison, and Mr. Monroe,
and Mr. Adams, when they were Presidents,
jest go into it whenever they pleased, and
shovel out the money to their friends, and the
opposition folks didn't git one cent; and now
that Gineral Jackson is President, and who
has done more for the country than all the
Presidents, and Ginerals, and Commodores,
and the whole bunch on 'em ever did, when
he wants to do a trifle for his friends in the
same way, they won't let him`Well then,'
says he, `I'm the Goverment, and I want
my money;' and then they turn and print
books and speeches, saying the Gineral ain't
the Goverment; and try to make folks think
the Secretary of the Treasury and Congress,
and not the Gineral, has the right to take
away the money. Now the Gineral don't
care no more for Congress than he does for
the Secretary of the Treasury, and he'll sarve
them jest as he has him. We don't want
them; they only make trouble, unless they do
jest as we tell 'em. We want money, and
must have it. Some of our folks who have
been working hard for us hain't got any, and
we have got no more offices to give 'em.
The rich folks have pretty much all the
money, but as we can out vote 'em, they ought
to shell outand that's pretty much Mr. Van
Buren's notion too. And his notion is, too,
that there ought to be a convention, to
nominate
a President, jest like that one a spell ago
in Baltimore. One man is enuff for each
State, only get the right one, and then vote
by majority, jest as George Creamer did when
he gave six and thirty votes for old
Pennsylvany
.
It won't do to wait too longits only
three years more afore we shall want another
President, and we ought to spring to it now
jest as the Gineral says about the Bankthat's
got only three years more to run, and he is
afraid it can't wind up as safely by that time
as it can now, and so he's goin to give it a
twist on 1st Octoberand we mean to follow
it up till we nock it all to bits, unless Biddle
resigns, and if he does, the Gineral says he'll
make me President of the Bank, and give it a
new charter, and then we'll git all our folks
in and make things go better there.
There is no use in Congress, or anybody
else to try and corner the Gineralhe has
thrashed double their number afore this, and
if they do try to drive him in a corner, it will
turn out just like a skunkin frolicthe
foremost
dog will get the worst on't.
By order of the Goverment.
J.
Downing
, Major,
Downingville Militia, 2d Brigade.
LETTER XV.
Favourable news of the Broker's business from Zekel
Squire Biddle a Jackson manA real jaw in the
Long RoomAn editor put in advance of the news
.
To my old friend Mr. Dwight, of the N. Y. Daily Advertiser.
Washington
9
th October
, 1833.
We have just got the election news from
Philadelphy, and I and the Gineral aint over
and above tickled by it after all, seein that our
folks promised us to get the hull on't,
and
Girard's money too
. But I tell him we'll git
that next year; and as we have now got the
deposits out of the bank, it's glory enuff for
one spell.
I got a letter from Zekel Bigelow t'other
day, who I see is pretty busy now in
Wall-street
,
and will soon take the shine off the
most of the Brokers there. He says he and
the rest of the Brokers got nocked all aback by
Squire Biddle agreein to take the branch notes
from the deposit banks, instead of lettin them
banks send them away west and south
themselves
and which would cost them or the
Goverment
I 2
about 3 per cent., unless they let the
Brokers do it for a trifle less. This move of
Squire Biddle seems to puzzle the Brokers
considerable: and Zekel says this aint the first
time the Squire has trod on the toes of the
Brokers. And as Zekel is now turned Broker
himself, he don't seem to like the Squire as
well as he used to; but he thinks the Squire
can't stand it long, and that he only does it now
because we have a little money left in his
bank, and as soon as we take that away, and
which we are doin now as fast as we can, that
then the Squire will say he has nothin more
to do with the Goverment, and let ev'ry bank
take care of its own billsor, as Zekel says,
let ev'ry man `skin his own skunks.' And
then it's Zekel's notion the Brokers will have
their day. He says, as it is, he is makin a
good livin in shavin drafts from  to 1 per
cent, which the U. S. Bank used to take and
collect for nothin. He is however plaguy wrathy
with the deposit banks in New-York makin
money so plenty there; for Mr. Taney, our new
Secretary of the Treasury, has tell'd 'em to
use up in New York pretty much all the
Goverment
money they collect there (and they
collect pretty much the hull on't)and so
Zekel thinks there will be trouble away west,
where they hain't got as many banks and as
much mony as they have in Wall-street, and
so he thinks of takin a turn down there soon,
for he says there is no chance for Brokers
where money is as plenty as blackberries.
The keenest folks we've got to look out for
us about the country is the District Attorneys.
They hain't got much to do now in the way
of their office, and we make 'em attend to
other matters. We've got a rale sharp little
fellow to keep an eye out on Squire Biddle,
and got him in the Bank too. So that the
Squire can't get round him no way. That
report he made to the Gineral t'other day, was
nigh upon as good as my Bank report. In
some things it is much better; for my `report'
only tell'd folks what I saw, and what I knew,
but his goes a trifle furtherit tells the
Gineral pretty much all about what he didn't
see, and what he don't know, and that's more
than most folks can do; and gives things a
plaguy curious lawyer's twist, that helps us
along considerable. I suppose now the Squire
will answer this, and tell all about it; and we
was plaguy fraid he'd do it before the election
in Philadelphy. But it wo'nt do him no good
now; we have had the first lick at him, and
that, the Gineral says, is the best part of the
battle. I and the Gineral was lookin over the
accounts that I had taken when I was
examinin
the Bankand comparin them with this
'cute little fellow's report, and once and a while
the Gineral would snort out, I tell you. And,
says he, `Major, if by any chance we lose Amos
Kindle, we must git that little District
Attorney
here with ushe's a puzzler, aint he?
`That he is,' says I, `Gineral; but I'm afraid,'
says I, `that the Squire will puzzle him, and us
too, when he comes out with his reply.'
`But there is one thing, Major,' says the
Gineral, `that I don't see how Biddle can git
round; and that is, how he dares to take upon
himself to do what only could be done by the
Directors. Look at the Charter; there it is as
plain as A. B. C. He has no right to do a
single thing, unless the Directors are all
present
,
and agree to it.' `Well,' says I, `Gineral,
that is a puzzler; and yet all the Bank folks
say he does right; and its more their business
than ourn. And,' says I, `Gineral, come to
think on't, and the notion never struck me
before
,
but I begin now to believe that Squire
Biddle is a rale Jackson man.' `Why,' says he,
`Major, you are as crazy as a mad rooster
how can you make that out?' `Why,' says I, `I
do raly believe when the Squire did any thing
without the Directors, he said,
I take the
responsibility
.' The Gineral got up, stamp'd
round a spell; and, says he, `Major, you beat
all natur.' But this tickled the Gineral
considerable
.
`Well,' says he, `Major, if I only
knew he said so, I'd put all the deposits back
again in the Bank to-morrow; for I do like
a man who aint afraid of responsibility.'
We come nigh havin a pretty considerable
riot here last night. I and the Gineral had
been to bed about two hours, and had jest got
threw talkin over matters, and got into a kinder
doze, when we was startled by the tarnalest
racket you ever hear tell on. The Gineral
jump'd right on eend, and run and got his
hickory, and I arter him, with the only thing I
could get hold on handily`Never mind your
Regimentals and Corderoys, Major,' says he,
and down stairs we went, side by side, and I a
leetle ahead on him;for I always like to
lead into scrapes, and out of scrapes. There
is a long room where the most of our folks git
together, to talk over matters every night, and
eat supper; and sometimes they git into a
kinder squabble, but keep quiet. But this
time some how they was in a terrible takin
and smashin things. They was all at it,
Editors
,
and Auditors, and Secretaries' Clerks, and
under Post Masters, and Contractors, jawin
and poundin one another, and Amos among
the thickest on em. The Gineral look'd on for
about a minit, and, says he, `Major, shall I go
in, or will you? I don't like to do it,' says he,
`for they have all done us much sarvice, but
we cant let this riot go on.' `Well,' says I, `
Gineral
,
do you give me your Hickory,' and, says
I, `I'll go at 'em, and make short work.' `Take
care, Major,' says he, `how you hit, and who you
hit.' `Never mind,' says I, `Gineral, I'll take the
responsibility.' `Will you,' says he; `well, here's
my Hickory;for,' says he, `Major, tho' I dare
do eny most any thing, I must confess I dare
not take
that
responsibility.' And with that he
went to bed, and I went at 'em, and such a
time I never had. The first clip I made was
at Amos,but he dodged it, and I hit one of
the Editors of the Globe, and nocked him
about into the middle of next week.One
fellow
got a fryin pan and made fight, but it was
no use, for in less than a minit I cleared 'em
all. As soon as they come to know who it was,
they kinder tried to curry favor; and one said
one thing, and one another; and every one
tried to shuffle off upon the others; it was a
considerable spell before I could get the cause
on't; and then it turn'd out that the dispute
began about the public deposits, and the next
President, and a new Bank, and Mr. Duane
and Squire Biddle, and Mr. Van Buren,and
all mixed up so, I couldn't make head nor tail
on't.' `Now,' says I, `my boys, make an eend
on't:' and with that I slap'd the old Hickory
down on the table, and I made their teeth
chatter. `My dander is up,' says I; `and one
word more and I'm down upon you. What,'
says I, `a riot here at midnightaint it glory
enuff for you,' says I, `to sarve under the
Gineral
?
If it ain't,' says I, `then I'm mistaken,
and Mr. Van Buren too,for he thinks it is,
and I think so too. And now,' says I, `no
more jawin'and I left them; and when I got
back to the Gineral, I found him in a terrible
takin; and it was nigh upon day light afore
we could git to sleep. He was all the while
talkin about Amos Kindle, and the rest on'em;
and I do raly believe the Gineral would never
have gone to sleep, unless I tell'd him I would
stick by him; and whenever the folks about
us got into a snarl, if he would only lend me
his Hickory, `I'd take the responsibility.'
Yours to Sarve,
J.
Downing
, Major,
Downingville Militia, 2d Brigade.
LETTER XVI.
Trouble in the CabinetThe use of VacanciesAmos
in a PanicMr. Van Buren's Nature and Prospects
A Rat among the Barrels
.
To my old friend Mr. Dwight, of the N. Y. Daily Advertiser.
Washington,
22
d October
, 1833.
My
last letter to you tell'd you about that
'ere scuffle I had among some of our folks
down stairs; and do you know it has been nigh
bringing war among us. Mr. Van Buren
came down here all in a lather about it. He
was plaguy fraid there would be more
voluntary
dismissals; and he says it won't do to
have too many of them all at once, or the folks
about the country will begin to think that we
ain't
units
. Some on 'em did try, I suspect,
to make muddy water between me and the
Gineral; for one day when I was busy doin up
some writin for the Gineral, he was called out,
and had a long talk with Mr. Van Buren and
Amos Kindle, and some more on 'em; and
when he came back, says he, `Major, I wish
you and I was at the Hermitage.' `Why,'
K
says I, `how so, Gineral?' `Well, I don't
know exactly why,' says he, `but I don't see,'
says he, `what use there is in my bein here,
for things are gittin now so mixed up, that I
can't tell exactly what is best to do to get Mr.
Van Buren in. Do you know, Major,' says
he, `that Mr. Van Buren says he don't think
it was right to move the deposits.' `Why how
you talk!' says I. `Didn't he advise it?'
`Well, so I thought,' says the Gineral; `but
he says it would be best only to hold it up by
the tail, as you do a fox, and keep all the dogs
barking for it; for as soon as you throw the
fox in the crowd, a few old Jowlers grab hold,
and the rest don't git a mouthfull; and then
comes trouble.'
`Well,' says I, `Gineral, that's true enuff,
and that's jest the way we are doin now with
the minister to England, and some other
appointments
;
we must keep the folks smellin
round, and one vacancy
to fill
,' says I, `is
worth a dozen filled up.' `But, Major, that
ain't the worst trouble now,' says the Gineral;
and he got up, and stomped about, and then
came back and filled his pipe, and stomped
about agin, without lightin it. I see there was
trouble brewin. Says he, `Major, I don't care
so much about it myself; but they say
you
must make Amos Kindle an apology for that
blow you aimed at him tother night.' And
with that I riz right up, and walked straight
up chamber, and put on my rigementals, and
my cocked hat, and hooked on my sword, and
went strait down stairs to Amos. `Here,'
says I, `Mister, the Gineral says you want to
say somethin to me.' `O no, Major,' says he,
`there must be some mistake.' `Well then,'
says I, `it is that you want me to say
somethin
to you.' `Ono,' says he, `that's a greater
mistake.' I looked at him for about a minit;
and he shook like a North Carolina ague.
Says he, `Major, I suspect the Gineral meant
you to look over with me a statement I am
gittin up, showing how much mony Mr. Clay
has received of the Bank; it is almost done,'
says he, `and I'll bring it up for you and the
Gineral, and Mr. Van Buren to see.' `Very
well,' says I, `that's enuff.' And back I went
to the Gineral; and as soon as I got in front
of him, I stopped. `Now,' says I, `Gineral,
what was that you was sayin a while ago that
you wanted me to do?' The Gineral was
stumped; he looked at me a spell, and says
he, `Major, I reckon I've forgot it; and
suppose
we say no more about it.' And jest then
in came Mr. Van Buren, and shortly after Amos
came in, and we all sot down, and began to
figer up the 'counts that our little District
Attorney had been sendin to Amos Kindle,
about the money the Bank had paid to Mr.
Clay for his sarvices from the time Mr. Cheves
employed him to sue the folks away West
there, when the Bank closed up one of its
branches. And it figers up pretty
considerable
.
And Amos has got it so fixed, that it
looks for all the world like `bribery and
corruption
;'
and we are comin out with it, and
a good deal more too; and if it dont't kill
Clay, I'm mistaken.
The Gineral is as wrathy as thunder about
Clay's journey north, and Mr. Van Buren
don't like it a bit nother. But the Gineral tells
Mr. Van Buren, if so be that the folks north
and south, and all about creation, take a
notion
to Mr. Clay, and think he would make a
better President than Mr. Van Buren,then
he, the Gineral, will hold on for a 3d heat;
and that's about my notion too. Mr. Van
Buren
would stand a good chance in a race,
when a good many are runnin, and if the
ground is muddy and slippery; for he is a
master hand at trippin folks. But I'm afraid
he'd stand a slim chance over a clear field.
And it ain't fair to make him run so. Any
man can catch a rat in a strait race, because
he ain't used to it; but give him a few old
barrels and logs to dodge round, then, I tell
you, it's pretty tuff work.
I hain't had a letter from Zekel Bigelow for
some time. I raly begin to think that crittur
has left Wall-street, and gone East with Mr.
Claycan you find out, and let me know?
Your friend,
J. Dow
ning
, Major,
Downingville Militia, 2d Brigade.
K 2
LETTER XVII.
[
Major Downing
.We were just preparing an article, going
to show that we doubted the authenticity of the remarks of our
friend of the Portland Courier, who claims to be the only
publisher
of Major Downing's Letters, by stating what we before
asserted, that we believed ourselves his only publishers, when
by due course of the mail we received the following letter from
the Major himself. We find that we, like our friend in
Portland
,
were equally hoodwinked by this astute politician, who
led us, by inuendo at least, to believe we individually were his
exclusive publishers; and now it turns out that he, like other
politicians of the day, dealt out his notions to suit latitudes
`hogs' fat to one, and fresh butter to another.' We but do the
Major common justice in believing that his letters originally
published in this paper (now to the number of about twenty,
and some pretty considerable long ones), embracing his
invaluable
Bank Report, contributed mainly, and we had almost said
exclusively, to his present celebrity. We have no other interest,
however, than to see in the event of a publication, that our
hero may not have occasion to say he has been shorn of his
fame by his friends, in publishing his `hogs' lard' and not his
`fresh butter' letters.
Eds
.]
Major Downing acknowledges all his juvenile
Productions
His
Apology for writing better now than
formerly
.
To my Old Friend of the Portland Courier.
Washington,
October
27, 1833.
I
See
by the public papers you are about to
print my letters to youand you say I have
written no other letters except those I writ to
you. Why, my good old friend, if I had
never quit Downingville, and never looked
beyend your little Courier, I should never
have been so great a man as I now be.
Suppose
Mr. Van Buren had never done any
thing out of Kinderhook, do you think he
would be as great a man as he is now? And
the Gineral toosuppose he had stuck to the
Hermitage, do you suppose he would be
President
?
No, nothis is a pretty considerable
of a country; and what suits one part of it
don't anotherand as soon as I saw what a
shocking big place New-York was, says I,
`Now I'll do more than write for Portland;' and
as I knowed my old friend Dwight had about
as big and round a head as most folks in the
printin line, and once a friend is always so, I
took to write to him too; and you and he are
the only ones I ever writ a word to. I didn't
trouble you about many things I thought best
to write to him about; because you don't
know as much your way about some things,
as you do about others. And I got so mixed
up with great public affairs, that you wouldn't
know no more about what I was at, than
if I had got the Gineral to write you in
Latin.
Now, if you want to print my letters in a
book. you had better git my old friend Dwight
to give you all the letters I writ to him too;
for, to tell you the truth, when I writ to him,
I laid out a good deal of pains; and it was
jest like goin to marketyou know what
suits Portland won't suit York; hogs' lard
will do for one, but the other won't take nothin
but fresh butter to fry their fish with.
Little and Holden, of Philadelphy wanted
to print my letters to Mr. Dwight, and they
say they will give pictures with them, on eny
most every page, and have my likeness, and
the Gineral's, and Mr. Van Buren's, and
Squire Biddle's, and all the Downingville
folks too. If you can manage with them and
Mr. Dwight, and git them altogether, it would
be better, and then all the kounterfits would
stand no chance.
But you can do as you please about that;
only I now tell you, that my letters to Mr.
Dwight are, if any thing, a leetle better than
my letters to you; and folks think more on
'em than they do of any others I ever writ;
and if it warn't for them I might have been
Major Jack Downing to be sure, but I would
not have been
J.
Downing
, Major,
Downingville Militia, 2d Brigade.
LETTER XVIII.
Flattering prospects of the President's Message
Indian Rights and Wrongs
.
To my old friend, Mr. Dwight, of the New-York Daily
Advertiser.
Washington,
2d Nov.
1833.
The
Congressmen are jest beginnin to
arrive
here, and I suppose in a short time we
shall have them here as thick as huckleberries;
and the Gineral is brushin round now, and
says the Message must be finished and painted
off hand, and we are all as busy as bees in
gittin it dove-tailed together; and after next
week, the Gineral says, there can't be any
more alterations. It is the first Message I
ever had any hand in; and tho' I say it, I
guess you will say it is about as complete a
thing as ever was sent express anywhere.
I have been to work on it ever since we
was at the Rip-Raps; and tho' it has been
all pulled to bits, to git in some notions, we
didn't think on, yet it will look pretty slick,
I tell you, when it's done; and we will lay
on paint enuff to kiver up all the cracks and
seams.
We shall give a pretty good lick at the
Bank, and won't leave as much on't standin
as would make a good sized oven. It is
curius now to see how easy it is to build up,
or nock all to bits, any thing on paper. Now
jest see about the Bankthere it stands in
Chesnut-street, with its hundred cord of specie,
and its cart-load of books; and its branches
here and there, and all busy, and full of clarks
and directors, and folks in Europe, and all
about creation dealin with it; and the Brokers
in Wall-street all busy about it: and Biddle's
bills goin about, and most folks thinkin they
are better than hard dollars; and all the old
men and women holdin the stock, supposin it
will go up agin as high as they paid for it;
and I, and the Gineral, and Amos Kindle, and
Mr. Van Buren talkin over itand one line
in the Message nocks it all into kindlin-wood.
For, you see, when `the Goverment' says a
thing must be jest so, there is no help for it
we can't stand to chat about trifles. The
Gineral has broken three pipes the last time
we talked about it. `Biddle and the Bank
must be smashed,' says he, `Major,'and so
smash they go, Congress or no Congress.
The next thing was the Ingins. Here the
Gineral to humand I don't pretend to say
nothin, for I never did like an Ingin, and
never can. The Cherokees give us a good
deal of trouble in Georgia last year; but the
Gineral took sides with Georgia, because he
had a good many friends there, and Mr. Van
Buren had too; for that state was the only
one that nominated him Vice-President a spell
ago; and if he had got in there, and Mr.
Crawford President, who was ailin all over
with some plaguy
appleplexy
I and the
Gineral would never have been hearn on
arterward. But no matterthe Gineral says
he didn't make that treaty with the
Cherokees
and
it was made so long ago, he has
eny most forgot itand treaties oughtn't to
last for ever. But this treaty with the Creeks
in Alabama, he did make, and he knows all
about it; and he means to stand by it, and
turn all the squatters off the land in Alabama,
jest as they wanted him to do in Georgia
but he wouldn'tthere is trouble enuff about
it, I tell youand you don't know nothin
about it in York; but the Gineral is tikled to
death about it; and as soon as he saw the
Proclamation of the Governor of Alabama,
you never see a crittur so spruced up as the
Gineral was. `Major,' says he, `by the
etarnal, we shall have another Nullification
this Congress, arter all. You needn't say
much about it,' says he, `in the Message,
we'll keep that for a Proclamation.' `Well,'
says I, `Gineral, you are a master-hand at
gittin into trouble.' `But,' says he, `Major,
ain't I a master one in gittin out of one?' says
he.
We've got an old trunk up-chamber, full
of troublesold laws, and treaties, and
contracts
,
and state claimsand whenever we
want any powder, all we've got to do is to
open that, and snook among old papers, and
get up a row in no time. The Gineral likes
this a leetle better than I do, for the most of
the labour falls on me; and the only way I
can git rid of it is to make our folks down
stairs do it, if I see it gives any on 'em a boost
with his partyfor I don't care nothin about
any thing here but the Gineral; and if I can
git him threw this Congress, its pretty much
all I care about, and he too; for arter that,
I'm goin with him to the Hermitage, for I
expect by that time there wont be much
more left of us than our beards and
shoestrings
.
Your friend,
J.
Downing
, Major,
Downingville Militia, 2d Brigade.
L
LETTER XIX.
The President's Plan for managing the Bank and the
CountryHunt for lost SpectaclesHow and where
they were found
.
To my old friend Mr. Dwight, of the N. Y. Daily Advertiser.
Washington,
12
th November
, 1833.
I
Have
always been tellin the Gineral, as
you know, that of all troubles there was none
so tuff to git round as money troubles, and
when such matters git in a snarl it was worse
than tryin to straiten a melitia line arter
dinner
.
I was always afraid that we was gittin
too many folks to handle the money, and to
be figerin at the 'counts. Ever since I was a
boy I always had a notion that the fewer
hands in countin the better, and the less you
handle money the better, for the more you
handle it, somehow, the less it grows. And
then agin I tell'd the Gineral, over and over
agin, `Don't meddle with the Bank,' says I;
`the money is safe enuff there, and one pocket,'
says I, `Gineral, is better than twenty.' But
you know when I was in New-York with
Zekel
Bigelow tryin to find out the cause of
money bein scarce, and when Zekel broke
his watch showin me how the United States
Bank worked among other banks, the folks
somehow got round the Gineral, and the
deposits
was removed.
I have been lookin out for trouble ever
since, though I was bound to stick to the
Gineral
,
right or wrong, as I telled him I would.
Tother day, when we came to that part of
the message where we have to speak of mony
matters, we sent for Mr. Taney, our new
Secretary
of the Treasury, to bring in his
accounts
.
He warn't quite ready, for he ain't
as quick at siferin yet as he will be to rights;
so we waited for him a spell, and left a place
here and there in the message, jest big enuff
to put in figers: and so last night the Gineral
sent agin, and said he must have the 'counts,
`ready or not ready,' and up they came, sure
enuff, and not more than half-cooked; but the
Gineral won't wait for nothin when he's in a
hurry. `Now,' says he, `Major, turn to and
see how they stand with last year. And so
at it I went, comparin all the amounts of
outlays
,
the Gineral all the while smokin and
thinkin pretty hard, with his feet up on the
mantle. I figered up the sums pretty quick,
considerin there was a good many on 'em
called
estimates;
and when I got to the eend
on't, `Now,' says I, `Gineral, you know I tell'd
you that we could git up and put down
nullification
in no timewe could turn out a
cabinet
and appint other folkswe could send
ministers abroad, and let 'em come home as
soon as they pleased, and send other folks in
their places, and give all full pay toowe
could nock the United States Bank and Squire
Biddle all into splinterswe could let our
folks go on the Ingin lands in one place and
drive them off in other places, and git up an
Ingin Warand appint new officers here
and thereand have new auditers to settle
'countsand let things go on in the Post
Office and Land Office pretty much to suit the
folks thereand instead of havin one Bank
for our mony, scatter it about among the
banks of our friends. All this we could do,
and have done, and have taken the
responsibility
too, and the folks like us the better for
it; but,' says I, `when they come to see what
it all costs there'll be trouble, now I tell you,'
says I.
`Why, Major,' says the Gineral, `what's the
matter? ain't `the Goverment' economical?'
says he: `do you expect to make reforms
without costin somethin? Can you clear up
swamps, and cut ditches, and remove old
stumps without expense?' `Yes,' says I,
`Gineral, that's all true. But, plague on't,'
says I, `it's ben goin on so now nigh upon 5
years; and,' says I, `it keeps costin more and
more, and we are nearer bein swamp'd and
stump'd than everhere,' says I, `now jest
look and see what `the Government' costs
now, and what it cost when Mr. Adams was
President; and that ain't the worst on't,' says
I, `our money is here, there, and everywhere;
and I don't see how we shall find it when when we
want it.'
As soon as I mention'd the amount of the
sums I had figered up, the Gineral jumps up,
and he did stomp about a spell, I tell you
he smash'd down his pipe, and it flew into
more than forty piecessays he, `Major, ain't
you mistaken?' `No,' says I, `thare's no
mistake
about me, Gineral.' `Let me see them
accounts,' says he; and he begun to feel for
his spectacles, first in one pocket, and then in
anotherfor he had no less than 7 pockets
besides his watch foband he couldn't find
his spectaclessays he, `Major, have you seen
L 2
my spectacles?' `No,' says I, `Gineral, I hain't
where do you keep 'em?' says I`Why,'
says he, `I used always to keep 'em in this
side breast-pocket, but I have been so pester'd
lately, I must have chang'd pockets'`That's
bad,' says I, `Gineral, especially,' says I,
`when one wants any thing in a hurry.
Now,' says I, `I only keep one pocket; and I
got that notion,' says I, `from Squire Biddle,
for he keeps eny most every thing in one
pocket, and he can tell in a minit pretty much
all about eny thing.'
The Gineral kept all the while feelin and
turnin his pockets inside out, but no
spectacles
.
Says he, `Major, I reckon them 'ere
spectacles are somewhere in one of these
pockets, and I'll find'em,' says he, `if I have to
take my shirt off;' and at it he went, and he
off coat and jacket, and I don't know what all,
and I all the while shakin 'em to find the
spectaclesby-and-by I see a hole in his
pantaloons-pocket
;
`I'm on track now,' says I,
`Gineral; here's a hole:' and,sure enuff, when
he came to take off his boots, there was his
best gold-rim specs, and all broke to flinders
and if we hadn't been lookin for 'em, and if I
hadn't seen that'ere hole, you never would say
they ever had been specs, for they were all
jam'd to nothin.
There was a curious notion then jest come
into my head, and I stood stock still, holdin
the Gineral's pantaloons in one hand and his
right boot upside down in tother, and there
lay the specs on the floor (or what there was
left on 'em); and the Gineral stood lookin at
me with eny most nothin on him, and the
Message and the Treasury 'counts and my
slate lay on the tablethere warn't a word
said for more than 10 minitsan awful time
to stand so.
So to rights the Gineral he spoke, and says
he, `Major, what are you thinkin on?' `Why,'
says I, `Gineral, I was thinkin,' says I, `if you
had kept your spectacles in your side
breast-pocket
,
they would be on your nose now; but,'
says I, `that ain't the worst on't, I'm afeard,'
says I, `Gineral, we've got too many pockets
for our money, and when we want it we shall
all have to come to our shirts and boots before
we find it.'
The Gineral got as hornety as all nature at
this; and says he, `Major, I wish now you
was only Calhoun, or Biddle, or Clay, or
M'Duffy, or Don Pedro, or Black Hawk, or
any one but Major Downingfor I feel as if I
should like to give some one a thrashing.'
`Why,' says I, `Gineral, you ain't mad nor
nothin, be you? for I am too,' says I; `and
ev'ry time I look at the 'counts,' says I, `I feel
as if I would like to git hold of some one, and
thrash 'em too,'and so we stomped about a
spell, cussin and discussin most things, till we
got cool aginbut it was a considerable of a
storm, I tell you.
Your friend,
J.
Downing
, Major,
Downingville Militia, 2d Brigade.
LETTER XX.
Account of the important difference between common
`Specs' and Magical Glasses; showing by plain
matters of fact, how much more difficult it is to see
through the latter than it is the former
.
To my old friend Mr. Dwight, of the New-York Daily
Advertiser
,
who prints none but my own genwine letters
Washington,
30th, Nov.
1833.
The
last letter I writ you tell'd you about
the hunt we had arter the Gineral's specs,
and when we found 'em they was all stomp'd
to bits in his boot. The Gineral and all on us
have been in trouble ever since about it, for
they was given to him by Mr. Van Buren
the very day Mr. Van Buren came to jine him
at Washington as Secretary of State, and he
tell'd the Gineral never to let nobody handle
them are specs but himself, and that when
they got out of order, never to let nobody
mend'em but himself. And, do you know, so
particular was the Gineral, that when Mr.
Van Buren was absent, I have known him to
send them specs clean to England for Mr.
Van Buren to fix 'em for h m; for they had a
dozen little screws and springs to 'em, that
sometimes would get out of order, and when
that was the case, you couldn't see no more
threw 'em than you could threw Mr. Van
Buren himself. As soon then as we found
'em all broke to bits, as I tell'd you in my last
letter, the Gineral was in the greatest trouble
I ever see; and he wrote right off to Mr. Van
Buren about it, and sent the letter by express
clear to Albany, where Mr. Van Buren was;
and until that express got back agin, the
Gineral
could do nothing with business. He was
as bad off as an owl in the sunshine. So
to rights the express got back, and brought
a letter from Mr. Van Buren, and a new pair
of specsjest like the old ones (afore they
was broken)there wan't a might of
difference
.
He put 'em on, and he looked as natural
agin in 'em as ever. `Aha!' says he, `Major,
these are the specs, after all. Tis strange,' says
he, `I can't see things with Governor Cass's
specs, nor Governor Woodberry's, nor
anybody's
,
as well as I can with these, for they
are jest like the pair I broke;'and then he
read Mr. Van Buren's letter. `See here now,
Major,' says the Gineral, `how kind it is in
Mr. Van Buren to caution me, agin and agin,
not to touch the screws; and do you know,'
says the Gineral, `that ever since I have had
Mr. Van Buren with me, that whenever we
come to read over any long statement about
politics, and who to appint, or what to do with
the Bank, or any thing that required sharp
looking into, he would always first examine
my specs, and take 'em off to the window, or
to a corner with a light, and see that all was
right, and try 'em himself, and then bring 'em
back to me; for, as he says (and he is a knowin
crittur) that unless I can see well into every
thing, I best see nothin.'
A kinder notion than jest began to git in
my head that I couldn't scratch out all I could
do. And says I, `Gineral, I would like now
peskily to examine them specs; for if Mr.
Van Buren has not got a patent for 'em (and
seein he is Vice-President, and don't need one),
I think of gitting one myself.' `Well,' says
the Gineral, `I never like to refuse you nothin;
but Mr. Van Buren made me promise never
to let nobody examine into 'em, and especially
you; for,' says he, `Major, do you know that
Mr. Van Buren has a notion you know a good
deal about contrivances, and that it is the
natur of your people Down East: and it might
be he intends to git a patent himself for these
very specs; and if so, he ought to have it, for
he says they are jest as much his
invention
as
your letters are yourn.' `Well,' says I, `its
no matter.' But I got a kink in me to
examin
them are specs; and I couldn't sleep, nor
eat, nor drink, till I got hold on 'em. So one
night, when I and the Gineral had ben readin
over the Message, and it was all finished and
complete, he put his name to it; `And now,'
says he, `Major, do you attend to the printin
on't, and git about 100 copies on't to send to
our folks who are distant, so they can git it as
soon and a little afore the opposition folks can
send it express, after it is delivered to
Congress
;'
and so he went to bed, for he was eny
most beat out. `Now,' thinks I, `for a try at
them specs'for I was all the while thinkin on
'em; and the public work couldn't go on
without'em
.
And so I snook'd' em out, and clapp'd
them onthe Gineral all the while snorin like
a north-wester.
As soon as I took up the Message, and look'd
at it, I couldn't make head nor tail on't. It
seem'd to me jest, for all the world like one of
them show-boxesall the letters and figers was
goin round and round, and look'd all the while
like some of them crouds we see last summer
on the
grand tower
, throwin up hats, and cryin
huzza for the Gineral and Major Downing, and
Mr. Van Buren; and then, agin, there was a
great glare, and it seem'd jest as if the Gineral
was in the middle on't, and Mr. Van Buren,
and Major Barry, and Amos Kindle, and a raft
more of our folks, all seem'd to be standing
round, firing off rockets; they would squirt
up over the Gineral, and burst, and then
shower down stars (jest as folks tell on tother
night when the stars all did git a caperin)
and jest as they would come nigh the Gineral
those stars would git together and burst agin;
and they you could see nothin but `glory,' and
not a mite of the Gineral.
`Well,' thinks I, `if the Gineral can read the
Message with these specs, it's more than I can.'
But I stuck to it, I kept turnin over the leaves
till I got to the Treasury Accounts and the
Bank business, and the deposits, and matters
of such nature,I had read all that over so
often before, with the Gineral, I had it all by
heart. But when I came to look at it through
them specs, it was no more like it than I am
like Mr. Van Buren. The accounts was all
M
jumbled up, and then came another spell of
`glory' agin; the letters and figers all turnin
into a crowd of folks and throwin up hats:
and there was Squire Biddle standin at the
door of his Bank, and Clay, and Webster, and
Calhoun, and a crowd more of such chaps
about him, with clubs in their hands, keepin
off our folks, who all seem'd to be tryin to git
into the windows; and some had got in and
was jest comin out with bags on their backs,
and among 'em I could see the cashiers of the
new Deposit Banks, with as much as they
could stagger under, and all carryin a label
with `glory' and `huzza for Gineral Jackson,'
and then agin up went another batch of
rockets
!
and there was the Gineral in another
blaze of `glory;' and jest as fast as I turn'd
over the leaves, and look'd a spell, every thing
would git to caperin agin, and end in a blow
up; and I could jest git a glimps of the
Gineral
,
all kivered up in `glory.'
Well, thinks I, if things look so to the
Gineral
,
as they do to me threw these specs, I
don't wonder so much that he don't always see
'em as other folks do; and then I went to
work, lookin into the contrivance; I give one
screw a twist one way, and the glasses flew
round like a flash; and I took up the Message
agin, and had another look, the letters and
figures would all jump about a spell, and
change sides; and when you come to read
'em, they warnt nothin like what I had
written
'em; so I kept on turnin the screws, and
slippin the springs, and every time I'd try
another
look, things kept all the while lookin
different
and
by-and-by I got 'em so that things
look'd jest as they are; and as they look threw
most specs. `Well,' thinks I, `if this don't beat
all natur.'And the more I look'd into the
contrivance
of them are specs, the more I began to
think that they knew a thing or two in Albany.
`And now,' thinks I, `I'll leave these specs as
they now are, and let the Gineral take a look
at things as he used to, before Mr. Van Buren
gave him a pair of spectacles.' And so the
next morning, when the Gineral come into
the Cabinet-room up-chamber, the first thing
he said, says he, `Major, I'll take good care
how I put these specs in my
pantaloons-pocket
agin.' And he took'em out of his
side-pocket
,
and begun rubbin'em; `Now,' says he,
`Major, jest let me take another look at that
Message. I want to see,' says he, `how the
Treasury 'counts and the Bank matters look
once more, for, do you know,' say she, `Major,
I don't know much about figers, and every time
I read that over, I'd get puzzled. But I
suppose
it's all right; and as soon as I git puzzled
with such matters, or any other matters, I
seem to think the people understand it if I
don't; for I can almost swear I can see 'em
jest as glad, let me do or say what I will, as
they all was on the
grand tower;
and that's
enuf.' So I turned over the Message to that
part the Gineral wanted to see; and he put
on his specs, and went on to readin it.
I kept my eye on him; he look'd a spell, and
blink'd, and twisted his mouth, and took off
his specs and rubb'd 'em, and look'd agin and
blink'd, and twisted his eyebrows, laid the
Message on his knees, and begun to reckon
on his fingersfor he is a master-hand at that,
and can do a sum so, nigh upon as quick as I
can with a slateso to rights, says he, `Major,
I don't like the looks of this a bit.' `How so,'
says I? `Well,' says he, `I don't know, but it
don't look as it used to.' And with that he
lookd up over the mantel-tree pieceand
started back, and look'd agin, and twisted his
eyebrows and lips plagily; and to rights says
he, `Major, whose likeness is that in plaster?'
`Why,' says I, `that's Mr. Van Buren, and a
good likeness too.' `Well, whose is that?'
`Why that's yourn,' says I, `and it looks for
all the world like you'and with that he
jump'd up and took his Hickory, and with one
lick he smashed both on 'em into powder.
Jist then in come Amos Kindle with some
newspapers, and the Gineral walk'd right up
to him with his Hickory in one hand, and the
other hand holdin on his spectaclesthe
Gineral
blinked at him a spell, Amos bowed
`Who are you?' says the Gineral; `what do you
want?' and jest as he was going to speak, the
Gineral fetched him a clip, and if he hadn't
been a master-hand at dodging, you'd a heard
no more on him: he streaked it for the door,
and got out in time. `Major,' says the
Gineral
(taking off his specs to give 'em another
wipe), `warn't that Calhoun, or was it Duff
Green? 'twas one or tother of them slim
streaked-looking fellers, I'm sartin.' I see
there was no time to lose, and at this rate the
Gineral would smash all the lookingg-lasses,
and the Message too, and every thing else
about him, if I couldn't git them are specs
back agin, to fix the screws jest as Mr. Van
Buren had'em, so that he could see `glory' agin
M 2
and nothin else; and so I tell'd the Gineral to
let me wipe his specs: and as soon as I got
'em, I screw'd 'em back to the old place, and
ever since that, things go on smooth agin. I
don't like to show the Gineral the nature of
this contrivance yet of Mr. Van Buren's, but
when Congress gets agoin, we shall have high
times, and when the good time comes to let
the Gineral see things as they are, without
any `glory,' I'll jest git his spectacles, and
give them a twist back to a
plain sight
, and
if you don't see trouble among some of our
folks I'm mistaken. The Message now being
done, and Congress jest getting together, I
shall have more time to write to you.
I wish you'd git a `black pony' goin this
season, like the folks did last year, who print a
paper down-cellar under yourn, and if you
don't let him run so nigh Sunday as they did,
I'll send all my letters by him.
Yours, &c.,
J.
Downing
, Major.
Downingville Militia, 2d Brigade.
LETTER XXI.
Plan of the President's Message to Congressand of
a Cabinet SupperSong for the Important Occasion
Please not to call the Major
Jack
Downing
.
To my old friend Mr. Dwight, of the N. Y. Daily Advertiser.
Washington,
9th December
, 1833.
My
last letter tell'd you about that
diskovery
I made in the natur of the Gineral's specs
and that the Message I had been to work
on for some time was jest finishedbut the
very next day we had to take it all to bits,
and spring to and write eny most the hull of a
new one, for we found we had gone too much
into particulars, especially about the 'counts;
and letters from Mr. Van Buren advised us to
say as little about such matters as possible,
for Congress would only make us tell pretty
much the hull on't over aginand the best
way was to say little at first, and trust to luck
and chance afterward. As soon as the
Gineral
came to know of this, says he, `Major,
you must look out and keep in that Latin
about the Bank anyhow.' So we kept that
in, but it was plaguy troublesome to make it
work well with the rest on't, for when you
come to make English on't, it reads that the
Gineral would have taken the Bank by the
throat right off, if he thought he could make
that Latin pill operate afore the charters
expire
and
then agin he says the Bank does
wrong in bringing its business to a close so
rapidly as it is now doing. There is one thing
however that's true enuff, for seein that Judge
Marshall is a stubborn know-nothin kind of
crittur, and would have a finger in givin the
Bank that pill the Gineral speaks of in Latin,
I don't believe it would have operated afore
the charter expired, if it had 40 years more to
runso there is more wit and cunnin in what
the Gineral says than folks think for.
There was another thing puzzled us tu a
trifle about the Bank. Last year, when we
thought it had no rale chink in it, the Gineral
thought best to take the deposits away from
it; but since I tell'd the Gineral in my Bank
Report there was more than 100 cords of the
rale grit, we had to say in the Message they
had too much.
The Post Office accounts was the next
bother; and that puzzled all on us peskily.
But we got round that by a very lucky
diskovery
;
and you see by the Message there has
ben an error in keepin the 'counts in the post
office ever since Gineral Washington's time;
and every Postmaster Gineral, up to Major
Barry's time, never found it out; and it was
so curious that he took nigh upon 5 years to git
at it. But it's all clear now, for he is an amazin
sharp feller at siferin. We struck out all about
the
Grand Tower
, for Clay has been over the
same ground, and Mr. Van Buren thought it
was best to say nothin about it. And it warn't
thought best too to say nothin about the
Nullifiers
,
for some of Mr. Van Buren's friends in
Georgia, headed by Crawford, are gittin up
Nullification there, worse than Calhoun's last
winter, and it makes all the difference in the
world when you come to see that one's own
friends are doin what our enemies did afore.
As soon as we sent the Message to
Congress
,
we set about gittin up a supper for all
our folks who had ben to work on't, and we
had a grand time; all our Majors was there.
The Gineral was so beat out, he didn't stay
long; but some on 'em kept it up till nigh
daylight.
We had some rale good songs too; and one
of our Majors is a plaguy sharp singer. I got
a copy of one on 'em; but I hain't got time
now to send you the hull on't: so I'll jest give
you 3 varses only.
Come, comrades, one and all,
Here assembled in the hall,
Lest us sing of times past, present, and to come;
We have every thing at stake,
And our fortunes yet to make,
And the public good is now-a-days a hum.
Times past have all gone by,
And old laws are all my eye,
The
present
and the
future
we are sure in,
When the Gineral's time is up,
We'll fill again the cup,
And drink to Amos Kindle and Van Buren.
We have no one now to thank
For a discount at the Bank,
Since we've got the public money from Nick Biddle,
And as we alone have ernt it,
We'll use it as we want it,
Security is now all fiddle diddle.
I wish you would tell folks to stop callin
me
Jack
Downing'twas well enuff when I
warn't quite as much up in the world as I now
be; and it was jest so with Mr. Van Buren
folks would keep callin him `
Mat:
' but it
warn't right, and it ain't good manners nuther.
And there is another thing I don't like; but I
don't care so much about it (for I ain't asham'd
of any letter I ever did write), and that is
printin in a book all the Letters I
first
rit, and
mixin up other Letters and Sam Patch, and
callin some of my Letters to you counterfits.
As soon as I git the Gineral threw this
Congress
,
I'll turn to and git my Letters all
together
that I writ to you, beginnin with the
Grand Tower
. Major Earl is drawin my
likeness, and the Gineral's, and Mr. Van
Buren's
,
and the most of our folks for me. He
is a master hand at it; and Zekel Bigelow
tells me if I'll give him the copyright, he'll
new shingle our old barn for nothin. How
comes on your book about the Hartford
Convention
?
The Gineral wants you to send
him a copy on't as soon as it is donehe
wants to see how nigh Yankee Nullification
comes to Nullification now-a-days.
Yours, &c.
J.
Downing
, Major,
Downingville Militia, 2d Brigade.
LETTER XXII.
Character of Mr. ClayArt of WarA pitched and
drawn Battle on the U. S. Bank Amnesty and
Overtures
Truce
Statu quo ante bellum
A Walk
A Button off Tailor's Shop The Button Scene
The Major's Success at a new Trade The Bank
worth a Button
.
To my old friend Mr. Dwight, of the N. Y. Daily Advertiser.
Washington,
Dec.
14
th
, 1833.
We
have got business enuf now on our
hands, I tell you; and nigh upon every day
we have a squall that brings all hands to the
helm. We have had fair wind so long, that
few on us know exactly how to steer
now-a-days
,
when every wind comes right in our
teeth. I hain't had my coat off since
Congress
met; and the Gineral says we must
watch them fellows closely. `Keep a sharp
look out, Major,' says he, `on Clayhe is a
bold, independent
fellow, and will speak out
his notions if the devil stands at the door;
and if he had the people with him,' says the
Gineral, `as I have, there is no tellin what
trouble
he would give us. He would make as good
a Gineral as ever was. But it will never do
to
trust that man with power
.' `Very well,'
says I, `Gineralbut, plague on't,' says I, `the
crittur somehow keeps law on his side all the
while.' `That's true enuf,' says the Gineral,
`and therefore we must keep a sharper eye
on him, and the time is come now, Major,
when we must all on us try our popularity
for when the law is agin us, we shan't have
nothin else to stand on.There is nothin,'
says the Gineral, `like war-times, Majorfor
then, when these troublesome fellows talk
about law I'd give 'em martial law, and that
makes short work.'
Jest after breakfast yesterday, I and the
Gineral had a high time together. I had ben
expecting every day to see the Bank come out
with a
reply;
and I tell'd the Gineral, says I,
`Gineral, I'm afraid we'll git a stumper from
Philadelphy one of these days, that will nock
us all into kindlin-wood.' But he kept sayin
there was no fear of that. `Why,' says he,
`Major,' you forgit that we first give the
Bank a most mortal weltin 3 years ago and
left 'em no other defence than to print
reports
and speeches; and that show'd they
hadn't much spunk; and we have been criplin
N
on 'em ever since. And when I see they began
to stagger, I give 'em our hull battery, and
opened upon 'em in flank, front, and rear, our
sharp shooters, headed by that amazin cute
little District Attorney, open'd first on 'em.
Then come my Proclamationand then my
Messageand then Mr. Tany's reportand
the Globe all the while throwin shells and
rockets. `Why,' says the Gineral, gittin up
and takin his Hickory, and givin it a whack on
the floor`if the Bank stands all that racket,
Major, it's tuffer than a pepperage log. No,
no, Major,' says the Gineral, `don't you fear
that the Bank will ever say a word in reply
it's as dead now,' says the Gineral, `as a skin'd
racoon.' And the words warn't out of his
mouth afore in came a hull bundle of letters
and newspapers, and the first thing I see
among 'em was the `Bank reply.' `Now,'
says I, `Gineral, here's trouble!here's the
very thing,' says I, `I've been afraid on all the
while.' The Gineral laft a spell; and says
he, `Major, suppose you and I now jest take a
bout, and you'll see how easy I can nock that
reply into nothin.' `Well,' says I, `Gineral,
its a bargain.Now,' says I, `let us sit down,
and you may take,' says I, `the Globe, or our
District Attorney's report, or your
Proclamation
,
or your Message, or Mr. Tany's reportary
one on 'em,or,' says I, `come to think on't, you
may take'em all together,for they are pretty
much
all one
and I'll take this `Bank reply,'
and then let's see what kind of a fight it will
turn out.' `Well,' says the Gineral, `you are
a man of spunk, Major, and I like you for it:
and if I make a prisoner on you, I'll treat you
like a brave soldier.' `And so will I you,
Gineral,' says I, `and if you fall in the fight,'
says I, `Gineral, I'll bury you,' says I, `with
the honors of war;' and then we shook hands.
`Now, Major,' says the Gineral, `as I am to
begin the fight, don't you fire till I fire, and
then we'll go threw, shot by shot.' `Well,'
says I, `I want to know first, if I have a
right to fire back
your shot
, if they miss me,
and I can pick 'em up?' `O yes,' says the
Gineral, `that's fair in war.' `Use the
enemies
shot and shells, and guns too, if you can,
Major,
that's the true art of war
.' The
Gineral all the while kept fixing his papers all
in a string on one side the table. He put his
own Messages and Proclamation in the
middle
,
and flank'd off with our District Attorney
and Mr. Tany's reports; and then he sifted
the Globe about, and call'd them
scouts
and
foragers
`There,' says he, `Major, I am now
nearly ready;' and he took off his specs,
and gin 'em a good rubbin and put 'em on
agin. `Now, Major,' says he, `take your
station
.'
And I went round tother side, and sat
down. `Are you ready?' says the Gineral.
`All ready,' says Iand at it we went. The
Gineral, he open'd his fire first, as agreed; and
he fir'd away from his first MessageAnd
then his secondthen he took the Globe, and
then the reports,and he blaz'd away like all
wrath, for an hour; and as soon as he stop'd to
take breath`Now,' says I, `its my time,'and
I read the reply a spell, and answered all he said
in three minits. And I gin him a look! The
Gineral twisted his face most shockin, and
scratched his head too. But he went at it
agin as spunky as ever; for he is an amazin tuff
crittur in a fight, and hangs on like a snappin
turtle when he gits hold. He banged away
a spell agin like all natur; and jest as he took
his specs off to give 'em a rub, I gin him the
reply agin. The Gineral gin his face another
plagy hard rumple; and I sot waitin for him
to fire agin. Says he, `Major, that's a sharp
piece you are firin with there.' `It's a peeler,'
says I, `Gineral, I tell youbut you hain't
got the best on't yetit's jest gettin warm,
says I.
`Major,' says the Gineral, `suppose we
change batterieslet me take that reply, and
you take all these documents. I like to fight,'
says the Gineral, `when there is ten to one
agin me.' `So do I,' says I, `Gineral, and so
we'd better fight it out as we sit.'
The Gineral looked a spell at his paper
agin; and, says he, `Major, I reckon we had
better have a truce.' `Not now,' says I, `I've
got my hand in now, and want to see the
fight out.' `Well,' says the Gineral, `you see,
Major, what comes when any one attempts to
drive the executive;' and with that he got
up, and took off his specs, and put 'em in his
pocket, and put on his hat and took his
Hickory
,
and fetched a whack on the table,
`
Veto
,' says he`That's enuff,' says I, `
Gineral
.'
`Andnow,' says the Gineral, `let's go and take
a walk'and so we went. The Gineral didn't
say nothin for more than a mile, and I nother.
So, to rights, says he, `Major, everybody
says money is very scarce.' `That's true enuf,'
says I, `and it's not got as scarce as it will be
N 2
afore winter is over;' and then I tell'd the
Gineral the cause on't. `Well,' says the
Gineral
,
`I believe you are right; and if the
worst comes to the worst,' says he, `we'll
have a new Bank, and that will make money
plenty agin, wont it?' `Yes,' says I, `I
suppose
so; but we can't git a new Bank,
Gineral
,
afore this one's time is out, and that's nigh
three years yet; and long afore that time,'
says I, `there will be trouble enuf, as this one
must all the while be collectin in its own
money; and folks will fail, and be bankrupt;
and then twenty new Banks will do them no
good.' `I don't see that,' says the Gineral. `If
we could make a new Bank now,' says I, `right
off, and let it take up the business of the old
one, it wouldn't make much odds. But the
law won't allow that, you know, Gineral.'
And jest then the Gineral got in a way he has
of twitchin with his suspender buttons behind;
and to rights he broke one off. `There,'
says he, `Major, here is this confounded
button
off agin.' `Well,' says I, `that's a small
matterhere is a tailor's shop,let's go in
and make him put it onand so in we went.
The tailor happened to be one of our party,
and was tickled to death to see the President,
and thought he was goin to git an office right
off, and was plagily cut down when he come
to find it was ony a button off; and so he
jumped back on his board, and sat down on
his heels agin, and said if the Gineral would
take off his pantaloons, he'd put it on in a
few minutes.I looked at the Gineral and he
looked at meand we both looked at the
tailor. `Why,' says the Gineral, `this is the
worst thing, Major, I ever metI'm stump'd
completely! It will never do to risk walking
home with this button off; for if 'tother
one comes off, it's all over with me; and if I sit
here without my pantaloons till that fellow
puts on a button, I'll kitch my death of cold!
Look here, Major,' says the Gineral, `that other
button is taken all the strain, and it will come
off in less than five minuteswhat is to be
done? It seems to me, Major,' said the
Gineral
,
`that no man is placed so often in such
real trouble as I am.'`Yes,' says I, `Gineral,
but it's fortunate for you, you always have me
with you.' `I know it, Major,' says he, `and I
hope you will be as true a friend now as ever
you have been.'And with that, says I to the
tailor, `Can't you fix things now, so as to git
over all this trouble?' `There is only one
way,' says the tailor, `and that I've stated,
and another thing,' says he, `the Gineral
wants a new pair.' `You rascal,' says the
Gineral, `you can't make a better pair, and
one that fits me better, if you try a month
these pantaloons,' said the Gineral, `are better
than a new pair; and if they only had new
buttons here they would last me to my dying
day.It takes me weeks and months to git a
pair to sit easy. I won't have a new pair,'
says the Gineral, `that I'm determined on. I
see,' says the Gineral, `what you are after
you want a new job.'
`Well,' says I, `Gineral, let me try'and
with that I wax'd a thread, and got a new
button; and whilst the Gineral stood up, I sot
down behind him, and stitched on the button
in three minitsthe Gineral all the while
shakin
his hickory at the tailor, and tellin him
that he had no more brains in his head than
he had in his thimble.`You are a pritty
fellow
to belong to my party,' says he; `I should
have been soon in a pritty condition, if I had
taken your advice,' says the Gineral. `Let me
ever ketch you at the White House agin.' So
to rights, the tailor got mad too, and said he
didn't belong to the Gineral's partyhe was
a Tany-Kindle-Van-Buren-Jackson-man; he
knew which side his bread was butter'd; and
he looked plagey knowin tooit was jest as
much as I could do to keep the Gineral from
smashin himso says I, `Come, Gineral, let's
be movin;' and we went homethe Gineral
all the while talkin about his escape from an
awful state that tailor was about getting him
in.`Well,' says I, `Gineral, little things
sometimes give us a kink and a notion of
bigger
ones; and now,' says I, `do you know,
Gineral, we are in a scrape now, pretty much
like that one we jest got out on.' `How so?'
says the Gineral. `Why,' says I, `the Bank,
there it is,' says I, `jest like your pantaloons,
better than new;
and only wants a new button;
and some of these ere political tailors about us
here want us to sit shiverin and shakin, and
runnin the risk of gettin a rheumatiz that will
last us our lives, jest for them to get the job
of makin a new one.'
`And now,' says I, `I guess you and I had
better disappoint 'em, as we did the tailor jest
nowstitch on a new button, and things will
go smooth agin.' The Gineral didn't say a
word; but he got thinkin plagey hard, till we
got home agin, and he got his pipe, and I got
mine, and jest as we were lighten 'em, says
he, `Major, there are some fellows about us
here that pester me most desperatelywe
must all go as a `Unit,' or I must blow 'em
all up, and git a new set. We'll think of it.'
said the Gineral, and with that we cock'd our
feet on the mantle-tree, and in less than five
minutes you couldn't see no more on us than
our toes.
Your Friend,
J.
Downing
, Major,
Downingville Militia, 2d Brigade.
LETTER XXIII.
Reason for some People's feeling easyThe Major
preparing
to do something for the CountryA
half-kitchen
Cabinet Council--The Major whittles, to
save Time and listenA still busier ManSylla and
CharybdisBusiness planned
.
To my old friend Mr. Dwight, of the N. Y. Daily Advertiser.
Washington,
27th December
, 1833.
My
last letter to you tell'd you of that trouble
the Gineral got in about the buttons, and if it
hadn't bin for me he'd bin in a pretty scrape
with that tailor. The Gineral hain't forgot
that yet, and won't so long as he wears
buttons
.
You know I've bin tellin you along about
my fears of mony troubleswell it's bad enuff,
and is goin to be worse yet, or I know nothin.
And the Gineral is beginnin to think so too. All
our folks about us here don't feel it, for they have
all got fat officesbut I know the people feel
it who hain't got fat officesand until they
speak up, things will go worse and worse.
Every letter I git now is full of trouble and
distressand I tell'd the Gineral t'other day,
says I, `Gineral, we must look into this
matter
,
now I tell you.' `Why,' says he, `Major,
`the Government' ain't to blameevery man
about me says it ain't his fault.' `Well,' says
I, `some one did it, I'm certinthings went
smooth enuff,' says I, `till we got dablin and
medlin in mony matters and the Bank; and
now it's all heds and pints, and when we say
it ain't our fault,' says I, `it's pretty much like
a man puttin a long pole over a fence on a
swiveland after pullin one eend round with
a jerk, if he nocks over a dozen folks with the
other eend, says it ain't his faultnow it's
pretty much jest so with the Bank,' says I,
`and if you can't see it, all I can say is, I can.'
`Well, Major,' says the Gineral, `somethin
must be done, anyhow, for I begin to think
that politics and mony matters don't always
work together. I'll call all our folks together,'
says the Gineral, `and we'll have a full
Cabinet
,
and look into this matter; and do you,
Major, prepare yourself, for I'm goin to turn
over a new leaf, that I'm determined on'and
with that he issued orders for every man to
be at the Cabinet Chamber the next day jest
after breakfastand I went to work puttin
down all my notions in writin, for I expected
a ruff time, and a pretty sharp set of fellers to
beat offand thinks I, as it is the fashion
now-a-days to read papers to the Cabinet, I'll
give 'em one that will be worth readin, and I
guess it will be the last one that the Senate
will ask an official copy of in one while. It
took nigh upon all night to write it outand
I sprung to it, for I think the time is come to
let some folks see they hain't got a green-horn
to outwit when they try me.
And so the Gineral had 'em all up in the
Cabinet Chamber yesterday; and such an
overhawlin I never see. I sat all the while
with one foot on the table, whitlin a piece of
shingleand the Gineral was walking round
among 'em, tellin about the troubles in mony
all about the country, and askin how we are
to git out of the scrape. I kept an eye on
most all on 'em, and both ears on pretty much
the hull on 'em; and such a winzin and
tangle
I never see since the day all Downingville
cum over to the Jackson side, and that was
jest arter his election. They thought I was
detarmin'd the first go off to say nothin: and
to rights I heard one chap jest behind me tell
the Gineral, `there was
one Major
in the
Cabinet
0
who made pretty much all the trouble, and
that
he
was writin letters that went all the while
agin the rest on 'emand if it warn't for
him
they could make the people believe jest what
they wantedthat it was
his
fault that the Cab
inet was obliged to shift their ground about the
Bank, and cross tracks every day. If it hadn't
bin for
him
the deposits would have been
removed
because
there warn't no `Safety Fund'
in the Bank, and the people bin contented
and if it warn't for
him
the Government could
now make the people believe that Biddle was
the sole cause of there bein no money
now-a-days
,'
and so on. I jest stop'd whitlin a minit,
and cut my eye over my left shoulder, and the
feller dodg'd behind the Gineral in a flash, and
when I look'd round the ring I found pretty
much the hull on 'em lookin at me, and there
warn't a word said. And to rights the
Gineral
he walk'd up to me, and stop'd right in
front, and look'd me strait in the face: says
he, `Major, you have hearn what is said
and I should like to know what you have to
say in replyno man shall leave this room,'
says the Gineral, `till this trouble is cleared up
Major,' says the Gineral (and his lips began
to quiver, I tell you), `Major,' says he, `it
would take a good many men to convince me
that you ain't what I have always found you
an honest man, and a true patriot
some
folks about us have been whisperin in my ear
for a long while that you ain't what I think
you arebut, Major,' says the Gineral, `I am
a soldier, and so are youand we are now all
face to faceno more whisperin,' says the
Gineral, and he fetched his Hickory a whack on
the floor, and look'd round the hull ring.
`The country is in trouble,' says he, `and the
time is come for every honest man to speak
outif there is error, let it be correctedif
there is trick, we must expose itand now,
Major,' says the Gineral, `do you set stilland
if any man has any thing to say agin you, let
him speak out. When they are all dun, you
can answer them;' and with that the Gineral
pull'd his own chair up to the other side of the
table, and laid his Hickory and hat down afore
him, and all our folks began to nock noses in
little groops here and there; and one on 'em,
no matter who, was as busy as a lost dog on a
trainin-day, smellin round from one to another
to find the right man to speak first; but none
on 'em seem'd to like it. The Gineral all the
while sat blinkin and lookin round at 'em all,
and rumplin his face once and a while most
plaguily.
So, to rights, this one on 'em came forward
and bow'd, and says he, `
Gineral
, that `our
sufferins is intolerable' there is little doubt;
and the question is, not
how
we got
into
our
present condition, but how we can best
git out
of it
. I believe,' says he (turnin with a bow
to everybody, for he is an amazin polite
critter
),
`
that
is the true and only pint now for
discussin.' `Not exactly,' says I; `but no
matter.' `Well,' says he, `as regards the
Major, far be it from me to make any charge
agin him; he is decidedly the favourite of the
people, and should be the favourite of every
man in office who wishes to keep his office;
but I would say, that I wish the Major had a
higher office. I wish he was an auditor of
accountsor a receiver of public monyor a
minister abroador an Ingin agent, or any
other office in the Government; but as he is
now, there is no gittin hold of either eend of
him; we can't elevate him, which I sincerely
desirewe can't put him down, which no man
desires. There are things in all Goverments,
and in this in particular, that require cookin
up before the people should be sarved with it;
but the Major hands the dishes over to the
people, raw and uncook'd, and lets every man
dress his own dinner: this is not right. And
then, agin, he is an enemy to party, and thinks
that politicians shouldn't meddle in mony
matters, when we all know that none of us
would now be here without party, and that
party
can't hold together without office, and
that
office
ain't worth a fig without
mony;
and so it comes to thiswe've got a party,
and a good strong one; and that party must
keep all the offices and the control of all the
mony; for, without mony, the offices won't
be good for nothinand without offices the
party will be all scattered: look at my own
statesee how things work there; and jest
so they should here. We must have the Bank;
we can't do any thing without it. This one is
good enuff if we could git Biddle and his
friends out of itbut seein we have tried that
and can't succeed, this must go down, and
then we'll have a new one after our own
fashionunfortunately, some will suffer
because
this one must, I suppose, collect its debts
and wind up: but what is the sufferins of a
few in trade, compared to the breaking up of
a
political party
, now all hitched together?
O 2
Think of all of us goin back agin to practise
lawand you, Mr. Auditor, to keepin a school
and you, Mr. Secretary, to keepin a shop
and you to ploughinand you to plantin corn
and you to diggin potatoesand you to
printin newspapers. And you, Major,' says
he, `what would become of you?' I begun
to crawl all over, and was jest goin to say
somethin, but I thought I wouldn't till he got
through; and he reeled it off for more than
an hour pretty much in the same way about
things in gineral, and Major Downing in
particular
.
And as soon as he stopt, I got up,
and says I, `Has anybody got nothin more to
say?' No one said a word. Says I, `Is all
that is said put in writin? for then there will
be no mistakeno turnin cornersno dodgin
arterward.' `O, no,' says he, `there is no
necessity
to put any thing in writin of this
nature
;
that ain't my way,' says he. `I have
always said, I don't like to git into the
newspapers
.'
`Well,' says I, `that's jest where
we differwhat I'm goin to say now,' says I,
`is all in my pocket in black and whiteand
with the Gineral's permission,' says I, `I'll
read it to the members of the Cabinet, and
then I'll git it printed, and then all on you can
read it, and every man shall have a copy on't,
except Clay and the rest of the Senatefor
though the law says they are part of the
Goverment
,
they ain't got no business with any
paper read to the Cabinetain't that law,'
says I, `Gineral?' The Gineral nodded his
head, and that was enuff; and says he, `
Major
,
do you read that paper; I know you well
enuff to know it will be an honest view of
things, and I don't care whose toes you tread
on. I have no interest in these matters
further
than to do my dutyif any fellers have
misled me, I advise 'em to keep an eye on my
hickory.'
And then I took out my papers from my
pocket, and went at it; and I didn't mince
matters, I tell you. The Gineral sot restin his
elbows on the table, with his chin in both
hands, and lookin strait in my face the hull
time, ony once in a while he would take his
hickory and whack it on the table when any
one muttered and whispered; and as soon as
I got to the eend on't, then come a buz and a
mixin, and the Gineral got up and fetched
another whack on the table with his hickory,
enuff to loosen one's eye-teeth.
`Now,' says the Gineral, `I've hearn both
sides, and the people will shortly hear it too.
If they say the Major is right, I won't oppose
them any longer; if they say the Major is
wrong, then we'll go on as we now go: and
now,' says he, `Major, git that paper printed;
and the only favour I ask of you is, not to
send an official copy on't to the Senate, if they
ask one:' and with that I and the Gineral
bowed off the Cabinet, and the Majors, and
the rest of the Goverment; and we turned to
readin letters from all quarters, all full of
mony troubles and distress, enuff to give one
the colera morbus; for, as I said afore, one is
jest about as bad as t'other.
I'll send you, to-morrow or next day, the
paper I read to the Cabinet, and the rest of the
Goverment, for you to print. It's too long for
this letter, and you can ask Zekel Bigelow, if
he hain't stop'd payment, to pay you for the
expense
of printin on't, and tell him for me if
his head is above water, it's more than can be
said of most folksand he'd better hold on all
he's got, and ride out the storm if he can.
His last letters to me say things are shockin
bad in Wall-street, but the worst there ain't as
bad as things are away West and South; and
they will be worse yet, if the people don't
decide
pretty soon, as the Gineral says, whether
I am right or wrong. For it's the people's
business now, and the Gineral is waitin for
'em.
Your Friend,
J.
Downing
, Major,
Downingville Militia, 2d Brigade.
LETTER XXIV.
The Major's View of the State of the Country and
Money ConcernsEverybody's ConcernsHistory
of the U. S. BankA Conestoga WagonIts
Driver
and HorsesOther WagonsTheir Men and
BeastsSteamboats and Banks not different
Skunks and PoliticiansPatriotic Appeal, especially
addressed to Men with Wives and Children
.
[Major Downing, in his letter of December 27th, after
mentioning
the fact of his having read his views on the subject of the
Bank, and the Deposites, to the Cabinet, engaged to send a copy
of the document to this paper for publication. A delay of some
days occurred before we received it. This, we understand, was
caused by a wish that the Cabinet might have an opportunity to
re-examine the case, and a hope that they might unite in opinion
on this thorny matter. Having waited some time for the
accomplishment
of this important object, the Major became
convinced
that the present Cabinet was far from being a `Unit,'
and considered it useless to wait any longer; and he therefore
fulfilled his undertaking by sending us the document alluded to.]
OFFICIAL PAPER.
Read to the Cabinet, and Majors, Auditors, and
Under-Secretaries
,
and Sub-postmasters, and the rest of the Goverment,
on 26th day of December, A D. 1833and printed for the
use of all the citizens from Downingville to New-Orleans,
along the seacoast, and up the Mississippi, and Missouri, and
so down the Lakes, and across by the Erie Canal to Albany,
and along by the middle rout over New-Jersey, Pensylvany,
and Maryland, to Washingtonand away agin to all parts
of creation, and to everybody.
Gineral
, and Gentlemen of the Cabinet,
and the rest on you here present, composin
the GovermentI speak to you as a man
standin right between you and the people
what I am goin to say ain't calculated to make
any on you change your opinion, so much as
to make you know mineyou have pretty
much all on you had your turn, and now
comes my turnif any thing I say has sharp
corners and scrapes the skin a little, it is
because
I hain't had time to file the edges
smooth. I'll give you my notions pretty
much as you get bread from the bakers, and
leave you to slice it or chunk it as best suits
you; and every man can butter his own slice
jest to please his fancythat ain't my
business
so much as it is hisn.
We are met here, not only to fix on some
plan to get the country out of trouble, but to
see how it got into troubleand I am goin to
say a little on both pints. When a chimbly
smokes at the rong eend, with the wind at
north-east, some folks may content themselves
with openin windows and doors to let the
smoke out; but my notion is that the safest
plan is to see into the cause on't, and correct
it, so that the chimbly will only smoke at the
right eend, let the wind blow any way.
Now there is a few things we must look
into a leetle, and then we will know more
about 'em, and I am goin to examin
What kind of a crittur the Bank of the
United States raly is;
Whether its natur is to do good or evil to
the country; and then wind up with
Matters and things in general.
Twenty years ago the country was in
trouble, and fill'd up with all kinds of Bank
papernigh upon as bad as old Continental
and a good deal was a leetle worse. If any
body ain't old enuff to remember that time,
and wants to see what kind of mony I mean,
let him go to the Treasury, and Mr. Taney,
can show him nigh a million and a half of
dollars, not worth the cost of the paper and
ink used every year in makin a report on't:
but this is only a drop compar'd to what
would be now there of the same kind of stuff
if it hadn't ben for the Bank of the United
States. All our wise folks of that day said
we must have a Bank of the United States,
and a good big oneone strong enuff to do
the work well, and to clear out all this trash,
and so this Bank was made, and the first
thing was, as there was a very little rale
mony in the country, the Bank went and
bo't a good jag on't in Europe, and went to
work here clearin away jest as we do our
fields in the spring.
It was a pretty dirty job to do so, I tell you,
and the Bank didn't get through with it
without
scratchin, and smuttin its fingers pretty
considerable; and that warn't the worst on't
for the Bank. The Government made the
Bank agree to pay fifteen hundred thousand
dollars for the privilege of doing this work,
and made it agree to take care of the people's
mony in all parts of the country, and to pay
it here and there wherever the Government
told 'em to, and to pay all the pensions, and
to do evry thing in the money way, without
chargin any thing for it to the Government.
This was a pretty tuff bargin for the Bank
for all it got in return was, to have the keepin
of the mony, and when the Goverment
didn't want it, the Bank might lend it out.
It took a good many years afore the Bank got
things to work smooth. It was like a
whoppin
big wagon that wanted a good many
horses to drag it, and as it had a valable
freight in it, it wanted none but the best kind
of horsesrale Conestogasand it warn't
every one who knew how to drive such a
P
team. The owners of this wagon found
that outfor some of the first that they got
came plaguy nigh oversetting it. So to rights
they got Squire Biddle. I suppose they
thought that seein that the folks in
Pensylvany
have the best and strongest horses, and
the biggest wagons, they ought to know best
how to guide 'em. Well, they made a pretty
good guess that timefor ever since they told
the Squire to take the lines, they hain't lost a
linch-pin or broke a strapand there warn't
no complaints made agin him by the folks on
the road: on the contrary, all the other
wagoners
liked the Squire amazinly; he was
always ready to give 'em a lift when he found
them in the mud, and whenever they got
short of provender, the Squire never refused
to turn out some of his to keep their horses
from sufferin. Every thing was goin on
better and better, and everybody said at home
and abroad there warn't such a team in all
creation. Well, about four years ago we
begun to pick a quarrel with the Squire, and
it's been goin on every year pretty much after
this fashion. The first go off, some of our
folks wanted the Squire to change some of his
leadin horsesthey said the breed warn't
righthe ought to put on the lead some
Albany trottersthat they were the best
horses on the lead he could have. The
Squire didn't like to changehe said the
horses he had knew the road as well as he
did, and they wouldn't bolt nor kick up, and
when they came to up-hill work he could
depend
on 'em.
Then agin our folks wanted the Squire to
change harnessthey said they had new
patent collars
and a horse could pull as
much agin with 'em as with the old-fashion'd
collars. Well, the Squire didn't like that
notion
nother. So to rights they told the Squire
he must give up the lineswell, that he
wouldn't do, he said, without orders from the
owners of the teamthey had appointed him,
and so long as they kept him there, he would
go along and do his duty, jest as he had done
and it warn't right to keep stoppin him every
day on the road, and tryin to make him try
new plans.
And with that, all our folks made a regular
battle on the Squiresome took away out of
his wagon a part of the bags and boxes, and
divided it round among the drivers of other
wagons, who was mixin in the scuffle too,
and away they crack'd off with it. Some
undertook to cut the Squire's traces; they
thought they was only leather and rope traces;
but the Squire was too deep for 'em, for his
traces was all chains kivered with leather,
and so they spil't their jack-nives. Some
went on ahead and rolled stones in the road,
and dug deep holes, and tried all they could
to make the Squire upset, and threw stones
and mud at him and his horses; but the
Squire kept on, his horses didn't flinch, and
as they had dragged the big wagon over
worse roads in their day, they went along
without accident. Well, now it turns out
that all the wagons that drove off so, with a
part of the Squire's load, are in trouble, for
the first piece of muddy road they all stuck
fast, and there they are nowone wants the
other to give him a pull and a lift; but they
say they all want liftinthe Squire has jest
come up with 'emand now they want
him to hitch on to 'em and drag 'em all out
together; but he says that's impossible, the
most he can do is to take back the load they
took from his wagon, and then perhaps they
can git out of the mud; but it is more than
his team can do, and he won't run the risk
of breakin his harness or injurin his horses to
drag 'em all out together. Well, now that's
jest about the condition of things, and the
longer they remain so the worse it will be
the longer horses and wagons stand knee
and hub deep in mud, the less able they'll be
to git out on't.
And now I'll leave 'em there a spell, and
we'll take a look into the natur of the Bank,
and what it raly is; for to hear some folks
talk about it, one would think it was a most
shockin monster, and that it was pretty much
nothin else but Squire Biddle, when it is no
more the Squire than that big wagon is, not
a grain more. Look at this long list of names;
well, these are the owners of the Bank; here
we see, in the first place, the nation owns
one-fifth
,
and the rest is scattered round, as you
see here, among an everlastin batch of folks
all about this country, and some in forin
countries; and I am glad to see on the list
here, old widows, and old men, and trustees
of children, who hain't got no parents livin,
and all our own people, they put their money
in the stock of this Bank for safe-keepinnot
to speculateand jest so with the innocent
foreigners, and the best on't is, they have paid
P 2
our folks a pretty high premium for every
dollar on't. Well, these are the folks, then,
that compose the Bank. Now what way do
they want this Bank managed? The
business
of the Bank is to loan mony, and is jest,
for all the world, like any rich man whose
business is to loan out his monyis it his
interest to dabble in politics, or to let politicians
dabble with him? Not an attom on't. I
never knew one of your rale politicians who
ever could pay his debts; and they ain't the
kind of folks people like to deal with, any way,
who have got money to loanthey know
that talkin politics, and gittin things into
snarls jest to answer party purposes, ain't the
way to pay interest nor principal nother, and
politicians in a Bank are the worst folks in
the world for the owners of the Bank, for the
most on 'em hain't got money of their own to
lend, but they are plaguy ready to loan other
folks' mony to brother politicians of the same
party.
No, no, a man who has got his mony loan'd
out (and it's jest so with a Bank) wants to see
everybody busy and industrious, and mind
their business, and increase their
propperty
,
for then they will be able to pay interest
and principal too; they don't like to see
things all mixed up with politics, and people
quarrellin and disputin, and when they do, they
git their mony back in their pockets agin as
soon as they can, for they know that politics
ain't profitable business.
Then it comes to this, that if the Bank is
what I have said it is (and its nothin else), it
ain't such a monster as some folks try to make
us think it is; and instead of bein a
dangerous
monster, I see, and I know everybody
else must see, who don't squint at it, but looks
it strait in the facethat its natur is jest like
the natur of any man who has got property
in the country, and that is to have every
thing go on in harmony, and with industry, and
with honesty, and accordin to lawno
jangles
and tangles and talkin politics in
porter-houses
and bar-rooms, hurrain for this man,
and pullin down that manthat kind of
work don't clear up new lands nor plough up
old ones, it don't keep the hammer goin, and
the wheels turnin; and don't pay interest nor
principal nother.
But some on you say the Bank has too
much power, and that Squire Biddle might do
a good deal of mischief if he would. Well
there is my old friend Capt. Elihu S. Bunker,
of the steamboat President, runnin twixt
New-York
and Providencehe's got about sich
another
monsterthere is no tellin what a `
dangerous
monopoly' of power that crittur's got in
that are boat. I was lookin into it when I came
on with him a spell ago, and he was showin me
how he managed it. If he was to fasten down
the kivers of them two mortal big copper
kittles
he has got in his boat, and blow his
bellesses
a spell, he would smash every thing for
more than 50 acres roundDoes any body
want to know why he don't do it?he has ben
in a steamboat as long now as the Bank's
ben goin, and hain't scalded nobodybut he
can do it in a minit if he chusesWell, I'll
tell you why he don't
it ain't his interest
,
and he don't own no more of the boat than
Squire Biddle does of the Bankthe owners of
the boat employ him to manage it, because they
know he understands his business.He knows
if he didn't watch over their interest, they'd turn
him outand jest so the owners of the Bank
would sarve Squire Biddle. And that ain't
all, Capt. Bunker knows, if he hurts anybody
with his boat, he'd run a chance of hurtin
himself toohe knows, too, that it is the
interest
of his owners not to have any accidents
aboard
any boat
for if people get scalded in
one steamboat, they keep clear of all on 'em
and tho' some folks think Banks ain't like
steamboats, I can tell 'em that in the main
thing they are exactly alikefor unless folks
have got confidence in 'em, and feel safe in
'em, they ain't worth owninbut when they
all go on and meet no accidents, they are pritty
good propertyand the largest, and strongest,
and cleanest, and quietest, and best-managed,
git the most business.Now I think that's
enuf about dangerous monopolies for a spell.
Let us now see what the Bank is about,
and what we've been about.
Deacon Goodenou has been in that Bank,
as one of its directors, off and on, ever since
it was a Bank, and I have heard him say fifty
times (and he's a man to be depended on) he
never heard a word about politics in it, till about
four years agoand it all came from our
sending every year since that time some rale
politicians to help the other twenty directors
to manage the Bankthe first go off, the
Deacon says, they thought best to keep quiet,
and make no stir about it; for it was pretty
much like findin skunks in the cellarthe
best way was to let 'em alone, if they'd keep
there, and run the chance of their goin out,
when they found there warn't no eggs to suck
but when they undertook to cum
up-chamber
,
and smell about in all the cubbords, it was
time to snub 'emand then came trouble:
and that's jest about the way now; and the
Deacon says, and he's about right, that
politicians
in a Bank are jest as bad as skunks in
the cellarthere ain't one grain of difference.
Some on you say we don't want a Bank
now
: well, that may be sobut when I got up
this mornin, it was plagy chilly till I got my
coat onnow I am warm, and it may be I
don't need a coatbut I think if I take my
coat off, I'll feel chilly aginand I am so
certin
of this, I won't make a trial on't.
Some on you say, the owners of this Bank
hain't got no right to a recharterthey have
had it long enufand its time now to have
a new shuffle and cut: well, that ain't my
notion
,
and I'll tell you whytho' this Bank
was chartered for twenty years, it had a good
right to believe we would renew its charter,
if it behaved well and did its dutyjest as a
Congressman has a right to expect his
constituents
will send him to Congress agin if
he behaves welland its a good way to
keep folks strait, and make 'em do their duty
but if we are to nock this Bank down, and
have a new shuffle and a new cut, then I say
that them folks who make money out of a rise
of stock in the new Bank ought to pay the loss
that all these old folks and young children will
suffer by nocking down the old Bankto say
nothin about the innocent foreigners who put
their money in this Bank, thinkin it was safe.
And let me tell you another thingthe longer
a Bank stands, and the older it gits, the better
folks abroad and at home like itpeople who
have got money to lend don't like changes
and particularly government changes. Would
any on you like to lend folks money in South
America? and do you think any of them
Goverments could make a Bank that folks
would have any confidence in? I don't think
they couldjest because they keep choppin
and changin every year.
Will any on you say that it ain't a good thing
for a country to make folks all about think it
is a safe one to lend money to? ain't good
credit worth nothin?
Well, how does any man in trade git credit,
and make folks think him safe to trust? Will
he break up his stand every year, and change
his business, and try new plans? I say that
ain't the way; and no man ever prospered
after that fashion; but when he finds things
go well with him, he hangs on; or else he
hain't got no wit in him.
Now, my notion is that none on us alone
can make folks all about creation think we are
safe folks to trust. But all on us together can
do so; and that is the reason a good big Bank
can manage this for us. Folks abroad know
the Bank, and the Bank know us; and so
we can manage things through the Bank
better
than we can alone.
Some on you say it ain't right to pay
interest
to foreignersthat when we git money
from foreigners, they keep drainin us of
interest
.
Well, that is all chalk and water. Now
I know we have got an everlastin new country
to clear up yet, and if an honest industrious
man can git a few hundred dollars lent
to him, he can go and buy a good many
acres, and clear it up, and sell it to these very
foreigners, who are all the while coming out
here to settle among us, and they pay fifty
times more for it than the land first cost: and
so our folks go on borrowin, and can well
afford to pay interest, and find themselves
in a few years with money to lend too. And
as long as this business goes on, I, for one, am
willing to say to foreigners, as the Cape Cod
fisherman says to the fish, when he gits on the
hook, and is pullin him in`So long as you
hold on one eend, I will 'tother.' But folks
abroad who have money to lend don't know
our folks who go on new land; and a good
many on old land nother. But they know our
Bank, and our Canals, and Railroads, and we
sell 'em the stock, and make 'em pay good
premiums too: and our folks can lend their
money to our farmers. But if we go on, and
nock down this Bank when its charter is out,
and bring trouble on the country, foreigners
will say, `Aha! there's trouble there!'back
they come with their stock, and git their
money
,
and keep it; and all our prosperity is
nock'd in the head! We charter'd this Bank
for twenty years, and so we do Canal
Companies
,
and Railroad Companies; but did we
mean when the time was up, to nock 'em all
up too, and say we don't want no Bank, nor a
Canal, nor a Railroad? It ain't common
honesty to say so; and I won't shuffle and
cut with you after that fashion; for make
Q
what I might by a new shuffle, I would be
asham'd to look one of these innocent
foreigners
in the faceto say nothin of this long
list of widows, and orphans, and trustees
of estates, and old folks: many on 'em, when
they bought the stock at a high premium, I
suppose never thought about the charter, or
how long it had to run, but trusted to the
Goverment. And now if you can chizzle
them out of their property, as you will by
puttin down this Bank, jest to git a new shuffle
and cut at a new onewithout turnin as red
as a beet when you meet 'em, I for one say I
can't, and I won't.
And now I'm most doneif I have trod on
any one's toes, it ain't so much my fault as
hisen; for I tread the strait line, and tread
ony on toes that stick out beyend the line, and
that's too often the case with folks now-a-days
in office.
I've tell'd you now pretty much my
notions
;
and I tell you for the last time you
have made a mistake, and that's no disgrace
to any man unless he tries to stick to it after
he knows he has made it. If you don't know
how to git the country out of the scrape
you've got it in, the people will tell you pretty
quick, or I ain't no hand at guessin. I have
now done my dutyIf the people don't do
theirn it ain't my fault. If they say my
notions
are right, they'll act on 'em; if they say
they are wrong, then things will go on as
they now go, and I hope they won't git worse
but that I won't promise. If things come
to the worst, I shall suffer as little as any on
'em, for I hain't got no wife and children to
support (and I am sorry for those who have,
if things are to go as they now go), I can cut
my fodder pretty much anywhere.
But I love my country, ev'ry acre on't, and
it goes agin my grain to see any part on't
suffer. And I know all this sufferin comes
from party politicsthis same party politics
that has driv all our wisest and best men out
of office; and now to keep together, wants to
git hold of the big wagon and all the money
in it.
My dander is up, and I had best stop now
for the more I think on't, and the more I write
about it, the more wrathy I git. So no more
at present,
From your fellow-citizen,
J.
Downing
, Major,
Downingville Militia, 2d Brigade.
[We have received a letter, which we publish with much
satisfaction
,
from the north part of this State, and accompanying
it, a fine specimen of domestic manufacture in the form of an
axe, as a present to our highly esteemed and invaluable friend
Major Downing. We take this mode of informing our distant
correspondents of the safe arrival of their tribute to the Major's
public worth, and conveying to them the assurance that it will
be faithfully delivered to the person for whom it is designed.
There is no such thing as calculating the extent of good which
one patriotic and intelligent individual can accomplish, when he
honestly devotes his time and talents to the advancement of the
public welfare. The important truths and the sound political
principles which Major Downing has given to his country
through the medium of this paper have been more extensively
circulated, and more generally read, than any other productions
of modern times, not even excepting the Waverley novels. We
presume the gentlemen who have acknowledged the great grat
ification they have received from the Major's letters adopted
this particular mode of expressing their feelings, in consequence
of the circumstance to which they allude, viz.the
presentation
through this office of a dozen of the same kind of article
last year to the President of the United States.
Eds
.]
To Theodore Dwight, Esq., Editor of the N. Y. Daily Advertiser
.
Dear Sir
,In the thriving village of
Carthage
(not the Carthage of Queen Dido on the
coast of Africa)but on the north bank of the
Black River, in the county of Jefferson, and
State of New-York, we have an Axe Factory,
manufactured from ore on the spot. Though
we cannot boast, like Messrs. Collins,
Harrison
& Co., that every minute of the day adds one
to the number of our well-finished axes, still we
really make every day our cool dozen, which, as
General Rial said of the grand scenery of the
Highlands, we think is pretty well for a new
country.' And we also think that our axes,
though not as numerous, will in point of
quality
bear a comparison with theirs.
Now while these rich and skilful mechanics
present a full dozon of their axes strongly
packed in a highly-polished hickory box to the
`Greatest and Best'while Pomeroy puffs his
razor-strops, by presenting a sample to the
great rejected, and Peleg Bissell approaches
our ineffably venerable President with his
offering
of a churn, so simple, so plain, so
destitute
of gearing, and so like his own beau-ideal
of a perfect government, that the `Hero of two
wars' `snickers right out,' as he turns the
crank; we too draw near with our offering.
It is a single axe, and is intended as a small
token of our regard for one who, as a
statesman
,
a patriot, a soldier, yields to no one.
You will of course perceive that we can
mean no other than Major Downing, of
Downingville
the
bed-fellow and privy counsellor
of `him that was born to command' the
Kitchen Cabinet. And we can assure the
Major that this axe has more than one of the
Q 2
requisite qualifications for a President. Its
helve is of hickoryin Kentucky parlance,
`is as savage as a meat-axe,' and of course
`can look on blood and carnage with
composure
.'
We confidently hope that the gallant Major
will accept of this trifle as a token of the high
estimation in which he is holden; and,
encouraged
by applause, go on as he has begun,
subtracting
every superfluous wheel from the
government till it is reduced to a machine
simple as a top, and direct and energetic as a
guillotine.
We intrust this present to you, Mr. Editor,
certain that through no other channel it would
reach the companion of the `Hero' so soon.
We are, respectfully,
Your obedient Servants
Starks
& Co.
Carthage,
December
27, 1833.
LETTER XXV.
[We publish to-day Major Downing's letter acknowledging
the receipt of the
Axe
from Messrs. Starks & Co, which was
noticed some time since in our paper. The effect produced
upon the company in the President's Chamber, when the Major
made his appearance at the door with that implement of
husbandry
upon his shoulder, shows that either his prowess is
well established at head-quarters, or that conscious guilt makes
men cowards without any real cause of fear. On any other
ground it is difficult to account for the sudden retreat from the
presence-chamber of their master, upon the mere
appearance
of the Downingville hero, with such a peaceable and
harmless instrument in his hand as an axe.
The mistake which the President fell into respecting the
identity of the worthy principal of the Carthage manufactory in
the first place, and the Government Bank Director in the second,
is not to be wondered at. Old Gen. Starks generally made a
good deal of scampering whenever he appeared with a weapon
in his hand; and the Government Bank Director, like his
renowned
name-sake of London (the Philadelphia of England)
has rode a strange tilt lately, and appears to have lost both
hat and wig in his career. Probably the Hero would have
been led into another more classical mistake than those just
mentioned, if Messrs. Starks & Co. had not fortunately given
in their letter a geographical caution against such an error, by
an express declaration that the Carthage where they make
axes is not the city built upon the coast of Africa by Dido, but
a modern village upon the Black River, in this State. The
exact
position of it may probably be found in Spafford's Gazetteer.
If any doubt shall remain, after the foregoing explanation,
upon Dr. Jackson's mind, respecting the identity of the
manufacturer
of axes, and the hero of Bennington, we take the liberty
to refer him for further information, on this or any other subject,
to the honourable Mr. Senator Hill, from New-Hampshirethe
State that claims the honour of having given birth to General
Starks.
Eds.
]
R
LETTER XXVI.
[We publish this morning, as was promised in our paper
yesterday
,
another letter from Major Downing. The principal
subject
of it is one of great interest to the country at large. The
concerns of the General Post-Office appear before the public in
a most unfavourable light; and it is perfectly natural that the
President, `whose duty it is to see the laws faithfully executed,'
should feel a good deal of anxiety to shield one of his deficient
servants. The Major's suggestions respecting the advantages
of the course pursued by the Postmaster General in keeping
back the knowledge of his official transactions from Congress
are ingenious, and probably furnish the most satisfactory
vindication
of that officer that can becertainly that has been given.
And the mode of pleading what the lawyers call a set-off, in
adjusting
the accounts between the losses of the Post-Office, and
the credits of the executive, though they may not be allowed
by the Committee of Claims, will be freely admitted by every
person who holds to the present or the next administration for
the rewards due to pure, disinterested, uncorrupted patriotism.]
Defalcations in the Post-OfficeThe Major's method
of letting off his own SteamThe magic Specks
screwed to a plain sightThe General takes a look at
things as they really areHis Steam up in
consequence
The
Major's notion of the real object of
removing
the Deposites from the U. S. BankThe
adjustment
of accounts by charging deficiencies to
account of glory and reform
.
To my old friend Mr. Dwight, of the N. Y. Daily Advertiser.
Washington,
Jan.
16
th
, 1834.
You
remember I tell'd you a spell ago, that
after we got the Message done, we was
obliged to take it all to bits, and nock out a
good many things about the 'counts, and run
the chance of lettin Congress skip 'em over;
and I tell'd you too, that I would to rights git
the Gineral's specs, and giv 'em a twist round
to a plain sight, and let him take a look at
things jest as they be, without a bit of `
glory
'
about 'em. Well, among them accounts we
had got in the Message was the Post-Office
accounts. I didn't like the looks on 'em a bit
at the time, but as everybody said money was
plagy scarce everywhere, the Gineral thought
it was natural enuf to find it pretty scarce in
the Post-Office too. `Now,' says I, `Gineral,
my notion is that we best let Major Barry tell
his own story about it; for as he has done so
much in reformin things, and as we have got
now a pretty good majority in Congress, he
may git out of the scrape.' Well, the Gineral
thought that was about the best way; and
Major Barry made his report, and tell'd a
pretty considerable of a cute story about his
havin found an error in the Post-Office
accounts
,
that had been overlooked ever since
Gineral Washington's time. I begun to think
for a spell that would stump Congress, about
as much as tho' there had been a fire in the
Post-Office, pretty much like that one in the
Treasury last spring. But, somehow or
other, some of the plagy Senators have been
smellin round, and got on a track that led 'em
right up to the fact, that the Post-Office is
head and ears all over in debt; and that it
has been borrowin money for over two years
now, and never said a word on't to Congress.
And I am peskily afeard, that seein the Law
says none of our folks shall borrow money
without consent of Congress (and which,
upon the hull, is a pretty safe law, for
Congress
couldn't tell otherwise how the money
was goin)I am, I say, peskily afeard we
can't git the Post-Office folks out of this scrape
without reformin some on 'em out of office.
But as they are all our best friends, and have
done more for glory and reform than most
folks, we shall let some on 'em resign, and then
apint 'em to some office abroad, or git 'em into
some place where they can git a liven without
workin for it; for the Gineral won't let any
on 'em suffer no way.
When the Gineral come to hear what the
Senate was arter, says he, `Major, will them
accounts of the Post-Office stand the racket,
or not?' `Why,' says I, `Gineral, its hard
tellin
:
but, as nigh as I can kalklate,' says I,
`I guess they won't in the wa Con ress
settles
accountsthings look plaguy crooked,'
says I; `and the worst on't is, them accounts
have been so twisted, first one way, and then
agin another way, that I am afeard now they
won't stand twistin any more. The only way,'
says I, `is to straiten 'em, and that's all I can
do about 'em. But,' says I, `if they break
to bits in straitenin on 'em, I cant help it.'
`Well,' says he, `Major, I wish you'd try it;
for,' says the Gineral, `if we can't keep Barry
up, there is no tellin what will become of us;
for it seems to me, ever since Mr. Van Buren got
the Post-Office Department into the Cabinet, we
have been able to do more in `rewardin our
friends, and punishin our enemies,' than in all
the rest of the departments put together.'
`Well,' says I, `Gineral, I'll try it,' says I; and
so the Gineral went to bed; and I got my slate,
and I got all the Post-Office accounts from the
time Judge M`Lean left the office and Major
Barry came into it. It took me a good spell to
git 'em all strung out in regular order; and jest
as I was beginnin to sifer up, the Gineral he
riz up in bed, and says he, `Major, I reckon I
can help you along.' `Well,' says I, `Gineral,
I want all the help you can give me.' `I'm
thinkin,' says he, `you best say that it's all owin
to Biddle; that he is crampin all the people he
can, and that he makes mony so scarce, folks
can't pay postage; and that if we had not
taken the deposits away from him, things
would be twice as bad now.' `Well,' says I,
`Gineral, that is a good notion, and I'll see
to-rights
how it will work among figers.' `I
thought I'd jest tell you, Major,' says the
Gineral
,
`afore I forgot it, for the notion jest struck
me as I was goin to sleep;' and so the
Gineral
laid down, and I went to siferin agin.
It was most daylight afore I got through;
and I finished off with the sums Major Barry
says he has been borrowin, and left a blank
to put in the amount he says the Post-Office
has overdrawn the Banks where the postages
are kept; for as he don't know yet what that
amount is, I can't tell myself; tho' I suppose
I could, upon a pinch, make nigh upon as good
a guess at it as he could, or any one else.
But I thought I wouldn't guess at nothin. I
never guess when I get hold of my slateI
sifer on one side, and then chalk down the
sum on totherso there can't be no mistake.
When I come to figer up the hull amount the
Post-Office has gone astarn since Judge
M`Lean left it, I begun to bile up like one of
old Capt. Bunker's steam kittles; and I was
glad the Gineral was snorin, for I don't like to
let people see me when my steam is up; but if
I don't do somethin, I suppose I should blow
up jest like a steamboat on the Massissippy
and so I got my ax, and down stairs I went
with a light to the wood-house, and split up
more than three cord and a half of hickory
afore I got in a good temper, and afore I
thought it was safe to go to bed; and then I went
to bed, and slept like a top till breakfast time.
The next mornin, when the Gineral come
into the Cabinet-room`Well,' says he, `
Major
,
did you finish them plaguy accounts?'
`Yes,' says I, `Gineral, I did, and split up
wood enuf to last us a month in the bargain.'
And I jest tell'd the Gineral a little about it
to prepare him. `Now,' says I, `Gineral, let
me have your specs,' says I, `a minit'and I
took 'em to the window, and give the screws
a twist, and tried 'em; and seein every thing
look'd natural, I handed 'em to the Gineral,
and then he and I took the slate, and went
over the figersboth on us standin up by the
table side by side. `First,' says I, `there is the
printin account and stationary of the
Post-Office
,
when Mr. Adams was President; and
here is the account since we've been inhere
is the amount of contracts for one spell, and
there is the amount for anotherhere is the
number of offices and clarks for one spell, and
there is the number for anotherand here is
the cost of wages and sallarys of the
Post-Office
when Mr. Adams was President; and
here is the cost since our timeplaguy deal
of difference, Gineral,' says I, `ain't it?' The
Gineral he didn't say nothinhe kept his eyes
on the slate, and his mouth nigh upon wide
open; ony once in a while he'd calklate on his
fingers a spell. `And now,' says I, `there is
the sum Judge M'Lean left in the Post-Office
when he went out on't; and
there
,' says I,
`is the sum that is
now wanting
in the
Post-Office
,
to make things square there, to say
nothin of the sum Major Barry says the
Post-Office
has overdrawn from the Banksand as
he don't know what the amount is, I don't
nother; and I don't care about guessin at it;
for it's bad enuf without guessin.' The
Gineral
put his eye on the last line of figers (it
was hard upon a million of dollars agin the
office), and look'd and blink'd, and began to
close his mouth up slowly, jest for all the
world like shutting up a safety valve; and he
began to swell, and breathe plagy hard. I see
the steam was gittin up. The Gineral he
look'd at me; and I look'd at him; and then
we both look'd at the slate agin. Bime-by the
Gineral he opened the valve, and let off the
steam, and sich a whizzin you never heard in
your born days. He took my slate, and was
jest a goin to smash it into a thousand atoms;
but I got it afore it struck the floor. He then
got his hickory, and thrash'd round a spell
with that. But that didn't do no good. So
says he, to-rights, `Major, what is to be done
about it?' `Why,' says I, `Gineral, I don't
see nothin else,' says I, `but to take my ax,
and do as I did last nightthere is a good deal
of hickory wants splittin in the wood-house
yet.' And with that I handed the Gineral my
ax, and he slatted about the chamber with it
for a spell; and if any of our folks had come
in then, I guess they'd found more to fear
than when I frighted 'em so a few days ago.
I never know'd the Gineral blow off steam
so long as he did this time; and I was peskily
afear'd the boiler would burst arter all. And
so I went to work puttin out the fire; and the
only way was to get the specs and screw 'em
back to `glory' agin; and as soon as I did
that, we got our pipes, and sot down and talk'd
over the matter.
`Now,' says I, `Gineral, though this is a
bad business, it ain't so bad as it first looks.
In the first place,' says I, `if Major Barry had
borrow'd the mony of Squire Biddle,
Congress
would have known it 2 years ago, and
the Post-Office reports wouldn't a ben as
slick as they have been; and we'd a had more
trouble to git so many of our folks in, last
election. And then, agin, by borrowin the
mony of other Banks, on interest, it made
them Banks the keener to get hold of the
deposits
;
for if Congress wouldn't pass a law to
pay the mony borrow'd by our folks, to make
their accounts look square, why the deposit
Banks could pay themselves; and now by
gettin our mony away from Squire Biddle,
who was bound by law to make a regular
report
to Congress of ev'ry thing, and puttin it
in other Banks, our folks can square off a good
many accounts, and Congress won't know
nothin on't; for it will take a pretty spry
siferer
to figer out all the accounts with so many
new deposit Banks; for we've got 'em now
pretty well mix'd up with what the Treasury
calls `
contingent drafts
,' and `
transfer checks
,'
and `
Treasury warrants
;' and Zekel
Bigelow
says he could in three days, with the
power the Goverment has got now,
warrant
,
and
transfer
, and
contingent
away, between
so many pockets, nigh upon the hull of the
deposits, and nobody could never find nothin
about it.
`And then, agin,' says I, `here is another
thingthe people wanted `
Glory
,' and they
wanted `
Reform
,' and they have had both
now over 5 years; and if they expected it
warn't a goin to cost nothin, they was
mistaken
.
And that ain't allthere was that
plagy `
surplus
mony' business: evrybody
said a spell ago if somethin warn't done about
it, the country would all go to smash. Well,
now,' says I, `we are gettin out of that scrape
as slick as a whistle.'
The Gineral he began to brighten up`Why,'
says he, `Major, we've been in a pashin then
about nothin. I remember now I tell'd the
folks in my Message a spell ago, that the
safest place for the surplus money was in the
pockets of the people; and I believe
that
sayin
alone brought over more than one State to
our side; and if our people git the mony, it's
all right, ain't it, Major?' `Yes,' says I;
`only some folks, I suppose, will set up a
squeelin, jest like the pigs when they come in
a leetle too late for their corn; and say, altho'
they don't belong to our party, they've got
jest as good a right to a share as we have.
`Well,' says the Gineral, `there they are
mistaken
;
for Governor Massy said (and that
made him Governor too), that the corn all
belonged
to the pigs that got into the pen afore
the gate was shut. But, Major,' says the
Gineral, `I am a leetle puzzled yet to know
what account to charge that Post-Office debt
to. If we can only git that right, and save
Barry, I shall sleep sound to-night.' `Well,'
says I, `Gineral, there is only one account
that will stand that charge, and a good many
more too; for as we go along, and Congress
gits to siftin things, I suppose they'll find
out somethin more. In the first place,' says
I, `that fire in the Treasury last spring did a
good deal towards settlin off a good many
land accounts, and other accounts. If we
don't have no more fires, or other accounts,
and Congress presses us, we'll give them a
lead through the new deposit Banks a spell,
as I have jest bin tellin; and if they follow
us up through that track, for some of these
fellows have got good noses, then we'll fetch
up on the only account I know of, and that
account, as I said afore, will stand a good
many charges yet.' `Well, what is that
account
,
Major?' says the Gineraland he got
up and looked at me.`Last week,' says I,
`Gineral, was the 8th January. Now,' says I,
`ain't that day worth a little more than the
4th July?' The Gineral gin a nod. `Well
then,' says I, `there is `Glory;' ain't that worth
somethin?' The Gineral gin another nod.
`And there is `Reform;' ain't that worth
somethin?' The Gineral noded agin. `Well
now,' says I, `put all that together, and if that
don't make a sum of debt due you,' says I,
`that will balance a good many accounts, I'm
mistaken.
New-Orleans, Glory, and
Reform
,'
says I, `debtor to the Gineral.' `That's
enuff,' says the Gineral. And so that was the
eend of the Post-Office accounts.
From your Friend,
J.
Downing
, Major,
Downingville Militia, 2d Brigade.
s
LETTER XXVII.
[By the following letter, which we received yesterday, it ap
pears that we were correct in the opinion we expressed, re
specting the rumor that our friend Major Downing had been
under the necessity of leaving the White House at Wash
ington. The truth of our suggestion is now placed beyond a
doubt, as this letter abundantly proves. The Major not only
remains
in his former station, but obviously maintains the full
degree of influence which he has heretofore exercised over the
proceedings and policy of The Government. That attempts
should be made by the Kitchen Cabinet, to thwart him in his
disinterested efforts to promote the public welfare, and to
frustrate
the machinations of artful, designing, and unprincipled
men, is not to be wondered at. But it is very fortunate that our
friend sees through their plots, and has independence to oppose
them face to face, even in the presence chamber.
Eds.
]
The Gineral tickled by the New-York and New-Jersey
LegislaturesThe Charge of Bank Bribery hits
the wrong SideAn Indian Fashion recommended
An Experiment at heating one Boiler at a time
State of the CountryThe Nub of the Business
Heterodoxy is not my DoxyA Game, Necromancy
or Financy; or Van Buren Cups and Balls
Transfer
Checks, Contingent Drafts, and Hocus Pocus
The Gineral at bayThe Pack driven off by the
Major's WhipScene closes with the Safety Valve
open
.
To my old friend Mr. Dwight, of the N. Y. Daily Advertiser.
Washington
,
25
th January
, 1834.
Ever
since I and the Gineral settled the
Post-Office accounts, as I tell'd you in my last,
by chargin the amount that Major Barry is
astarn to `Glory' and `Reform,' the Gineral
has been more easy about it than I am afeard
other folks be, especially some of the
opposition
folks in Congress: they keep smellin
roundand unless we can git up another
nullification, there will be trouble, not only
about the Post-Office business, but some other
branches of the Departments.
Congress keeps hammerin away yet about
the Deposits, and the Gineral was jest agoin to
give up, when we got the news from Albany
of the vote of the Legislatur there is favor of
the Gineral in taking away the Deposits from
the U. S. Bank, and the vote of the
New-Jarsey
Legislatur, and strong news too that
some other Legislatur, wo'd do the same.
The Gineral was amazinly tickled, and says
he, `Major, I reckon your notion that the
people warn't with us on that pint, is a
mistake
;
and now,' says the Gineral, `I'll hang
on and keep the Deposits, and Biddle may
whistle for 'em.' `Well,' says I, `Gineral,
we'll see, and as I said afore, if the people
don't tell their Legislaturs another story, and
Congress too, afore we are a month older,
then,' says I, `I know nothin on 'em.' `Very
well Major,' says the Gineral, `we'll see.'
And jest then in come Amos and the Globe
man, and some more of our folks, and lookin
pretty streaked too, and I got a notion right
off there was somethin stirrin; and so they
began to tell the Gineral that Biddle was to
work bribin all the people he could to sign
petitions to Congress, askin to put back in the
Bank all the Deposits agin, and to re-charter the
Bank. `Why,' says the Gineral, `ain't that too
bad, Majorwe must give the Bank,' says he,
`that Latin pill, there is nothin will stop'em but
that skiry factus' (or some sich name, the
Gineral
calls it). `Now,' says I, `Gineral, stop a
bit,' says I; `there is one thing puzzles me
considerable about this birbin businessI
should like to know who they be who are takin
bribesit ain't in the natur of things,' says
I, `for Squire Biddle to bribe the friends of the
Bank, for that would be uselessthen,' says
I, `it must be that he is bribin the enemies
of the Bank, and that's our party. Now,'
says I, `will you set by and hear folks say,
that our party is sich a scabby set of fellows
as to take bribesif you do,' says I, `I wont,'
and with that I riz up, but afore I could git
round the corner of the table, I and the
Gineral
was alone agin. I sot down and said
nothinI gritted my teeth a spell, but that
didn't do much goodI took my knife and
whittled the table, but that warn't much
better, and the only way to rights that put me
in a good temper agin, was to whistle more
than 40 verses of Yankee Doodle, for I didn't
like to say a word to the Gineral whilst I was
in a pashin. The Gineral was all the while
walkin up and down the roomso as soon as
I got through whistlin, says I, `Gineral, I
guess we best say nothin more about bribin,'
says I. `Well,' says he, `Major, I reckon you
are rightfor the notion never struck me
afore that that kinder talk hits right upon
the heads of our friends, for they are the only
ones that need bribin.' `Now,' says I `
Gineral
,
jest lets you and I sit down and talk over
this business, and I'll tell you, like a true
friend, how the cat is goin to jump, and if it
don't turn out as I tell you, I'll give you my
ax, and throw in my regimentals in the
bargain
;'
and so the Gineral he sot down and I
went at it.
`In the first place,' says I, `if I git in a
pashin, you must keep cooland if you git
in a pashin I'll keep cool; but if we both git
in a pashin, then there is no tellin.' `Well,'
s 2
says the Gineral, `that is a good notion, Major,
for that's jest the way the Ingins do, and they
larn wisdom from naturyou never see an
Ingin and his squaw git drunk together:
when one gits drunk, tother keeps sober, and
so they take turn and turn about.' `Well,'
says I, `I never heard that afore; but I
suppose
,
tho', they git along better when they are
both sober.' `Oh yes,' says the Gineral, `in
war time that is best, but not in treaty time.'
`Well,' says I, `that's no matter, that ain't
exactly what I am arter, but I've got a notion
out on't which I'll begin with: Some years ago
the Yankees got drunk, and got up a kinder
nullificationthere warn't much in it arter
all, according to my old friend Dwight's book,
but folks South thought there was, and so
they kept soberand last year the South got
drunk, and then all North kept sober, and that
frolic is ended. Now,' says I, `North, and
South, and East, and West are all sober, and
all shakin hands, and they say
we
have been
takin a drop too muchthere ain't no
nullification
nowhere in particular, but its all
nullification
all about us, and all hands are
formin
a ring and closin in upon us here, pretty
much like a wolf huntthey all say we have
taken the money that belongs to the people,
and the people won't be content till we give it
upthat's pretty much the
nub
of the
business
and
we shall have petitions and
memorials
from all quarters tumblin in upon us, and
if we don't mind them they will be follow'd
by hard nocks, jest like the story in the old
spellin books about the old man drivin the
boys from his apple-treehe throw'd grass
first, and that doin no good, he tried stones,
and that brought 'em down pritty quick.'
The Gineral he begun to git in a pashin
and says he, `Major, I'm gittin mad.' `Very
well,' says I, `Gineral, I'll keep cool accordin
to agreement.' And with that the Gineral
slatted round a spell with his hickory, and
talked about New-Orleans, and Siminoli,
and the Grand Tower, and I sat whittlin all
the while. `Why, Major,' says the Gineral,
`I'll never give up the Deposits in the world.'
`What,' says I, `not if the people say we was
wrong in takin 'em? Suppose the people
say the Laws are agin us, what then?' `Well,'
says the Gineral, `I've tell'd 'em that the Laws
are only jest as I understand 'em, and nothin
else.' `Now,' says I, `Gineral, suppose Clay,
or Calhoun, or Webster was in your office
and said jest soand you was in Congress, or
was one of the people, and didn't agree with
'em, how then?' says I. `Oh,' says the
Gineral
,
`that's a very different thingany of
them fellows would be dangerous to trust with
any kind of power.' `Well,' says I, `my
notion
is, howsever, that the law don't mean to
trust nobodyand as I am peskily afeard one
or tother on 'em will git in here arter we go
to the HermitageI don't want to have any
thing done now by us that they will do, and
then tell us they only do what we did. That's
the only thing that puzzles mefor,' says I,
`Gineral, sass for the goose ought to be sass
for the gander too.'
`Well,' says the Gineral, `there is somethin
in that, Majorbut,' says he, `I can't give up
the Deposits anyhowAmos says we must
hold on to 'em, and all our folks say so too.'
`Yes,' says I, `Gineral, it's true enuff, the
hounds have got the stag down, and got a
taste on him afore the hunters come upand
I suppose there will be leetle left but the horns
and trotters: but,' says I, `it ain't right, and
the people will tell us so, you may depend
and all I have to say is, if what we have done
is to be the rule herearter, I dont know but I
should like to be President myselffor folks
might make Laws, and all I'd have to do
would be jest to understand 'em accordin to
my notion.'
`I don't see, Major,' says the Gineral, `how
it is you git sich odd notions about public
sentiment
.
I know I can't be mistaken, for every
letter I have time to read tells me I am right;
and I read the Globe from one eend to t'other
every day, and that paper tells every thing,
and I see nothin there that tells me I am rong.'
`Well,' says I, `Gineral, you know you hain't
got time to read more than one letter in a
hundred
that comes.' `That's true enuff,' says the
Gineral; `but then our folks do, and they tell
me every thing.' `Tell you every thing?'
says I,`but no matter'and so I whistled
Yankee Doodle a spell. `No, no, Major,' says
the Gineral, `the opposition folks throw dust
in your eyes; you don't see things as clear as
the rest of our folks about us.' I jest was goin
to speak, but findin my dander was liftin, I
had to go to whistlin agin, and it took me nigh
upon 15 minits to git right; and I expected
every minit I would have to git my ax and
split hickory a spell in the bargain. `Now,'
says I, `Gineral, you are the ony man on earth
I'd look at a minit, and let him says so to me. I
got dust in my eyes?' says I. `I not know
what is goin on in doors and out of doors?
why,' says I, `how you talk!' `Now,' says I,
`you jist set still a minit, and I'll show you
somethin,' says I, `worth lookin into'and I
went into a room where Mr. Van Buren and
Amos and some more of our folks git together
every once in a while, to manage and talk
over matters, and I've seen so much of the
games play'd there, and bein naturally curious
in most matters, I can play some on 'em nigh
upon as slick as Mr. Van Buren himselfbut
he is a master-hand at it. The game they
had been playin most at latterly was about
managin the public money among the new
Deposit Banks, and showin how to use the
`
transfer checks
' and `
contingent drafts
,' so
as to puzzle folks in time and need. It was
done with a parcel of cups and balls, and little
strips of paperand did tickle me amazinly;
and for a spell puzled me tooand so I
thought I'd jest show the Gineral, and see if
it wouldn't tickle him and puzzle him too.
And I though I'd let the Gineral see if there
warn't a leetle dust in his eyes too. And so I
brought in a hull arm full of this machinery.
And as soon as the Gineral saw me, `Why,'
says he, `Major, what on earth have you got
there?' `Why,' says I, `it's a trifle, and I'll
tell you all about it to rights.' And so I
placed the cups bottom up, all along in a row
on the table, and then I gin the gineral a hand
full of small balls. `Now,' says I, `I'm goin
to show you about as cute a thing as you've
seen in many a daythem cups they call
banks, and them balls is the money we took
from Squire Biddle's Bank; the next thing is
to show you how things are goin to work,
now that we've got our money from one pocket,
where we always know'd where to find it,
and divided it round among twenty pockets,
where may-be you may or may-be you may
not find nothin at all on'tand here,' says I,
`are some leetle pieces of paper that our
folks make use on to throw dust withnow,'
says I, `Gineral, look sharp, or you're gone,
hook and line,' says I. `It's a plaguy cunnin
game, and I don't know sartin that I can play
it as well as Mr. Van Buren and Amos and
some more of them 'ere folks, and especially
the Treasury folks, for they have been at it
now off and on ever since I've been hereand
Mr. Van Buren tell'd 'em unless they could
play
this game
well, there was no use in takin
away the deposits. Now,' says I, `Gineral,
I'll beginyou are sartin,' says I, `there is a
ball under ev'ry cup'`O yes,' says the
Gineral
,
`for I jest put 'em there;' and then I
began
slidin the cups by each other, and mixin
on 'em, and kept talkin about Glory and
Reform
,
and the 8th January, and the
Proclamation
,
and Veto, and Nullification, and some
folks bein like old Romans born to command,
and others to obey, and so on: and jest as the
Gineral took his eye off the cups and look'd at
me, and was goin to say somethin, I slap'd
some cups together, and call'd out, `
Hocus-pocus
,
alicam pain, presto, e pluribus unum,
sine qua non, skiry factious,' says I`there,'
says I, `Gineral, that's the eend on't.' `Well,'
says the Gineral, `I don't see much in that,
Major.' `Didn't you?' says I: `then so much
the better for the game. I suppose, then,'
says I, `you think the balls are under the
cups jest as you put them.' `To be sure I
do,' says the Gineral; `I suspected what you
was after, Major, and I kept my eye on the
cups, and no balls could ever git from under
'em without my seein 'em. I'd stake my life
on't,' says the Gineral; `and what's more,
I'll stake the fastest horse in my stable, that
every one of the cups has got a ball under
'em.' `Well,' says I, `Gineral, it wouldn't be
fare bettin; and so do you go to work and
look.' And the Gineral he lifted up one cup,
and there warn't nothin under it but a piece
of paper. The Gineral he was stump'd; he
look'd at me, and gin his face a twist, and then
he look'd in the cup, and shook it. `Well,'
says he, `Major, that is plaguy odd; what has
become of that ball?' `Well,' says I, `I guess
the paper will tell you:' and the Gineral
took up that, and rub'd his specks, and read,
`Transfer draft, No. 101.' `Well then, I
suppose
,'
says the Gineral, `it's all right' (for he
jest began to take the notion of the game)
`and instead of one ball in the next cup,
there is two balls.' `I'm not sartin,' says I;
`and you'd better look.' And so the Gineral
lifted the next cupand there warn't no balls
there notherony another piece of paper.
The Gineral look'd a spell at me, and open'd
his mouth, and then he scratched his head,
and took off his specks, and rub'd them agin,
and then he read the paper. On one side
was, `Contingent check $500,000'and on
t'other side was written, `Marquis of
Carmarthon
,
T
$250,0006 per ct.'`
Post-Office loans
'
and all kiver'd up with figers, so you could
not see a bit of `
White
' on the paper. The
Gineral he blink'd at it a spell; and says he,
`Major, what does this mean?' `Well,' says
I, `Gineral, I don't exactly know myself; but
I suppose it's all right, for I see here on one
corner `
Amos Kindle
. `O, very well,' says
the Gineral, `if that paper has pass'd under the
eye of `
honest Amos
,' my life on't, it's all right.
But, Major, where is the ball I put under that
cup?' says the Gineral: `ain't it under one of
these cups?' `Not as I knows on,' says I
and with that the Gineral he turn'd to agin,
liftin the cups, and shakin on 'em, and lookin
into 'em, and there warn't a ball under nary
one on 'emony pieces of paper, all full of
figerin, and some on 'em marked, `
Transfer Checks
,' and `
Contingent Drafts
,' and `
Treasury
Warrants
.' The Gineral hussled 'em
about to see if he could find any of them balls
among 'emand examined all the cups agin;
and he looked under the tables: so to rights,
says he, `Major, I'm stump'dI nock under
I'm clean beat,' says the Gineral; `and
now,' says he, `where are the balls?' And
with that I put my hand in my pocket, and
took'em out. `Well,' says the General, `that
beats all the rest. Now,' says the Gineral,
`what game is this? ain't this nickremancy?'
`Well,' says I, `Gineral, my notion is pretty
nigh that, but Mr. Van Buren says there ain't
a bit of nickremancy in itit's only
financery;
but I suppose it's a leetle of both on 'em.'
`Well,' says the Gineral, `its a plaguy cunnin
game, Major, ain't it?' `O,' says I, `it's nothin
as I play it hereyou should see Mr. Van
Buren
at one eend of a table, and honest Amos at
t'other, and some of the folks from York State
with the `Safety Fund' cups, too, strung
around the table, and all on 'em understandin
the game nigh upon as well as Mr. Van
Buren
and
renand then they bring in the `party cups'
tooand such a movin and hocus-pocus work
I never see afore in my born daysin lookin
sometimes I wouldn't bet I had a head on my
shouldersit beats all natur,' says I.
`Now, Major,' says the Gineral, `suppose
you try it agin:' and so, as I got my hand in,
played it over two or three times a leetle slicker,
and the Gineral couldn't see the trick no
wayfor when I'd find him watchin plaguy
close, I'd spread the cups as far as I could
reach, and talk about `Glory' like all rath, and
tell about the people's beginnin to think that
some folks was outwittin the Gineral, and
that Congress wouldn't go home afore they
git all the public 'counts sifted, and the
people's
money back agin under their control;
and as the Gineral couldn't keep his eye on
all the cups at once, I'd
hocus-pocus
agin.
The Gineral couldn't see into it; and he rub'd
his specks more than twenty times, but that
didn't git the dust out of his eyes; and then I
turn'd to and explain'd all I know'd about it
to the Gineral, and he tried itand after a
good many slipspretty much as Major Barry
did when
he
tried ithe got along pretty well,
considering. `Now, Major,' says the Gineral,
`suppose we try it with one cup, and put all
the balls under it, and see how the game
works that way. I think,' says the Gineral,
`if you can outwit me then, I may as well
quit.' `Well,' says I, `Gineral, that was jest
my notion too; and I tell'd our folks, and
offer'd
to bet any on 'em they couldn't git a
single ball out, or git a piece of paper in the
place on't, without my seein it, if they only
used one cup; and not one on 'em would take
me upand I've tried it, but it won't work
with one cupyou must have a good string
on 'em. Some of our folks said they could
fix a cup so as to play the game with itbut
they couldn't with a plain single cupand
seein that, I stump'd 'em about the single
cup; they are all at work now in all parts of
the country, inventin a cup with springs, and
screws, and slides, and holes inside on't.'
`Well, Major,' says the Gineral, `I don't like
to have dust thrown in my eyes, and I never
did like this kind of
hocus-pocus
work; I
never understood it; and I don't like this
kind of
nickremancy
, or
financy
and it ain't
to my
fancy
at any rate, Major, and it shan't
be, that I'm detarmin'd upon'and jest then
in come a hull raft of our folks from Congress,
to tell the Gineral what was goin on there;
and as I had this letter to write to you, I went
into the next room; and whilst I was writin
it, I'd hear the Gineral once in a while stormin
away about that plaguy game of `
financy
,'
and `
nickremancy
.' `There won't be a
dollar
left,' says the Gineral, `to pay the old
sogers
their pensions, if we don't put a stop to
this game;' and then they all got to blusterin
and `
we
must,' and `
we
musn't do this and
that.' `Oho,' thinks I, `when folks talk of
we
,
it's time for me to take a hand:' and jest as I
T 2
was goin to start, I heard the Gineral roar out
for me; and not knowin what was comin, I
jest grab'd my ax, and was alongside of him
in a flash: and would you think it? there
was more than fifty fellers of our folks, and
some on 'em from Congress too, all standin
round in a ring, brow-beatin the Gineral, and
tellin him not to do this, and not to do that,
and by no means not to break their cups; for,
it seems, the Gineral had jest threatened to
smash 'em; and sure enuff, as soon as he saw
me, he let drive at 'em with his hickory, and
he sent the cups and balls into more than a
thousand bits. `Stand by, Major,' says the
Gineral. `Never you fear me, Gineral,' says
I: but afore I had time to spit in my hands,
the Gineral finished the war; there warn't a
critter left. And ever since, the Gineral has
bin blowin off steam; and he hain't said a
word to me about havin dust in my eyes; and
I begin to think the Gineral finds he has had
as much in his'n as most folks: and so that's
all for the present; only I'll jest tell you it's
no use for any one to attempt now to deceive
the Gineral with new plans, and a new Bank
we'll have the one we've got made a leetle
bigger, pretty much after Mr. Webster's
fashion
;
and that meets my notion, because the
country is bigger than it was 20 years ago
and there mustn't be no nickremancy about
it. The Gineral says there must be only a
plain cup, and all the balls in it; then there
will be no hocus-pocus without seein the trick
on't. So no more at present.
From your Friend,
J.
Downing
, Major,
Downingville Militia, 2d Brigade.
LETTER XXVIII.
More NickremancyThe General gets his Hand in
Difference between a Tammany Man and other Men
Hints at the Origin and Object of Safety Fund
BanksCharacter of Moneyed Aristocracies
Difference
between I and other FolksA P.S.,
acknowledging
the Reception of another Present
.
To my old friend Mr. Dwight, of the N. Y. Daily Advertiser.
Washington,
January
31
st
, 1834.
I and
the Gineral have had a good many
talks about nickremancy and financy, ever
since I show'd him that game of Mr. Van
Buren's
with the cups and balls; and every day
arter breakfast, we talk and practise a spell.
The Gineral will say, `Come, Major, now let's
suppose this here cup is sich a Bank, and this
lump of sugar is the deposit in that; and
then sich a cup is sich a Bank, and that 'ere
sasser is sich a Bank;' and so we go on, till
we turn bottom-up all the cups and sassers on
the table, and take nigh upon half the lumps
of sugar out of the sugar-dish; and then we
go to movin, and slidin, and playin
hocus-pocus
and
the Gineral gits so tickled at it
(now he is gittin to know the game), that I
am peskily afeard he'll forgit there is danger
in it; and Mr. Van Buren has been tellin him
`the Goverment' can't hold together no way
unless this game is kept up.
The news of the great meetin at Tammany
Hall has jest got here by express; and honest
Amos, and Mr. Van Buren, and a hull raft of
our folks come right in, enymost out of breath,
to talk about the `glory' on't to the Gineral;
and they tell the Gineral that if ony 100 folks
go to that 'ere Hall, there is more dependence
to be put in their resolutions, than in any
other resolutions, no matter if all the rest of
that big city agree to 'em. The Gineral can't
contradict this, because, as he says, Mr. Van
Buren knows more about York State than all
the rest of creation. I was tellin the Gineral
what Zekel Bigelow tell'd me, in his letter
about the vote of the Legislatur of York State,
consarnin the removal of the deposits, and
consarnin the Bankthat the last election in
York State was no guide on this matterthat
the Clay party, and the hull opposition party
to us, didn't do nothin, but kept sayin among
themselves, `give 'em rope,' `make no
opposition
;'
and in many places we had it all our
own way; and that the ony fightin was
among our own folks; and in some places we
come plaguy nigh beatin ourselves. But if
the election was to go over now, the people
wouldn't elect a critter in that state who voted
in favour of the resolutions. The Gineral
says he don't believe it; and that Zekel is
wrong; and that Mr. Wright, in the Senate,
says as muchand `you can't make
Wright
wrong
, Major,' says the Gineral (the Gineral
is plaguy witty sometimes). `Well,' says I,
`Gineral, what do you think of them
memorials
and petitions comin on here from
New-York
?
There is names enuff there,' says I,
`to carry any election agin us.' `Yes,' says
the Gineral, `there is a good many on 'em,
sure enuff; but Mr. Van Buren says that one
rale Tammany man is worth a thousand on
'em; and he has written on to git up a
petition
in old Tammany; and then you'll see,
Major, how the cat will jump. Our folks
there have got somethin to lose, if they don't
work sharp. The opposition folks haven't got
no offices to lose; and they know they hain't
got no chance for any vacancies when there
is any. Now our folks have; and that makes
'em pretty keen.' `Well,' says I, `there is
somethin in that, Gineral; but,' says I, `
suppose
a meetin of mechanics and land-holders,
merchants and traders, and all kind of folks
who don't git their livin out of offices, but
work for it in trades of all kinds, and who
have got families to supportfolks who love
the laws, and say they must be executed;
suppose,' says I, `they call a meetin in
New-York
,
and instead of meetin at night in a
tavern
all lighted up, and with picters at the
windows, should all come together at
noon-day
in the Park there in front of the City Hall,
where I and you shook hands with so many
folks last summer, and should pass resolutions,
tellin us they believ'd we was wrong in havin
any thing to do with takin the public mony
that it belonged to Congress only to manage
such things for themand that it was owin
to this that confidence and credit is destroy'd,
and they are sufferinhow then?' says I.
`Well,' says the Gineral, `until the people do
that, it ain't my fault, Major, in believin that
they think we are doin jest right.' `But,' says
I, `suppose they do so, and nigh upon all the
city goes there?' `Then, Major,' says the
Gineral, `I reckon it would stump usbut I
suppose if we call in Mr. Van Buren, he can
show us with the cups and balls how to play
'em.' `Well,' says I, `he may; but I guess it
would stump him too a trifle.'
The Gineral says Mr. Van Buren talks a
good deal about the fear of `monied
aristocracy'
but
I can see threw that pretty clear;
and if the people don't, too, it ain't my fault.
There is one kind of
monied aristocracy
I am
plaguy afeard ofand that is when politicians
manage to git hold of the mony of the people,
and keep turnin it to their own account,
first git hold of the mony that don't belong to
'em, and then buy up a party with it. If
people
don't keep an eye to this pint, it's all over
with 'em.
`I have no fear, Gineral,' says I, `of `
monied
aristocracy,' as some folks call it,
provided
we let people manage
their own
mony
and if they want to make a Bank, and a
good strong one too, let 'em have itbut let
'em manage it themselves, or let 'em appint
their own folks to manage it for 'em. It ain't
in the natur of things, for people who have
got mony to lend, to do any thing agin the
gineral prosperity of the country; for if the
country don't prosper, or if it gits into a snarl,
they lose their mony. So they are the very
kind of folks who are always tryin to keep
things strait, and accordin to law. Whenever
they take a hand in politics, it is to prevent
politicians gittin things wrong eend first.
`People who have got mony never will
consent
to let politicians manage it for 'em,
because
they know from natur, and all creation
has shown it, that as soon as politicians git
hold of
other folks' mony
, they sift it round
plaguy ginerous, jest to git into office; and
then, to keep themselves in office, don't care
what it costs, provided they pay away mony
that don't belong to 'em.'
Now this is the hull drift of the business.
Mr. Van Buren is tryin plaguy hard to take the
Gineral's place, when the Gineral's time is
upand as the people don't know him as
well as they do the Gineral, because he hain't
fought as many battles, he is cunnin enuff
to secure himself on another tack, and that is,
by gittin the control of the mony of the
country. This he has been to work at for a
long while. In York State his party has
ben practisin in this way for some yearsfirst,
in lettin folks know that the ony way to git a
U
Bank Charter was, by promisin to divide the
stock round in a particular waybut as this
would, in time, all git back in the hands of the
rich, or them folks who had no other way
of usin their mony, and would pay the most
for the stockand then they wouldn't let
politicians manage it for 'em. This puzzled
Mr. Van Buren a spell, till the
Safety Fund
notion was shown to him: now, thinks he,
I've got it; and all that is to be done is, to
try and make this plan work in the place of
the U. S. Bankfor Mr. Van Buren saw long
ago that as he had no hand in makin or keepin
up the U. S. Bank, but Mr. Calhoun, and Mr.
Clay, and all the other opposite folks to him
had, he naturally got a notion the safest way
was, to put down the U. S. Bank, and put his
Safety Fund Bank
right in the place on't.
And there ain't no other reason in the world
why Mr. Van Buren is opposed to the U. S.
Bank. And he got another notion: he
thought if he could ony bring all the Safety
Fund Banks in opposition to the U. S. Bank,
he would figer out a pretty good sum in
politicsfor as there was over 300 State
Banks, and ony one U. S. Bank, it would
work amazin well in his favourand he
could, on that tack, out-vote any man opposed
to him. But, as I have said afore to you, in
one of my letters, when a man attempts to
work out politics with mony matters, unless
he is amazin cute, he is apt to failfor folks
sometimes, who stick ony to mony matters,
and think they know all about it, find it turns
out right tother wayand that's Mr. Van
Buren's trouble nowhe is ony a politician,
and a plaguy cunnin one tooand he is a
master hand at managin things, and gittin
all his folks into office, and jist them kind of
folks, too, who don't like to git a livin in
any other wayand then he knows they will
work plaguy sharp for him, and to keep
themselves
in officeand will do pretty much any
thing, too. And then, agin, he is a master
hand at tripping folks who stand in his way,
and afore they know it they are flat on their
backs. I and the Gineral laff sometimes
right out for more than half an hour
whenever
we talk over that business of Calhoun
never was a man so completely outwitted
and the best on't was, Mr. Calhoun never
could put his finger on Mr. Van Buren and
say, you did this, or you did that. Mr. Van
Buren is a rale fox in sich mattershe never
lets nobody track him if he can help it
he has more wit than the Gineralfor he
manages to let the Gineral take all the
responsibility
,
and he don't take a mite on't:
that's natural enuf, too, for he knows the
people will hurraw, right or rong, if they
ony see the Gineralbut if they saw
anybody
else, they'd begin to think and talk about
Law and Constitution; and that would git
Mr. Van Buren in trouble right off.
After talkin over this matter a spell with
the Gineral`Now,' says I, `Gineral, I see,
jist as clear as I see you, that the hull country
is goin right into trouble; and if we don't
change our course we shall all go, hook and
line; for as soon as the next election comes
on, the people won't send back to Congress
here not a single man who says we are right
now in what we have donewe have gone
right agin the Law; and as a proof on't, look
how things now be, compar'd with what they
wasand if we go on so a leetle longer we
shan't be much better off than one of the
South American Goverments, which nobody
has got any confidence in, because the laws
ain't no guide thereevery man who gits in
office there follows the law jist as long as it
suits him, and when it don't suit him he does
jist what he pleases. Now,' says I, `the
people of this country won't allow that; they
have made laws, and they say they must be
executed and follow'd, or else there ain't no
use to have any Laws. Why,' says I, `
Gineral
,
if you wan't here yourself, the people
would no more stand still and let things go
on as they are now goin, than I would swallow
your hickory,' says I`for the land's sake,' says
I, `jist look at it: and, as I said afore, suppose
any of them opposition folks, such as Clay,
or Webster, or Calhoun, or Adams, or any
body in creation, was jist to do some things
that we have done, and you and I was in the
Senate, or in tother House, or was among the
people, why,' says I, `we'd raise all creation
agin'emI would,' says I, `in a minit.'
`Well,' says the Gineral, `when I come to
think on't, Major, I don't know but I would
too; but then there is a plaguy deal of
difference
betwixt them fellows and Andrew
Jackson
.'
And with that the Gineral rub'd his
specks, and fix'd'em close up to his eyes, and
took his hickory, and began to walk up and
down, talking about the popularity and the
glory
of his administration`Why,' says the
U 2
Gineral, nothin can hold a candle to itit will
be jist like a
light-house
to all the folks that
come arter us, Major.' `Well,' says I, `
Gineral
,
that's pretty much my notion too. But
the worst on't is, some, I'm afear'd, will say
that
light-houses
don't always stand in safe
placesbut sarve to tell folks `
there is danger
nigh
,' and to look out sharp or they'll go bump
ashore. So no more at present,
From your Friend,
J.
Downing
, Major,
Downingville Militia, 2d Brigade.
P.S.I got your letter, which you tied fast
to a
Patent Metallic Hone and Strap, for
Razors
, which was handed to you to send to
me, by the maker and patentee,
Mr. E. M.
Pomeroy, of Wallingford, Conn.;
and who
tells me in his letter, that he hopes I'll accept
on't as a present from him. If I warn't so
busy I'd write him a letter of thanks. But jist
to save postage, if your paper goes to
Wallingford
,
send him one containing this letter.
It's a complete strap as you ever see; and as
soon as it was known about here that I had
received it, nigh upon all our folks have ben
sendin to borrow it. Some on'em won't be
the worse for the use on't, for there are a good
many here who keep about `
half-shaved
' all
the while; and I tell'em if they use this
strap, I'll warrant their razors will cut
without
whisky.
Yours, &c.
J.
Downing
, Major,
Downingville Militia, 2d Brigade.
LETTER XXIX.
Presentation of CommitteesThe General shows his
Skill in ReceptionA MistakeThe Mechanics not
Tammany menThe real Simon Pures Coming
Dennis McLoonyFurther Particulars promised in
the next Letter
.
To my old friend Mr. Dwight, of the N. Y. Daily Advertiser.
Washington,
15th February
, 1834.
Ever
since I have bin in the Goverment, I
never have had so much on my hands as I
have since I wrote you my last letter. Folks
are pourin in here from all quarters, and
bringin petitions and memorialssome on 'em
jest as much as a man can lift; and when
they come to stretch them out, they kiver all
Congress. Most all the Committees that come
on here call to see me and the Gineral, and
the work of presentin them to the Gineral has
kept me busy enuff, I tell you. The first and
biggest Committee that came here was from
the New-York Marchants and Traders. I
tell'd the Gineral, says I, `now, Gineral, is our
time to brush up all we know about trade and
mony business; for,' says I, `them
New-Yorkers
evry one on 'em has got his eye-teeth
cut, and they hain't come down here at this
season threw the mud for nothin,' says I;
`and as they are comin to see us to-morrow
we better spring to it now,' says I, `Gineral,
and git evry thing cut and dried for 'em;' and I
and the Gineral went to work makin a kinder
shamfight on't. I see pretty quick it wouldn't
do, for the Gineral would fly right off the
handle, and talk about
Glory
, and
New-Orleans
,
and
Reform
, and about
his rights
, and
his
Goverment
,
and the GREAT EXPERIMENT, and wind
up by blowing Squire Biddle all to splinters.
`Now,' says I, `Gineral, that won't do at all,'
says I; `them ain't the kind of folks to talk to
so; they hain't come here to talk about `
Glory
;'
they have got enuff of that,' says I, `in
New-York already; and Reform, too,' says I.
`Why,' says I, `Gineral, my friend Zekel
Bigelow
tells me there is so much of that in
New-York
,
that folks are breakin all to bits there,
and it has crowded evry dollar out of trade.
Now,' says I, `I guess the best way for us is
to hear what these New-Yorkers have got to
say, and then bow 'em off as quick as possible;
and don't ask 'em any questions, and they
won't ask us anyfor if they git us on that
tack,' says I, `we'll go bump ashore, now I tell
you;' and so the Gineral began to think that
was the best way, and if he was to say any
thing in reply, it would be the old storyand
the Gineral has tell'd that over so often, I think
he could say evry word on't in his sleep.
Well, the next mornin, sure enuff, I see 'em
comin; and I call'd the Gineral, and he took
his stand right in the middle of the room, and
I stood a leetle ahead on him, 'twixt him and
the doorand in they come, jest for all the
world as folks come to meetin; and I turn'd to
and introduced 'em to the Gineral, and we
shook hands all round. The Gineral is plaguy
cunnin in such timeshe was mad enuff to
snap his hickory right in two pieces; but he
put on a plaguy good-natur'd look; and as
soon as we got threw shakin hands, one on
'ema rale spunky-lookin critter, jest about
sich another lookin chap as Squire Biddle, and
talk'd about as glib about mony mattershe
stepp'd out and spoke for the rest on 'em, and
he went on now jest as cool as though he
hadn't lost a dollar since we begun the war.
He was as civil, too, as you ever see; he tell'd
the Gineral pretty much how things was
workin, and how they was goin to work; and
when he come to speak of the Gineral's
grand
experiment
, he tell'd him pretty plain it
wouldn't work right. The Gineral was jest a
goin to let him have his notions, but I pull'd
him a twich by the coat, and he stopp'd: but
as soon as he got threw and bow'd, the
Gineral
begun, and tell'd him the first go off
he
was mistaken:
that there warn't a man in
the hull State of Tennessee know'd half so
much about banks, and banking, and trade, as
he didand so long as he was President he'd
let folks know what was the rale meanin of
`Government.'
Biddle was a monster, and so was the
Bank. Calhoun was a rascal, and so was
Clay, and Webster, and McDuffie, and the
hull raft of the opposition, and what puzzled
him most was to find out which was the
biggest
rascal, the Bank or ary one of them other
fellers, and he'd put 'em all down afore he was
done with 'em. `Hain't I saved the country,'
says the Gineral, `more than fifty times? If
it hadn't been for me,' says he, `the Ingins
would now be in Wall-street, scalpin all on
you, and the British would be all over
Kentucky
,
and Tennessee, and Virginny.' And
so the Gineral went on, and I couldn't stop
him till he got right into `Glory;' and so I
thought 'twas best to begin to bow the folks
off; and by the time the Gineral got threw, he
and I had it all to ourselves, and we sot down;
the Gineral he was a good deal struck up and
beat out, but he is as tuff as all natur, and can
go threw jest sich a tug evry day, ony give
him a leetle time to take wind; and so he
took off his specks, and went to rubbin 'em,
and we begun to talk about it. Says he, `
Major
,
I reckon I gave 'em a `skiery factious'
that time, didn't I? You see,' says the
Gineral
,
`I asked 'em no questions, and that kept
things snug. Do you know, Major,' says the
Gineral, `I didn't like the looks of that feller a
bit who did all the talkin for his companions:
did you understand, Major, all that he telled
about?' says the Gineral. `Pretty
considerable
,'
says I. And so I telled it all over to the
Gineral in my own way. `Well,' says the
Gineral, `I am glad I didn't understand him,
for now as you tell it it stumps me
considerable
.'
The Gineral he sat still a moment, and
begun to count on his fingers; and to rights
says he, `Major, who was that?' `Why,' says
I, `Gineral, he is the son of a man I've heard
you tell on a thousand times.' And as
soon as I spoke the name, the Gineral he
started up, and says he, `Major, 'tis
unpossible
what,
the son of Rufus King!
Why,' says he, `Major, he was always one
of my best friends, and was jest the kind of
man I likedhe was as firm as granit, and
knowed more about Banks, and public matters
than any one I ever methe was a rale
patriot
,
and an honest man.' `Well,' says I,
`Gineral, that you said, and I have a notion,
too, that he was in favour of the National
Bank, and jest sich a one as we got now.'
`That is true enuff,' says the Gineral, `but
that was when I thought jest so too: folks
should change their opinions, Major, when
`
the Goverment
' changes their'n.' `Well,'
says I, `I didn't think of that.' `I wish,' says
the Gineral, `I'd a know'd who that chap
was; I'd a made him shake his shoes for darin
to jine them rascally Marchants and Traders
agin
my experiments
.' `I guess,' says I,
`Gineral, that wouldn't a been an easy job,
for I kept my eye on that crittur the hull time,
and kept thinkin all the while of what I've
hearn you say about his father, and thinks I,
`that's a rale chip of the old block.' But come,'
says I, `Gineral, we've got more work
to-morrow
;
there's another committee from New-York
bringin another mile of names, all Mechanics,'
says I, `rale hard-fisted fellows.' `What,'
says the Gineral, `Mechanics, Major!' And
he sprung up and danced round like a boy.
`Them are the fellows, Major,' says he, `strait
from Tammany Hall,' says the Gineral, `now
you'll have another story, Majornone of
your Traders and Marchants for methere
ain't a spark of patriotism in the hull on 'em
but the Mechanicsgive me the Mechanics;
and now, Major, turn to and get a table well
spread, and dinner on it at 12 o'clockthat's
the
rale working-man's
dinner hour: and let
us put on our old coats, and don't shave
to-morrow
(the Gineral is plagy cunnin in sich
matters). So the next day, sure enuff, in they
come, and we turned to shakin hands. `Aha,
my friends,' says the Gineral, `these are the
hands I like to shakeno glove-work here
you are the men to tell Congress what to do:
and,' says the Gineral, `any man in office,
from the President downard, ought to mind
what you tell 'em.' And the Gineral walk'd
round among 'em and shook hands agin, and
slap'd 'em on the shoulders; and took a quid
of tobacco from one on 'em, and gin another
a chaw out of his own box; and was as happy
as you ever see, and spry as a cricket too.
`Now, my friends,' says the Gineral, `let's
talk over public matters:' and with that one on
'em stepp'd out and spoke for the rest; and I
never in my born days heard a crittur of his
looks and trade, talk so about Banks and
money mattersand he began back more than
30 years, when he was printis, and come up
all along, and he did shave down and saw up
party measures and party folks, and dove-tail'd
matters so, that the Gineral was stump'd: the
Gineral walk'd up to him and made plagy
ugly faces at him; but the crittur went on
and talk'd right up to the Gineraland there
warn't a lump of sugar, or a drop of ile in the
hull on't. As soon as he stopp'd, the Gineral
gin him a hard look, and says he, `Stranger,
what's your trade?' `A master carpenter,
sir,' said he.`I was your friend, Gineral,
and every man I employ'd was also, and we
stuck to you till the measures of your
administration
have driven us out of employand
here is a blacksmith, and here is a
ropemaker
.'
And so he went on pretty much
threw all trades. `It gives me pain, Gineral,
to tell you that our families' and here he
stopp'dhe tried to speak, but he couldn't: he
turn'd and walk'd to the window, and come
back and tried it agin; and as soon as he'd come
to speak about unemploy'd workmen and
their families, he'd choke right up, and his
lips would quiver soI was jist agoin to step
strait up and tell the Gineral what this man
wanted to saybut he got goin to rights
himself
,
and wound up by bringin his fist down on
the table so I had a notion it would go right
threwand the Gineral's hat on the table
bounced up, I tell you: and says he, `there
must be a change, Gineral.' The Gineral
didn't like the looks and talk of this crittur
nigh as well as the Marchants and Traders'
man the day afore. He tried'em a spell with
`glory and reform,' but that didn't do no good,
and that got the Gineral's dander up, too, and
so says he, `Strangers, the next time you come
to talk with `the Goverment,' you must get
your representatives to come with you:' but
they tell'd the Gineral they had none, and
hadn't had any for a long while;
but they
would arter next election
.
The Gineral took the hint in a minit; and
says he (for he was plagy struck up by it),
`If you dare to change any of your
representatives
at the next election (except one), I'll
put your city, the hull scrape on't, over on my
friend Swartwout's medows, in Jarsy. I'll let
you know that I am tryin
an experiment
, and
will try it, come what willI've said I would,
and right or wrong I'll do it, if I die ten
thousand
Spanish Inquisitions. And now,
Strangers
,
clear out and go home.' And as soon
as the Gineral put on his hat, they put on
their'n and walk'd out. But it did make me
feel plagy sad and heavy to see folks come so
fur, threw the middle of winter, and go home
empty-handed. The Gineral was in a pesky
bad temper all day, and so was I; but Mr.
Van Buren, and some of the Congressmen
from York State come in, and made clear
weather agin, by tellin us they expected ev'ry
minit another committee from New-York, of
the
rale stuff
, and no mistake about 'em, and
right strait from Tammany Hall, too, and
they read over the names. `There, that one,'
says Mr. Van Buren, `is an old friend of mine,
he was Mayor once, and is now a Banker;
he knows ev'ry thing, and can tell in a minit
the difference between a crooked account and
a fair business transaction
. And here is
another
,
he sent you a big bald-headed eagle
once, Gineral, don't you remember? and
by-the-by
,
Major,' says he, `he is one of your
countrymen; and the rest,' says Mr. Van
Buren
,
`are all to be depended onthe first
people of the city, in fact the party couldn't
hang together without 'em.' `Well,' says the
Gineral, `this is somethin like; and now,' says
he, `the best way would be, when they come,
to let Congress out, and let all our folks have
a hollow-day.' Well, sure enuff they have
come, and we have had
some
on 'em here, but
I han't got time to tell you about it in this
letter, but will in my next. And I've got
somethin to tell you, too, about a new man,
jest come here all the way from Ireland; his
name is Dennis McLoony, he is a
good-natured
crittur, and the Gineral likes him
nigh about as much as he does me. I don't
know what he is arter, and the Gineral don't
nother, but he says he can do pritty much
any thing, and he tells some plagy funny
stories for uswe hain't got no office for him
yit, but there will be some holes soon to fill
up here; and by his tell he can fit plagy nigh
eny place.
Yours, &c.
J.
Downing
, Major,
Downingville Militia, 2d Brigade.
LETTER XXX.
Some of the real Simon Pures at the White House
Awkwardness of Mr. McLooney, a new Member of
the Kitchen CabinetThe General is thereby
Pothered
,
and falls into sundry MistakesProsperous
times at homeA Family DinnerSome good Jobs
in ProspectA small Business Transaction with
the TreasuryA general Hurraw for Glory,
&c
.
To my old friend Mr. Dwight, of the N. Y. Daily Advertiser.
Washington,
21
st February
, 1834.
In
my last letter I tell'd you about my
presentin
to the Gineral them two Committees
from New-Yorkone of the Marchants and
Traders, and tother of the Mechanics, and
how the Gineral thought the last come right
from Tammany Hall, and got into a plagy
mistake about it. But I tell'd you that the
rale Tammany folks did come; and now I'm
goin to tell you what a high time we had here.
I got the list of names of the Committee,
and I and the Gineral went to work readin on
'em over and over, so as to git 'em glibso,
when the hour come, we got the room to
rights, and the Gineral took his stand right in
the middle on't, and I stood a leetle ahead on
him, and Dennis McLooney, who I tell'd you
about in my last, he said he best git by the door
with the list of names, and call 'em out for
us, and so let 'em come up to the Gineral one
at a time, and then there would be no mistake
He said that was exactly the way at all the
great folks' houses in Ireland. But when
they come, you never see sich work as Dennis
made on'the stopped the first one; and
instead
of lettin the man tell him what his name
was, Dennis wanted to know if he was so and
so: he took the first name on the list, and
arter he'd tried 'em all round, he took the next
name and tried 'em a spell at that,and so
on. I couldn't hear all that was said, for
Dennis
ony opened the door jist wide enuff to put
his own head out, and kept talkin and scoldin
like all natur; so to rights the Gineral call'd
out, and says he, `Mr. McLooney, stand aside,'
says he, `and let our friends come in:' but
Dennis jam'd the door right too, and turned
and tell'd the Gineral he didn't believe they
were the persons the Gineral expected; and
so I had to go and let 'em in myself; and to
keep Dennis out of trouble, I tell'd him to go
in a corner, and look and larn somethin of
American manners, afore he come to play
Irish here: and so in they comebut there
was ony three on 'em, and that made things
easy for me; and as the Gineral remembered
as many of the names, he stepped up to 'em,
and shook hands with 'em, and called 'em by
the three first names on the listto one he
said, `I am glad to welcome the man who
was once Mayor of New-York, and I hope to
see you Mayor agin,' says the Gineral`and
you, my friend, I thank you once more for
bringing me on here, jist arter my first election,
that big bald-headed eagle: I was so busy
then I had not time to do it; I am sorry to
tell you that noble bird is dead,but I
presarved
all I could of him; I stuffed my
armchair
cushion with his feathers; my friend
Mrs. E. made a fan of his tail, and I keep his
quills to write my Proclamations and Vetoes
with:' and so the Gineral shook hands agin;
and to rights, says he, `where is the rest on
you?' and he took up the list and read all their
names over; and then come trouble. They
told the Gineral nary one on 'em ever had bin
Mayor, and none on 'em ever sent an Eagle to
the Gineral; but one said he had the
honour
of makin the furniter for the Gineral's room,
when he was on at York, on the
Grand tower;
and then he handed the Gineral his card, tellin
about his work; and another stepp'd up, and
tell'd the Gineral he had the
honour
of sellin
it at auction arter the Gineral was done usin
on't; and he gin the Gineral another card,
tellin what his business was in York. The
Gineral look'd at 'em a spell, and then he
looked at t'other one; but he had no card; he
said he didn't do no business, because he had
an office under the Goverment. The Gineral
begun to think there was another mistake;
and he look'd at me, and I tipp'd him a wink,
and jest whisper'd in his ear, `try 'em on
Glory
a spell, Gineral,' says I, `and there will
be no mistake arter that;' and so the Gineral
went at it,and sure enuff you never see
critters spruce up as they did; and the further
the Gineral got into Glory and Reform, the
louder these critters hurraw'd for us; and
Dennis got at it too; and that made jest six
on us, and we settled up matters as clear as a
whistle. There warn't no distress nowhere;
one said, mahogany was as cheap as pine
boards was a spell ago, and so was labour;
and if the Gineral would ony go on and put
down the Bank, and would give him an order
to make him some tables, he would show the
difference; another said times never was better
for his business,for he expected this spring
to have the sellin of nigh upon all the
household
furniture in New-York; and the other
said he was content, so long as the party hung
together, for he got his honest livin out of the
public money, and that didn't belong to nobody
but the Gineral; and then we all turn'd too agin,
and had another spell of Glory and hurrawin.
The Gineral was tickled most desperately;
and he tell'd 'em all to stay and take dinner
with us: and as soon as Congress was let out
we had a good large party, and we all sot
down and talk'd over matters; and as we had
now jest the kind of folks from New-York to
tell the Congress folks and all other friends
what the rale state of things was North, and
that there warn't no distress there, and them
other fellers I tell'd you about in my last letter
ony come here to throw dust in our eyes.
Evry thing was now as light as sun shine, and
it will take a good many Committees and
Petitions
too to make the Gineral budge an inch now.
The Gineral tell'd these good folks from
Tammany Hall, he'd like to have 'em stay
here as long as Congress remains here, and
they may come and put up in the White
House, and they shan't spend a cent of their
own money. As soon as the Gineral said that,
one on 'em got up from the table and walked
round to the Gineral, and whispered somethin
in the Gineral's ear. For a spell the Gineral
looked plagy blank, and all I could hear him
say was, `What'`Rent'`Can't pay.' `I
see,' says the Gineral, `how it isthat's
Biddle's
workI'll disappint him:' and with that
he call'd Amos, and whispered somethin to
him, and
he
whisper'd somethin to Tawney,
and
he
whisper'd agin to Major Blair, and so
it went round, till one on 'em got up and went
over to the Treasury, and brought in some
money, and the Gineral settled up that matter
pretty quick. And so that's pretty much all
I've got to say about this Tammany
Committee
and
if you want to know about some
other things that's goin on here that I hain't
got time to write about, I'd advise you to read
Dennis McLooney's letters; he writes a leetle
evry day to his friends in Ireland; and to git
it home safe, he tells me he sends his letters
to Mr. King, who prints the New-York
American
.
Dennis and I are pretty good friends,
consideringbut he says he don't like the
Yankees a bit; and, to be even with him, I tell
him I like his countrymen amazinglyso we
wont quarrel on that hook. Yours, &c.
J.
Downing
, Major,
Downingville Militia, 2d Brigade.
Y
LETTER XXXI.
A Discussion on Assassination LettersReflections
thereonThe Major exposed to Assassination as well
as the GineralThis diabolical Plot not confined to
one Party aloneDutch Dunder and BlixemThe
Gineral alarmed at the Sound onlyA Translation
requested, and Reasons for declining itA Lame
TrickConcluded by a Haw Haw
.
To my old friend Mr. Dwight, of the N. Y. Daily Advertiser.
Washington,
20th February
, 1834.
We
have had a good deal of sport here
lately, about a new kink our folks got into.
Findin things was goin pretty tuff agin us, and
so many Committee folks comin on here,
pesterin on us every day with petitions and
talk, they tho't best to put a stop to itand
got up some letters full of fire, and toe, and
brimstone, and bloody murder agin the
Gineral
and
threatenin on him. This, you know,
is an old trick in the old countriesand I
tell'd the Gineral I was peskily afear'd it
wouldn't work well here. But they wouldn't
take my adviceand so they got some on
'em printed. The first go off, the Gineral
had a notion it would do some good in stirin
up our friends about the country: but when
he and I come to consider on't, he begun to
think it wouldn't work rightfor when you
come to think on't, it looks plagy strange that
folks who want a recharter of a Bank should
be cut-throats and murderersfor if they
had a notion that way, they could get
money without comin here for it, and killin
the Gineral, and runnin the risk of my axe
in the bargain`And now,' says I, `Gineral, I
consider this business, now that it is all printed,
a plagy small matter, and I am peskily afeard
it will do us no goodfolks will laff at it all
about creationand them that don't know the
natur of our countrymen won't think so well
on usand I don't think it's right nother.
But howsomever,' says I, `since we've got in
it, and some folks will laff, my notion is, we
best begin and have some fun ourselves first;
and the next time all our Cabinet folks git
together
,
I'll have my share on't at any rate.'
And so, sure enuff, yesterday I got a chance.
I sot down and jin'd the ring, and says I,
`More
steel and brimstone
, Gineral.' And I
out with a hull bundle of lettersand the
first one I read was dated away up in
Hills-dale
,
New-Hampshire. `Now,' says I, `that's
a rale geniwine letterfrom a place where
there ain't nobody but rale geniwine folks of
our party.' They all stared, not knowin what
was comin: and the Gineral he sot still smokin
so you couldn't see but leetle on him. And
so I read:
To Major Downing, alongside the Gineral,
Washington
.a
`You etarnal rascal,If you don't stop
writin lettersthat keep all the while workin
agin our partywe will send folks to
Washington
who will chop you up into mince-meat
with your own axe. We don't see how it is
the Gineral keeps sich a blasted scamp about
him as you bewe believe you are bribed by
Biddle; for we don't see how you git a livin
out of your Major's commission, now there
ain't no war. If the Gineral changes his
notions
about the Bank, it will all be owin to
your adviceso look outand if the Bank
comes out of this scrape alive, you are a dead
man.'
`There,' says I, `ain't that a stumper? But
here is one a leetle worse than that, and is
dated, `Dunder Barak (* * * *) Kender Hook,
(* * * *) Overslaw.'
But that's all the English I can make on't.
And the Gineral he looked at it, and then
ask'd Mr. Van Buren to read it out in English
for us. And he took it and studied it over a
spell, and he twisted round, and was plagily
put to it to know what to do about it, and
whispered somethin to the Globe man, and
he
whispered to another, and it went round.
`Come,' says I, `let's have it.' `Well,' says
Mr. Van Buren, `it's a pretty severe letter, but
we best not translate itI'll read it as it is,
with pleasure.' And so he went at it after
this fashionand this is the copy on't:
Donder Barrack digt by Kinderhook op de Overslag
.
Aan Jan Downing, Majoor in het zelfe huis waar den
General woont.
Jy
bent nu een levendige man maar zo zeker
als gy nu den Generaal aanraad om de Bank
van de vereenigde Staaten te herstellen, zullen
wy den DONDER EN BLIXEM door je slaan, en
dan zal je een dooije man zyn. Weet je dan
niet dat als deeze Bank van de vereenigde
Staaten niet vernietigd is, dat de Regeering
Y 2
Bank te Albany haar oogmerk niet kan
vervullen
,
om Mynheer Van Buren President te
maaken? nu deeze brief is om je te zeggen
dat als je niet ophoud met die gekke brieven
te schryven, en regt omkeerd en Mynheer Van
Buren ondersteund om die Bank na beneede
te stellen, en de zekerheid-Gelde Banken na
boven te houden pass op-of je krygt het mes
in debuik, het maakt geen onder scheid wie
lydt, of hoe veel meuschen bankroet gaan, als
wy Mynheer Van Buren maar President
kunnen maaken, en dan kan ieder en een die
maar bewyzen kan dat hy hem ondersteund
heeft en geld daarby verlooren heeft op de
Pensioen Lyst van Mynheer Van Buren
gesteld
worden, en betaald worden wit de
publicque
kast, net als de oude Revolutie Soldaten,
en als hy President word dan zal hy alles
onder zyne bedwinging hebben en
zyne
vrienden beloonen, en zyne vyanden
bestraffen
.
Gy hebt maar eene week meer te leven als
gy je gedrag niet veranderdDus pass op
Before he got half threw, the Gineral he riz
up, and his hair stood evry way. And, says
he, `Major, that
sounds
like bloody murder
don't it?' And says I, `there is no doubt on't.
And if Mr. Van Buren would ony give the
English on't, it would be worse than any letter
agin you, Gineral,' says I. `Well,' says the
Gineral, `it it's worse in English than it
sounds
in Dutch, I don't want to hear it; and
we best stop readin any more letters about
murder.' `Well,' says I, `if that's enuff, I'm
content. But,' says I, `we best git these
printed in the Globe.' `No, noO no, no
O no,' cried out pretty much all on 'em, `they
ain't
official
enuff for the Globenothin goes
there but the rale stuff, `by Authority.
`Well,' says I, `if anybody says this ain't as
true as them other ones, I should like to hear
it.' And I give 'em a look, but they didn't
say a word. `Well,' says I, `that ain't all; if
any on you want to know any thing more
about these 'ere letters, I am willing
to tell
you who
wrote'em, and
why
they was written;
and that's a leetle more than any on you dare
say about t'other ones. And,' says I, `that
ain't all yet; if any on you want me to tell
who wrote them t'other letters, and why they
was written, I can tell you that too,' says I.
And with that, they all begun to look pritty
cloudy, and some on 'em said there warn't no
use to say nothin more about the business.
`Very well,' says I, `it's a nasty trick, any
way; it may do very well for some countries,
but it won't do in this; our people know a
leetle too much to bite at sich a bait as that.
And now,' says I, `the next time any on you
want to play off a rale good trick, you must
be sartin first, to see both eends on't; or else,'
says I, `you'll be as bad off as my old
neighbour
Eliakum Doolittle, who work'd nigh
upon a week diggin a wolf-pit, and fixen a
trap-fall on top on't, and jest as he was baitin
on't, he slipp'd in himself; and it warn't till
he was enymost starved to death, afore the
neighbours found out where he was.'
The Gineral was tickled to death with this
story, but our folks didn't like it a bit; and so
he ha-haw'dand as I always in these hard
times hook on to any thing worth laffin at (for
the chance is plagy scarce), I turn'd to, and
join'd the Gineral, and we ha-haw'd together
till there warn't a critter left in the room but
me and the Gineral. And so that's all I've
got to say about murder and brimstone this
time.
Yours, &c.
J. DOWNING, Major,
Downingville Militia, 2d Brigade.